Maine, session 132, LD210.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Accident - Sickness - Health Insurance 0455
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Public Service Manager II position, previously
continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 17, through June 18, 2027.
ACCIDENT, SICKNESS AND HEALTH 2025-26 2026-27
INSURANCE INTERNAL SERVICE FUND
Personal Services $166,185 $173,044
All Other $6,441 $6,447
__________ __________
ACCIDENT, SICKNESS AND HEALTH $172,626 $179,491
INSURANCE INTERNAL SERVICE FUND TOTAL
Accident - Sickness - Health Insurance 0455
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $17,235,498 $17,235,498
__________ __________
RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE FUND TOTAL $17,235,498 $17,235,498
Accident - Sickness - Health Insurance 0455
Page 1 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Public Service
Coordinator I position from range 25 to range 28.
ACCIDENT, SICKNESS AND HEALTH 2025-26 2026-27
INSURANCE INTERNAL SERVICE FUND
Personal Services $12,937 $13,805
__________ __________
ACCIDENT, SICKNESS AND HEALTH $12,937 $13,805
INSURANCE INTERNAL SERVICE FUND TOTAL
ACCIDENT - SICKNESS - HEALTH INSURANCE 0455
PROGRAM SUMMARY
RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $17,235,498 $17,235,498
__________ __________
RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE FUND TOTAL $17,235,498 $17,235,498
ACCIDENT, SICKNESS AND HEALTH 2025-26 2026-27
INSURANCE INTERNAL SERVICE FUND
Personal Services $179,122 $186,849
All Other $6,441 $6,447
__________ __________
ACCIDENT, SICKNESS AND HEALTH $185,563 $193,296
INSURANCE INTERNAL SERVICE FUND TOTAL
Administration - Human Resources 0038
Initiative: Provides funding for the marketing and advertising of state job recruitment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,000 $12,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $12,000 $12,000
ADMINISTRATION - HUMAN RESOURCES 0038
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,000 $12,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $12,000 $12,000
Adult Use Cannabis Regulatory Coordination Fund Z264
Initiative: Provides funding for the anticipated increase to the agency license management
system maintenance agreement.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $26,224 $26,224
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $26,224 $26,224
Page 2 - 132LR2409(17)

Adult Use Cannabis Regulatory Coordination Fund Z264
Initiative: Provides funding for the anticipated increase in costs associated with the
contracts for performing compliance checks.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $31,436 $8,570
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $31,436 $8,570
Adult Use Cannabis Regulatory Coordination Fund Z264
Initiative: Provides funding for the State's inventory tracking system contract.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $102,633 $153,950
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $102,633 $153,950
ADULT USE CANNABIS REGULATORY COORDINATION FUND Z264
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $160,293 $188,744
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $160,293 $188,744
Alcoholic Beverages - General Operation 0015
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Office Associate II
position to an Office Specialist I position and transfers All Other to Personal Services to
fund the reorganization.
STATE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $5,385 $5,841
All Other ($5,385) ($5,841)
__________ __________
STATE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Alcoholic Beverages - General Operation 0015
Initiative: Reduces funding in the cost of goods sold account to correct an erroneous
baseline entry.
STATE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($180,049,407) ($180,049,407)
__________ __________
STATE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE FUND TOTAL ($180,049,407) ($180,049,407)
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES - GENERAL OPERATION 0015
PROGRAM SUMMARY
STATE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $5,385 $5,841
All Other ($180,054,792) ($180,055,248)
__________ __________
Page 3 - 132LR2409(17)

STATE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE FUND TOTAL ($180,049,407) ($180,049,407)
American Rescue Plan Audit, Controller and Program Management Z302
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Senior Staff Accountant position, 2 Staff
Accountant positions and one Accounting Technician position within the General
Government Service Center previously continued by Financial Order CV0726 F5 to
provide continued service to the Department of Education and the Office of Community
Affairs and transfers those positions from the American Rescue Plan Audit, Controller and
Program Management program, Federal Expenditures Fund - ARP State Fiscal Recovery
to the Financial and Personnel Services - Division of program, Financial and Personnel
Services Fund on January 1, 2027.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 0.000
Personal Services $367,545 $193,169
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $367,545 $193,169
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN AUDIT, CONTROLLER AND PROGRAM
MANAGEMENT Z302
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 0.000
Personal Services $367,545 $193,169
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $367,545 $193,169
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Buildings and Grounds Operations 0080
Initiative: Provides funding for annual roof inspections and chillers on 3 buildings.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $52,000 $52,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $52,000 $52,000
Buildings and Grounds Operations 0080
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
REAL PROPERTY LEASE INTERNAL SERVICE 2025-26 2026-27
FUND
All Other $7,000,000 $7,000,000
__________ __________
REAL PROPERTY LEASE INTERNAL SERVICE $7,000,000 $7,000,000
FUND TOTAL
Page 4 - 132LR2409(17)

Buildings and Grounds Operations 0080
Initiative: Establishes one Space Management Specialist position to assist with the
increased workload associated with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 1742-G,
which requires owners of buildings leased to the State to inventory their buildings to
identify the presence of asbestos, lead, black mold, radon and other substances that may be
harmful to human health and to implement the Governor's executive order requiring the
Bureau of General Services, leased space division to use federal Environmental Protection
Agency Energy Star Portfolio Manager scores in the development of leases.
REAL PROPERTY LEASE INTERNAL SERVICE 2025-26 2026-27
FUND
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $97,255 $104,780
__________ __________
REAL PROPERTY LEASE INTERNAL SERVICE $97,255 $104,780
FUND TOTAL
Buildings and Grounds Operations 0080
Initiative: Establishes one Building Control Specialist position to implement proposed
security initiatives and provide optimal coverage across the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $83,266 $89,229
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $83,266 $89,229
BUILDINGS AND GROUNDS OPERATIONS 0080
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $83,266 $89,229
All Other $52,000 $52,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $135,266 $141,229
REAL PROPERTY LEASE INTERNAL SERVICE 2025-26 2026-27
FUND
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $97,255 $104,780
All Other $7,000,000 $7,000,000
__________ __________
REAL PROPERTY LEASE INTERNAL SERVICE $7,097,255 $7,104,780
FUND TOTAL
Bureau of General Services - Capital Construction and Improvement Reserve Fund
0883
Page 5 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Provides funding necessary to implement the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5,
section 1742-G, which requires the Bureau of General Services to inventory all state-owned
buildings, identify the presence of asbestos, lead, black mold, radon and other substances
that may be harmful to human health and identify associated remediation plans.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $400,000 $400,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $400,000 $400,000
BUREAU OF GENERAL SERVICES - CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION AND
IMPROVEMENT RESERVE FUND 0883
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $400,000 $400,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $400,000 $400,000
Central Administrative Applications Z234
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Public Service Manager I position, previously
continued by Financial Order 03595 F5, through June 19, 2027 in the State Controller -
Office of the program to oversee central applications personal services programs and
reduces All Other in the Central Administrative Applications program to fund the position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($155,821) ($162,316)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($155,821) ($162,316)
CENTRAL ADMINISTRATIVE APPLICATIONS Z234
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($155,821) ($162,316)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($155,821) ($162,316)
Central Fleet Management 0703
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,605,179 $3,605,179
__________ __________
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL TOTAL $3,605,179 $3,605,179
CENTRAL FLEET MANAGEMENT 0703
PROGRAM SUMMARY
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,605,179 $3,605,179
Page 6 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL TOTAL $3,605,179 $3,605,179
Debt Service - Government Facilities Authority 0893
Initiative: Provides funding for annual principal and interest payments on funds borrowed
through the Maine Governmental Facilities Authority in support of capital construction and
renovation of state facilities.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,250,000
Debt Service - Government Facilities Authority 0893
Initiative: Provides funding for annual principal and interest payments on funds borrowed
through the Maine Governmental Facilities Authority in support of capital construction and
renovation of Department of Corrections facilities.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,000,000
DEBT SERVICE - GOVERNMENT FACILITIES AUTHORITY 0893
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $4,250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $4,250,000
Financial and Personnel Services - Division of 0713
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Senior Staff Accountant position, 2 Staff
Accountant positions and one Accounting Technician position within the General
Government Service Center previously continued by Financial Order CV0726 F5 to
provide continued service to the Department of Education and the Office of Community
Affairs and transfers those positions from the American Rescue Plan Audit, Controller and
Program Management program, Federal Expenditures Fund - ARP State Fiscal Recovery
to the Financial and Personnel Services - Division of program, Financial and Personnel
Services Fund on January 1, 2027.
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 4.000
Personal Services $0 $200,579
__________ __________
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND $0 $200,579
TOTAL
Financial and Personnel Services - Division of 0713
Page 7 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Coordinator I position, one Accounting Analyst
position, one Accounting Support Technician position and one Accounting Support
Specialist position in the Security and Employment Service Center.
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $391,109 $420,253
All Other $19,200 $19,200
__________ __________
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND $410,309 $439,453
TOTAL
Financial and Personnel Services - Division of 0713
Initiative: Eliminates one vacant Accounting Analyst Supervisor position and provides
funding to continue and make permanent one Public Service Manager II position
previously established by Financial Order 003851 F5 to enhance the Natural Resource
Service Center's ability to provide necessary services.
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $19,980 $21,835
__________ __________
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND $19,980 $21,835
TOTAL
Financial and Personnel Services - Division of 0713
Initiative: Provides funding to increase the hours of one Accounting Support Specialist
position from 60 hours to 80 hours biweekly in the Corrections Service Center.
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $19,009 $20,533
__________ __________
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND $19,009 $20,533
TOTAL
Financial and Personnel Services - Division of 0713
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $119,062 $119,062
__________ __________
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND $119,062 $119,062
TOTAL
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES - DIVISION OF 0713
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 8.000
Personal Services $430,098 $663,200
All Other $138,262 $138,262
Page 8 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND $568,360 $801,462
TOTAL
Information Services 0155
Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Manager II position to support the application
team within the Office of Information Technology and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $154,384 $167,640
All Other $13,630 $14,015
__________ __________
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $168,014 $181,655
TOTAL
Information Services 0155
Initiative: Establishes one Systems Analyst position to support the policy team within the
Office of Information Technology and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $126,902 $136,978
All Other $12,836 $13,128
__________ __________
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $139,738 $150,106
TOTAL
Information Services 0155
Initiative: Establishes 2 Information Technology Consultant positions to support the Cloud
Center of Excellence within the Office of Information Technology and provides funding
for related All Other costs.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $284,536 $307,612
All Other $26,561 $27,232
__________ __________
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $311,097 $334,844
TOTAL
Information Services 0155
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Public Service Manager III position
previously continued by Financial Order CV0751 F5 to support the so-called citizen portal
within the Office of Information Technology. This initiative transfers the position from the
Federal Expenditures Fund - ARP State Fiscal Recovery to the Office of Information
Services Fund within the same program and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Page 9 - 132LR2409(17)

Personal Services $193,249 $200,960
All Other $14,760 $14,985
__________ __________
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $208,009 $215,945
TOTAL
Information Services 0155
Initiative: Establishes one Information Technology Consultant position to support the so-
called citizen portal within the Office of Information Technology and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $142,268 $153,806
All Other $13,281 $13,616
__________ __________
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $155,549 $167,422
TOTAL
Information Services 0155
Initiative: Establishes one Technology Support Specialist position to support the resident
education network within the Department of Corrections and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $126,902 $136,978
All Other $12,836 $13,128
__________ __________
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $139,738 $150,106
TOTAL
Information Services 0155
Initiative: Establishes 10 Senior Programmer Analyst positions to support applications for
various state agencies and provides funding for All Other to fund the positions.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.000 10.000
Personal Services $1,269,020 $1,369,780
All Other $128,358 $131,283
__________ __________
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $1,397,378 $1,501,063
TOTAL
Information Services 0155
Initiative: Establishes 10 Systems Analyst positions to support applications for various state
agencies and provides funding for All Other to fund the positions.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.000 10.000
Personal Services $1,269,020 $1,369,780
Page 10 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $128,358 $131,283
__________ __________
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $1,397,378 $1,501,063
TOTAL
Information Services 0155
Initiative: Establishes one Information Technology Consultant position to support the Chief
Data Officer and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $142,268 $153,806
All Other $13,281 $13,616
__________ __________
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $155,549 $167,422
TOTAL
Information Services 0155
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent 2 Public Service Coordinator I positions, one
Public Service Manager II position and one Management Analyst II position previously
continued by Financial Order CV0726 F5 to manage project management initiatives within
the Office of Information Technology. This initiative transfers the positions from the
American Rescue Plan Audit, Controller and Program Management program, Federal
Expenditures Fund - ARP State Fiscal Recovery to the Information Services program,
Office of Information Services Fund and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $520,596 $562,702
All Other $51,720 $52,944
__________ __________
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $572,316 $615,646
TOTAL
Information Services 0155
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding within the Information Services program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Information Services 0155
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,000,000 $2,000,000
__________ __________
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $2,000,000 $2,000,000
TOTAL
Page 11 - 132LR2409(17)

Information Services 0155
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Tech Support Specialist
position to a Senior Technical Support Specialist position.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $8,858 $9,216
__________ __________
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $8,858 $9,216
TOTAL
Information Services 0155
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Senior Technical
Support Specialist position to a Public Service Manager II position to support client
technology and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $21,374 $22,213
All Other $619 $644
__________ __________
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $21,993 $22,857
TOTAL
INFORMATION SERVICES 0155
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 32.000 32.000
Personal Services $4,259,377 $4,591,471
All Other $2,416,240 $2,425,874
__________ __________
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $6,675,617 $7,017,345
TOTAL
Lead by Example Z426
Initiative: Provides funding for a competitive, revolving grant program for state agency
renewable energy projects, purchase of electric vehicles, construction of electric vehicle
charging stations and initiatives that support maintenance, upgrades and upkeep of
renewable energy systems.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
Page 12 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000 $250,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $250,000 $250,000
LEAD BY EXAMPLE Z426
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000 $250,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $250,000 $250,000
Lottery Operations 0023
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Inventory & Property
Associate I position to an Inventory & Property Associate II position and transfers All
Other to Personal Services to fund the reorganization.
STATE LOTTERY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $5,091 $5,507
All Other ($5,091) ($5,507)
__________ __________
STATE LOTTERY FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Lottery Operations 0023
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Accounting Associate
I position to an Office Associate II position and transfers All Other to Personal Services to
fund the reorganization.
STATE LOTTERY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $5,979 $6,499
All Other ($5,979) ($6,499)
__________ __________
STATE LOTTERY FUND TOTAL $0 $0
LOTTERY OPERATIONS 0023
PROGRAM SUMMARY
STATE LOTTERY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $11,070 $12,006
All Other ($11,070) ($12,006)
__________ __________
STATE LOTTERY FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Maine Developmental Disabilities Council Z185
Page 13 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with projected expenditures and available
resources for the Maine Developmental Disabilities Council.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $519,535 $519,535
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $519,535 $519,535
MAINE DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COUNCIL Z185
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $519,535 $519,535
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $519,535 $519,535
Medical Use of Cannabis Fund Z265
Initiative: Provides funding for the anticipated increase to the agency license management
system maintenance agreement.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,857 $8,857
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $8,857 $8,857
Medical Use of Cannabis Fund Z265
Initiative: Provides funding for the anticipated increase in costs associated with the
contracts for performing compliance checks.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $93,898 $25,658
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $93,898 $25,658
MEDICAL USE OF CANNABIS FUND Z265
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $102,755 $34,515
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $102,755 $34,515
Purchases - Division of 0007
Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Coordinator I position to provide support for
Freedom of Access Act requests and administrative appeals hearing coordination,
documentation aggregation and legal communications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $117,369 $126,629
All Other $5,569 $5,569
__________ __________
Page 14 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $122,938 $132,198
PURCHASES - DIVISION OF 0007
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $117,369 $126,629
All Other $5,569 $5,569
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $122,938 $132,198
Renewable Energy Facilities Property Tax Exemption Z296
Initiative: Provides funding for an increase in reimbursement to municipalities due to the
renewable energy facilities property tax exemptions under the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 36, chapter 105, subchapter 4.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,750,000 $4,250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,750,000 $4,250,000
RENEWABLE ENERGY FACILITIES PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION Z296
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,750,000 $4,250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,750,000 $4,250,000
Revenue Services, Bureau of 0002
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Senior Tax Examiner
position to a Tax Section Manager position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $21,384 $9,064
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $21,384 $9,064
Revenue Services, Bureau of 0002
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Tax Examiner III
position to a Business Systems Administrator position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $13,029 $7,839
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $13,029 $7,839
Revenue Services, Bureau of 0002
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for computer programming costs associated with
establishing the increased dependent exemption credit and modified phase-out.
Page 15 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $31,800 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $31,800 $0
Revenue Services, Bureau of 0002
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for computer programming costs associated with
increasing the real estate transfer tax and changing the distribution of the real estate transfer
tax revenue.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $79,500 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $79,500 $0
REVENUE SERVICES, BUREAU OF 0002
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $34,413 $16,903
All Other $111,300 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $145,713 $16,903
Risk Management - Claims 0008
Initiative: Provides an allocation to pay attorney's fees awarded by a court against the State
and its departments, agencies, officers or employees and settlements of attorney's fees
without court award in these cases, which are not otherwise insured against under a
deductible or self-insured retention program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
RISK MANAGEMENT - CLAIMS 0008
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
State Controller - Office of the 0056
Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Coordinator II position to manage the
implementation of several new Governmental Accounting Standards Board standards,
which has resulted in significant additional work associated with preparing the Annual
Comprehensive Financial Report for the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $135,420 $146,444
Page 16 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $6,069 $6,069
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $141,489 $152,513
State Controller - Office of the 0056
Initiative: Provides funding for training and tuition reimbursement expenditures for the
Office of the State Controller.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,000 $25,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $25,000 $25,000
State Controller - Office of the 0056
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Public Service Manager I position, previously
continued by Financial Order 03595 F5, through June 19, 2027 in the State Controller -
Office of the program to oversee central applications personal services programs and
reduces All Other in the Central Administrative Applications program to fund the position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $154,467 $160,849
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $154,467 $160,849
STATE CONTROLLER - OFFICE OF THE 0056
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $289,887 $307,293
All Other $31,069 $31,069
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $320,956 $338,362
Unorganized Territory Education and Services Fund - Finance 0573
Initiative: Provides funding in the Unorganized Territory Education and Services Fund for
anticipated growth in county taxes and the cost of county services.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
UNORGANIZED TERRITORY EDUCATION AND SERVICES FUND -
FINANCE 0573
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
Page 17 - 132LR2409(17)

ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL
SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $3,731,052 $9,378,376
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $520,035 $520,035
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $1,013,548 $973,759
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $367,545 $193,169
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES $568,360 $801,462
FUND
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $6,675,617 $7,017,345
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL $3,605,179 $3,605,179
REAL PROPERTY LEASE INTERNAL $7,097,255 $7,104,780
SERVICE FUND
RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE FUND $17,235,498 $17,235,498
ACCIDENT, SICKNESS AND HEALTH $185,563 $193,296
INSURANCE INTERNAL SERVICE FUND
STATE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE FUND ($180,049,407) ($180,049,407)
STATE LOTTERY FUND $0 $0
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($139,049,755) ($133,026,508)
Sec. A-2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Planning and Research Associate II
position previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 17 to work with the federal
emergency food assistance program and commodity supplemental food program. This
initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs in the Bureau of Agriculture
program and the DACF Administration program.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $109,011 $117,109
All Other $8,262 $8,606
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $117,273 $125,715
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Environmental Licensing Supervisor
position previously established by Public Law 2023, chapter 448 and provides funding for
related All Other costs in the Bureau of Agriculture program and the DACF Administration
program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 18 - 132LR2409(17)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $142,660 $153,439
All Other $3,500 $3,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $146,160 $156,939
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Planning and Research Associate II
position previously established by Public Law 2021, chapter 635 and provides funding for
related All Other costs in the Bureau of Agriculture program and the DACF Administration
program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $112,269 $120,631
All Other $3,500 $3,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $115,769 $124,131
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Establishes one Entomology Technician position using savings from 2 seasonal
Entomology Technician positions.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT (0.815) (0.815)
Personal Services ($5,874) ($5,793)
All Other ($247) ($243)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($6,121) ($6,036)
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Establishes one Entomology Technician position and provides funding for
related All Other costs in the Bureau of Agriculture program and the DACF Administration
program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $82,153 $88,127
All Other $18,886 $19,964
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $101,039 $108,091
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Planning and Research Associate I position,
previously continued by Financial Order 003627 F5, through June 19, 2027. This initiative
also provides funding for related All Other costs in the Bureau of Agriculture program and
the DACF Administration program.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $95,804 $102,812
Page 19 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $7,670 $7,964
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $103,474 $110,776
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Establishes one Senior Planner position in the agricultural resource development
division and provides funding for related All Other costs in the Bureau of Agriculture
program and the DACF Administration program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $106,437 $114,800
All Other $3,500 $3,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $109,937 $118,300
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace a somatic cell counter for the Milk Quality
Laboratory.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 $75,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $75,000
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace a mass comparator for the Metrology
Laboratory.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 $65,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $65,000
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Provides funding to meet the statutory requirement of conducting an independent
study for each of the 3 distinct segments of the milk industry in the State in cycles of no
less than every 3 years. This request funds one study per year.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $65,000 $65,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $65,000 $65,000
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for grants for durable greenhouse structures,
including but not limited to structures of glass or polycarbonate, and associated siting and
installation costs to schools, community centers and other eligible public entities as
determined by the department for shared and educational uses and to enhance community-
based opportunities for food production.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 20 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $500,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500,000 $0
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Public Service Coordinator I position, previously
continued by Financial Order 003626 F5, through June 19, 2027. This initiative also
provides funding for related All Other costs in the Bureau of Agriculture program and the
DACF Administration program.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $138,927 $149,384
All Other $9,480 $9,920
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $148,407 $159,304
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Transfers one Consumer Protection Inspector position from Other Special
Revenue Funds to General Fund and transfers and reallocates the cost of one Lab
Technician III position from 90% General Fund and 10% Other Special Revenue Funds to
100% Other Special Revenue Funds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $8,158 $9,583
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,158 $9,583
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($8,158) ($9,583)
All Other ($343) ($402)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($8,501) ($9,985)
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Metrologist position
from range 27 to range 29, retroactive to December 14, 2023.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $25,589 $8,803
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $25,589 $8,803
BUREAU OF AGRICULTURE 0393
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $395,113 $407,256
All Other $75,500 $75,500
Capital Expenditures $0 $140,000
Page 21 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $470,613 $622,756
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT (0.815) (0.815)
Personal Services $337,868 $363,512
All Other $25,165 $26,247
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $363,033 $389,759
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $73,995 $78,544
All Other $518,543 $19,562
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $592,538 $98,106
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Planning and Research Associate II
position previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 17 to work with the federal
emergency food assistance program and commodity supplemental food program. This
initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs in the Bureau of Agriculture
program and the DACF Administration program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,648 $4,648
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,648 $4,648
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Environmental Licensing Supervisor
position previously established by Public Law 2023, chapter 448 and provides funding for
related All Other costs in the Bureau of Agriculture program and the DACF Administration
program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,353 $3,353
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,353 $3,353
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $696 $696
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $696 $696
DACF Administration 0401
Page 22 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Planning and Research Associate II
position previously established by Public Law 2021, chapter 635 and provides funding for
related All Other costs in the Bureau of Agriculture program and the DACF Administration
program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,353 $3,353
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,353 $3,353
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $696 $696
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $696 $696
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Establishes one Entomology Technician position and provides funding for
related All Other costs in the Bureau of Agriculture program and the DACF Administration
program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,648 $4,648
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,648 $4,648
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Establishes one limited-period Public Service Manager II position for water
resource management and technical assistance and agricultural irrigation funding oversight
and provides funding for related All Other costs in the DACF Administration program and
the Farmers Drought Relief Grant Program Fund program. This position ends June 18,
2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,353 $3,353
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,353 $3,353
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $696 $696
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $696 $696
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Planning and Research Associate I position,
previously continued by Financial Order 003627 F5, through June 19, 2027. This initiative
also provides funding for related All Other costs in the Bureau of Agriculture program and
the DACF Administration program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 23 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $4,648 $4,648
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,648 $4,648
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent in the Maine Agriculture, Food and Forest
Products Investment Fund program one Public Service Coordinator I position, previously
established by Financial Order 003897 F5, to manage financial and technical assistance in
the agricultural resource development division. This initiative also provides funding for
related All Other costs in the DACF Administration program and establishes baseline
allocation in the Maine Agriculture, Food and Forest Products Investment Fund, Other
Special Revenue Funds account.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,648 $4,648
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,648 $4,648
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Establishes one Senior Planner position in the agricultural resource development
division and provides funding for related All Other costs in the Bureau of Agriculture
program and the DACF Administration program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,353 $3,353
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,353 $3,353
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $696 $696
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $696 $696
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Establishes one Management Analyst II position to support the Fund to Address
PFAS Contamination and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $102,312 $110,178
All Other $27,023 $28,426
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $129,335 $138,604
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Public Service Coordinator I position, previously
continued by Financial Order 003626 F5, through June 19, 2027. This initiative also
provides funding for related All Other costs in the Bureau of Agriculture program and the
DACF Administration program.
Page 24 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,648 $4,648
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,648 $4,648
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Public Service Coordinator I position
previously continued by Financial Order 003610 F5 and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $122,146 $131,828
All Other $30,560 $32,287
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $152,706 $164,115
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Historic Site Specialist position previously
established by Public Law 2021, chapter 635 and provides funding for related All Other
costs in the DACF Administration program and the Parks - General Operations program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,353 $3,353
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,353 $3,353
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $696 $696
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $696 $696
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Senior Planner position previously established by
Public Law 2021, chapter 635 through June 19, 2027 and provides funding for related All
Other costs in the DACF Administration program and the Geology and Resource
Information program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,059 $10,059
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,059 $10,059
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,088 $2,088
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,088 $2,088
DACF Administration 0401
Page 25 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Planner II position previously established
by Public Law 2021, chapter 635 and provides funding for related All Other costs in the
DACF Administration program and the Geology and Resource Information program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,353 $3,353
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,353 $3,353
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $696 $696
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $696 $696
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Senior Planner position in the Geology and
Resource Information program previously established by Public Law 2021, chapter 635
through June 19, 2027 and provides funding for related All Other costs in the DACF
Administration program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,353 $3,353
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,353 $3,353
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $696 $696
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $696 $696
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Secretary Associate position previously
established by Public Law 2021, chapter 635 and provides funding for related All Other
costs in the DACF Administration program and the Geology and Resource Information
program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,353 $3,353
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,353 $3,353
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $696 $696
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $696 $696
DACF Administration 0401
Page 26 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Continues one limited-period Mapping and Graphic Arts Specialist II position
previously established by Public Law 2021, chapter 635 through June 19, 2027 and
provides funding for related All Other costs in the DACF Administration program and the
Maine Land Use Planning Commission program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,353 $3,353
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,353 $3,353
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $696 $696
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $696 $696
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Office Specialist II position previously
established by Public Law 2021, chapter 635 and provides funding for related All Other
costs in the DACF Administration program and the Land for Maine's Future program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,353 $3,353
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,353 $3,353
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $696 $696
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $696 $696
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Public Service Coordinator I position from 50%
General Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Forest Resource Management
program to 50% General Fund in the Forest Resource Management program and 50% Other
Special Revenue Funds in the DACF Administration program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $65,694 $68,260
All Other $11,718 $12,176
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $77,412 $80,436
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Senior Planner position established by Financial
Order AGR00-0031 through June 18, 2027 and provides funding for related All Other costs
in the DACF Administration program and the Parks - General Operations program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,353 $3,353
Page 27 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,353 $3,353
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $611 $611
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $611 $611
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Public Service
Manager III position from range 35 to range 36. This initiative also provides funding for
related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $8,051 $8,378
All Other $1,433 $1,491
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,484 $9,869
DACF ADMINISTRATION 0401
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $46,942 $46,942
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $46,942 $46,942
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $298,203 $318,644
All Other $103,633 $107,279
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $401,836 $425,923
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Transfers 2 Laborer I positions and 2 Wildland Firefighter positions from Federal
Expenditures Fund to General Fund and transfers and reallocates the cost of one
Maintenance Mechanic position from 92% Federal Expenditures Fund and 8% General
Fund to 100% General Fund and one Wildland Firefighter position from 52% Federal
Expenditures Fund and 48% General Fund to 100% General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 2.192 2.192
Personal Services $231,369 $246,694
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $231,369 $246,694
Page 28 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (2.000) (2.000)
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT (2.192) (2.192)
Personal Services ($219,632) ($230,791)
All Other ($5,013) ($5,333)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($224,645) ($236,124)
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Provides funding for maintenance and repairs to facilities owned by the forest
protection unit of the Bureau of Forestry.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $200,000 $200,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $200,000 $200,000
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Provides funding for aviation maintenance.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $130,500
Capital Expenditures $0 $300,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $430,500
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Provides funding to purchase a wildfire engine.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $100,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $0
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Provides funding for equipment installation in vehicles, including radios.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,000 $12,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $12,000 $12,000
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 2 Laborer I positions and 2
Laborer II positions to Wildland Firefighter positions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $11,996 $13,400
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $11,996 $13,400
Page 29 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $19,436 $19,999
All Other $429 $444
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $19,865 $20,443
DIVISION OF FOREST PROTECTION Z232
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 2.192 2.192
Personal Services $243,365 $260,094
All Other $12,000 $142,500
Capital Expenditures $100,000 $300,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $355,365 $702,594
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (2.000) (2.000)
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT (2.192) (2.192)
Personal Services ($200,196) ($210,792)
All Other ($4,584) ($4,889)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($204,780) ($215,681)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $200,000 $200,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $200,000 $200,000
Farmers Drought Relief Grant Program Fund Z364
Initiative: Establishes one limited-period Public Service Manager II position for water
resource management and technical assistance and agricultural irrigation funding oversight
and provides funding for related All Other costs in the DACF Administration program and
the Farmers Drought Relief Grant Program Fund program. This position ends June 18,
2027.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $135,445 $146,470
All Other $3,500 $3,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $138,945 $149,970
Farmers Drought Relief Grant Program Fund Z364
Initiative: Provides funding to establish a baseline allocation in the Farmers Drought Relief
Grant Program Fund.
Page 30 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $100,000 $100,000
FARMERS DROUGHT RELIEF GRANT PROGRAM FUND Z364
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $135,445 $146,470
All Other $103,500 $103,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $238,945 $249,970
Forest Resource Management Z233
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Public Service Coordinator I position from 50%
General Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Forest Resource Management
program to 50% General Fund in the Forest Resource Management program and 50% Other
Special Revenue Funds in the DACF Administration program.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($65,694) ($68,260)
All Other ($1,455) ($1,512)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($67,149) ($69,772)
Forest Resource Management Z233
Initiative: Reallocates one Secretary Associate position from 66.5% General Fund and
33.5% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $24,343 $26,331
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $24,343 $26,331
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($24,343) ($26,331)
All Other ($539) ($583)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($24,882) ($26,914)
FOREST RESOURCE MANAGEMENT Z233
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $24,343 $26,331
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $24,343 $26,331
Page 31 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($90,037) ($94,591)
All Other ($1,994) ($2,095)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($92,031) ($96,686)
Fund To Address Food Insecurity and Provide Nutrition Incentives Z329
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding to be used to provide matching funds for private and
public sources.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $600,000 $600,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $600,000 $600,000
FUND TO ADDRESS FOOD INSECURITY AND PROVIDE NUTRITION
INCENTIVES Z329
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $600,000 $600,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $600,000 $600,000
Geology and Resource Information Z237
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Senior Planner position previously established by
Public Law 2021, chapter 635 through June 19, 2027 and provides funding for related All
Other costs in the DACF Administration program and the Geology and Resource
Information program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $117,476 $126,253
All Other $3,500 $3,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $120,976 $129,753
Geology and Resource Information Z237
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Planner II position previously established
by Public Law 2021, chapter 635 and provides funding for related All Other costs in the
DACF Administration program and the Geology and Resource Information program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $98,895 $106,713
All Other $3,500 $3,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $102,395 $110,213
Geology and Resource Information Z237
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Senior Planner position in the Geology and
Resource Information program previously established by Public Law 2021, chapter 635
Page 32 - 132LR2409(17)

through June 19, 2027 and provides funding for related All Other costs in the DACF
Administration program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $117,476 $126,253
All Other $3,500 $3,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $120,976 $129,753
Geology and Resource Information Z237
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Secretary Associate position previously
established by Public Law 2021, chapter 635 and provides funding for related All Other
costs in the DACF Administration program and the Geology and Resource Information
program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $86,270 $93,022
All Other $3,500 $3,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $89,770 $96,522
Geology and Resource Information Z237
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Marine Geologist position previously
established by Financial Order 03899 F5 and provides funding to address climate resilience
across several programs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $118,234 $127,544
All Other $685,067 $635,476
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $803,301 $763,020
GEOLOGY AND RESOURCE INFORMATION Z237
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $420,117 $452,241
All Other $14,000 $14,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $434,117 $466,241
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $118,234 $127,544
All Other $685,067 $635,476
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $803,301 $763,020
Page 33 - 132LR2409(17)

Harness Racing Commission 0320
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $205,610 $369,381
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $205,610 $369,381
HARNESS RACING COMMISSION 0320
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $205,610 $369,381
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $205,610 $369,381
Land for Maine's Future Z162
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Office Specialist II position previously
established by Public Law 2021, chapter 635 and provides funding for related All Other
costs in the DACF Administration program and the Land for Maine's Future program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $107,438 $111,994
All Other $3,500 $3,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $110,938 $115,494
Land for Maine's Future Z162
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Senior Planner position previously
established by Public Law 2021, chapter 635 and provides funding for related All Other
costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $105,933 $114,192
All Other $3,500 $3,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $109,433 $117,692
Land for Maine's Future Z162
Initiative: Establishes baseline allocation in the Sears Island Consent Decree Other Special
Revenue Funds account.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
LAND FOR MAINE'S FUTURE Z162
Page 34 - 132LR2409(17)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $213,371 $226,186
All Other $7,000 $7,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $220,371 $233,186
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Land For Maine's Future Trust Fund Z377
Initiative: Provides one-time allocation for land acquisitions in the Land For Maine's Future
Trust Fund.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $8,105,445 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $8,105,445 $0
LAND FOR MAINE'S FUTURE TRUST FUND Z377
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $8,105,445 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $8,105,445 $0
Land Management and Planning Z239
Initiative: Provides funding for capital construction materials, capital improvements to
bridges and roads and other improvements to recreational trails and sites used by the public.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $3,000,000 $3,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,000,000 $3,000,000
LAND MANAGEMENT AND PLANNING Z239
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $3,000,000 $3,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,000,000 $3,000,000
Maine Agriculture, Food and Forest Products Investment Fund Z384
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent in the Maine Agriculture, Food and Forest
Products Investment Fund program one Public Service Coordinator I position, previously
Page 35 - 132LR2409(17)

established by Financial Order 003897 F5, to manage financial and technical assistance in
the agricultural resource development division. This initiative also provides funding for
related All Other costs in the DACF Administration program and establishes baseline
allocation in the Maine Agriculture, Food and Forest Products Investment Fund, Other
Special Revenue Funds account.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $127,075 $137,568
All Other $9,004 $9,436
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $136,079 $147,004
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
MAINE AGRICULTURE, FOOD AND FOREST PRODUCTS INVESTMENT
FUND Z384
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $127,075 $137,568
All Other $9,004 $9,436
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $136,079 $147,004
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Maine Conservation Corps Z149
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Marine Geologist position established by
Financial Order 03899 F5 and provides funding to address climate resilience across several
programs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $13,762 $14,169
All Other $260,950 $273,082
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $274,712 $287,251
MAINE CONSERVATION CORPS Z149
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 36 - 132LR2409(17)

Personal Services $13,762 $14,169
All Other $260,950 $273,082
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $274,712 $287,251
Maine Healthy Soils Fund Z328
Initiative: Provides funding to establish a baseline allocation in the Maine Healthy Soils
Fund.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $100,000 $100,000
MAINE HEALTHY SOILS FUND Z328
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $100,000 $100,000
Maine Land Use Planning Commission Z236
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Senior Planner position previously
established by Public Law 2021, chapter 635 and provides funding for related All Other
costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $114,002 $122,519
All Other $3,500 $3,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $117,502 $126,019
Maine Land Use Planning Commission Z236
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Mapping and Graphic Arts Specialist II position
previously established by Public Law 2021, chapter 635 through June 19, 2027 and
provides funding for related All Other costs in the DACF Administration program and the
Maine Land Use Planning Commission program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $98,854 $106,274
All Other $3,500 $3,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $102,354 $109,774
MAINE LAND USE PLANNING COMMISSION Z236
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $212,856 $228,793
Page 37 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $7,000 $7,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $219,856 $235,793
Milk Commission 0188
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($12,103,242) ($904,069)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($12,103,242) ($904,069)
MILK COMMISSION 0188
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($12,103,242) ($904,069)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($12,103,242) ($904,069)
Off-Road Recreational Vehicles Program Z224
Initiative: Provides funding to construct new and renovate existing recreational boating
facilities.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
Off-Road Recreational Vehicles Program Z224
Initiative: Provides funding to replace one tractor, 2 all-terrain vehicles and 2 snowmobiles
in the Off-Road Recreational Vehicles Program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $120,000 $50,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $120,000 $50,000
Off-Road Recreational Vehicles Program Z224
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Office Assistant II position and one Recreational
Trails Coordinator position between Other Special Revenue Funds accounts within the
same program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 0.000
Personal Services $0 $0
All Other $0 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $0
Off-Road Recreational Vehicles Program Z224
Page 38 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($490,528) ($450,557)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($490,528) ($450,557)
OFF-ROAD RECREATIONAL VEHICLES PROGRAM Z224
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 0.000
Personal Services $0 $0
All Other ($490,528) ($450,557)
Capital Expenditures $620,000 $550,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $129,472 $99,443
Parks - General Operations Z221
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Historic Site Specialist position previously
established by Public Law 2021, chapter 635 and provides funding for related All Other
costs in the DACF Administration program and the Parks - General Operations program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $106,437 $114,800
All Other $3,500 $3,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $109,937 $118,300
Parks - General Operations Z221
Initiative: Provides funding for infrastructure maintenance and capital improvements.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $430,000 $430,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $430,000 $430,000
Parks - General Operations Z221
Initiative: Provides funding for capital improvements to ensure roads, bridges, dams and
buildings are safe for public recreation and staff in the Allagash Wilderness Waterway.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $400,000 $400,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $400,000 $400,000
Parks - General Operations Z221
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Marine Geologist position established by
Financial Order 03899 F5 and provides funding to address climate resilience across several
programs.
Page 39 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $175,959 $175,959
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $175,959 $175,959
Parks - General Operations Z221
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Senior Planner position established by Financial
Order AGR00-0031 through June 18, 2027 and provides funding for related All Other costs
in the DACF Administration program and the Parks - General Operations program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $106,437 $114,800
All Other $10,928 $11,420
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $117,365 $126,220
PARKS - GENERAL OPERATIONS Z221
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $212,874 $229,600
All Other $14,428 $14,920
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $227,302 $244,520
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $175,959 $175,959
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $175,959 $175,959
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $830,000 $830,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $830,000 $830,000
AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND
FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $2,598,909 $3,178,363
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $1,456,273 $1,450,626
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $1,701,604 $4,469,754
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $5,756,786 $9,098,743
Page 40 - 132LR2409(17)

Sec. A-3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ARTS COMMISSION, MAINE
Arts - Administration 0178
Initiative: Provides funding for the increased hours of one Public Service Coordinator I
position from 42 hours to 80 hours biweekly to meet the operational needs of the Maine
Arts Commission.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $54,342 $58,755
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $54,342 $58,755
ARTS - ADMINISTRATION 0178
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $54,342 $58,755
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $54,342 $58,755
Arts - General Grants Program 0177
Initiative: Reduces funding in the Maine Arts Commission's Federal Expenditures Fund
account.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($356,551) ($356,551)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($356,551) ($356,551)
ARTS - GENERAL GRANTS PROGRAM 0177
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($356,551) ($356,551)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($356,551) ($356,551)
ARTS COMMISSION, MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $54,342 $58,755
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ($356,551) ($356,551)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($302,209) ($297,796)
Sec. A-4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ATTORNEY GENERAL, DEPARTMENT OF THE
Page 41 - 132LR2409(17)

Administration - Attorney General 0310
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Assistant Attorney General position
previously established by Financial Order 003687 F5 and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $223,811 $232,909
All Other $10,500 $10,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $234,311 $243,409
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Initiative: Transfers one Research Assistant MSEA-B position from the Human Services
Division program, Other Special Revenue Funds to the Administration - Attorney General
program, General Fund and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $105,443 $113,684
All Other $15,500 $15,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $120,943 $129,184
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Initiative: Transfers 3 Research Assistant MSEA-B positions from the Human Services
Division program, Other Special Revenue Funds to the Administration - Attorney General
program, General Fund and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $310,595 $330,321
All Other $37,500 $37,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $348,095 $367,821
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Assistant Attorney General position
previously established by Public Law 2023, chapter 489 and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $134,955 $145,962
All Other $13,934 $14,194
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $148,889 $160,156
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Page 42 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Establishes one Assistant Attorney General position to support the Department
of Marine Resources and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $134,955 $145,962
All Other $13,934 $14,194
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $148,889 $160,156
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Assistant Attorney General position
previously established by financial order for the Department of Labor and provides funding
for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $134,955 $145,962
All Other $13,934 $14,194
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $148,889 $160,156
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Assistant Attorney General position
previously continued by Public Law 2021, chapter 635 and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $150,340 $161,707
All Other $14,297 $14,566
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $164,637 $176,273
ADMINISTRATION - ATTORNEY GENERAL 0310
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $639,849 $676,914
All Other $63,500 $63,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $703,349 $740,414
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $555,205 $599,593
All Other $56,099 $57,148
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $611,304 $656,741
Page 43 - 132LR2409(17)

Chief Medical Examiner - Office of 0412
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to allow for the purchase, shipping and installation of
a low-dose x-ray forensic imaging scanner.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $539,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $539,000 $0
Chief Medical Examiner - Office of 0412
Initiative: Provides funding to cover an increase in the medical examiner examination fees
from $100 to $150.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $76,000 $76,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $76,000 $76,000
Chief Medical Examiner - Office of 0412
Initiative: Provides funding pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 3024
to cover the increased mileage reimbursement rate of $0.54 per mile.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,710 $9,710
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,710 $9,710
Chief Medical Examiner - Office of 0412
Initiative: Provides funding for the increased frequency and cost of forensic toxicology
testing.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $60,000 $60,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $60,000 $60,000
Chief Medical Examiner - Office of 0412
Initiative: Establishes 2 Medical Examiner Assistant positions and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $196,482 $211,650
All Other $7,300 $7,300
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $203,782 $218,950
Chief Medical Examiner - Office of 0412
Initiative: Establishes 2 OCME Planning and Research Associate I positions and one
Medicolegal Death Investigator I position and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 44 - 132LR2409(17)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $283,673 $304,598
All Other $14,100 $14,100
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $297,773 $318,698
CHIEF MEDICAL EXAMINER - OFFICE OF 0412
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $480,155 $516,248
All Other $706,110 $167,110
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,186,265 $683,358
Human Services Division 0696
Initiative: Transfers one Research Assistant MSEA-B position from the Human Services
Division program, Other Special Revenue Funds to the Administration - Attorney General
program, General Fund and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($105,443) ($113,684)
All Other ($18,356) ($18,550)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($123,799) ($132,234)
Human Services Division 0696
Initiative: Transfers 3 Research Assistant MSEA-B positions from the Human Services
Division program, Other Special Revenue Funds to the Administration - Attorney General
program, General Fund and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (3.000) (3.000)
Personal Services ($310,595) ($330,321)
All Other ($45,719) ($46,184)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($356,314) ($376,505)
HUMAN SERVICES DIVISION 0696
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (4.000) (4.000)
Personal Services ($416,038) ($444,005)
All Other ($64,075) ($64,734)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($480,113) ($508,739)
Page 45 - 132LR2409(17)

ATTORNEY GENERAL, DEPARTMENT OF THE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $1,889,614 $1,423,772
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $131,191 $148,002
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $2,020,805 $1,571,774
Sec. A-5. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
AUDITOR, OFFICE OF THE STATE
Audit Bureau 0067
Initiative: Provides continued and additional funding for the transition in auditing
workpapers from a paper process to an electronic process.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $73,669 $80,187
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $73,669 $80,187
Audit Bureau 0067
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 2 Principal Auditor
positions to Public Service Manager II positions.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $23,150 $24,076
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $23,150 $24,076
AUDIT BUREAU 0067
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $23,150 $24,076
All Other $73,669 $80,187
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $96,819 $104,263
AUDITOR, OFFICE OF THE STATE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $96,819 $104,263
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $96,819 $104,263
Sec. A-6. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
BAXTER STATE PARK AUTHORITY
Page 46 - 132LR2409(17)

Baxter State Park Authority 0253
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for replacements, upgrades and improvements to
infrastructure throughout Baxter State Park, including its headquarters building, ranger
stations, storage facilities, rental cabins, lean-tos and other capital improvement projects.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $192,800 $177,580
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $192,800 $177,580
Baxter State Park Authority 0253
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the replacement of 4 pickup trucks.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $119,984 $134,560
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $119,984 $134,560
Baxter State Park Authority 0253
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for 4 snowmobiles.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $32,216 $32,860
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $32,216 $32,860
Baxter State Park Authority 0253
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Baxter Park Trail Crew
Leader position from range 14 to range 16 and 3 Baxter Park Trail Laborer positions from
range 12 to range 14.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $6,609 $4,709
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $6,609 $4,709
Baxter State Park Authority 0253
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 2 Baxter Park District
Ranger positions from range 24 to range 27 and 3 Baxter Park Supervisory Enforcement
Ranger positions from range 23 to range 25.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $77,125 $81,440
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $77,125 $81,440
BAXTER STATE PARK AUTHORITY 0253
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $83,734 $86,149
Capital Expenditures $345,000 $345,000
Page 47 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $428,734 $431,149
BAXTER STATE PARK AUTHORITY
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $428,734 $431,149
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $428,734 $431,149
Sec. A-7. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION, STATE
Maine Charter School Commission Z137
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocation with projected revenues.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $168,626 $229,405
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $168,626 $229,405
MAINE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION Z137
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $168,626 $229,405
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $168,626 $229,405
Sec. A-8. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE MAINE
Maine Community College System - Board of Trustees 0556
Initiative: Provides funding for scholarships due to a projected increase in dedicated
revenues from slot machine proceeds from the March 2024 Revenue Forecasting
Committee report.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $69,833 $141,411
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $69,833 $141,411
Maine Community College System - Board of Trustees 0556
Initiative: Provides one-time funding in fiscal year 2025-26 and fiscal year 2026-27 only
to the State's 7 community colleges for paid family and medical leave premiums.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $876,051 $915,865
Page 48 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $876,051 $915,865
Maine Community College System - Board of Trustees 0556
Initiative: Provides additional funding for annual inflationary cost increases associated with
continuation of current Maine Community College System operations.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,444,103 $7,025,970
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,444,103 $7,025,970
Maine Community College System - Board of Trustees 0556
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($165,802) ($151,044)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($165,802) ($151,044)
MAINE COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM - BOARD OF TRUSTEES 0556
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,320,154 $7,941,835
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,320,154 $7,941,835
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($95,969) ($9,633)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($95,969) ($9,633)
MCCS Free Community College - Two Enrollment Years Z335
Initiative: Provides one-time funding in fiscal year 2025-26 and fiscal year 2026-27 only
for the State's 7 community colleges to continue offering student scholarships through the
State's free community college tuition program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,000,000 $10,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,000,000 $10,000,000
MCCS FREE COMMUNITY COLLEGE - TWO ENROLLMENT YEARS Z335
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,000,000 $10,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,000,000 $10,000,000
Page 49 - 132LR2409(17)

COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM, BOARD OF
TRUSTEES OF THE MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $14,320,154 $17,941,835
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($95,969) ($9,633)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $14,224,185 $17,932,202
Sec. A-9. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
CORRECTIONS, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Corrections 0141
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the implementation of the department's offender
management system.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,661,559 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,661,559 $0
Administration - Corrections 0141
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding for the licensing fees associated with the department's
offender management system.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,200,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,200,000
Administration - Corrections 0141
Initiative: Provides funding to cover the cost of an Assistant Attorney General position and
related All Other costs at the Department of the Attorney General previously established
by Public Law 2023, chapter 489.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $148,889 $160,156
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $148,889 $160,156
ADMINISTRATION - CORRECTIONS 0141
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $148,889 $1,360,156
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $148,889 $1,360,156
Page 50 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,661,559 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,661,559 $0
Adult Community Corrections 0124
Initiative: Provides funding for the increased cost of electricity.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,666 $1,666
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,666 $1,666
ADULT COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS 0124
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,666 $1,666
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,666 $1,666
Bolduc Correctional Facility Z155
Initiative: Transfers all positions and related All Other costs from the Bolduc Correctional
Facility program to the State Prison program within the same fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (53.000) (53.000)
Personal Services ($6,493,241) ($6,652,829)
All Other ($458,342) ($458,342)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($6,951,583) ($7,111,171)
Bolduc Correctional Facility Z155
Initiative: Provides funding for the increased cost of electricity.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $194,114 $194,114
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $194,114 $194,114
BOLDUC CORRECTIONAL FACILITY Z155
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (53.000) (53.000)
Personal Services ($6,493,241) ($6,652,829)
All Other ($264,228) ($264,228)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($6,757,469) ($6,917,057)
Correctional Center 0162
Page 51 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Transfers funding from the Corrections Fuel program to the Long Creek Youth
Development Center program and Correctional Center program within the same fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $242,935 $242,935
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $242,935 $242,935
Correctional Center 0162
Initiative: Provides funding for the increased cost of electricity.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $53,777 $53,777
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $53,777 $53,777
CORRECTIONAL CENTER 0162
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $296,712 $296,712
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $296,712 $296,712
Corrections Fuel Z366
Initiative: Transfers funding from the Corrections Fuel program to the Long Creek Youth
Development Center program and Correctional Center program within the same fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($319,769) ($319,769)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($319,769) ($319,769)
Corrections Fuel Z366
Initiative: Provides funding for the increased costs of fuel.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $743,241 $743,241
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $743,241 $743,241
CORRECTIONS FUEL Z366
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $423,472 $423,472
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $423,472 $423,472
County Jail Operations Fund Z227
Page 52 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the county jails for medication-assisted treatment
and medical care as required by the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 34-A, section 1208-B,
subsection 4.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,000,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,000,000 $0
COUNTY JAIL OPERATIONS FUND Z227
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,000,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,000,000 $0
Downeast Correctional Facility 0542
Initiative: Provides funding for the increased cost of electricity.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,167 $4,167
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,167 $4,167
Downeast Correctional Facility 0542
Initiative: Transfers funding from the Downeast Correctional Facility program to the State
Prison program within the same fund to help the Maine State Prison close a deficit.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($50,000) ($50,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($50,000) ($50,000)
DOWNEAST CORRECTIONAL FACILITY 0542
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($45,833) ($45,833)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($45,833) ($45,833)
Juvenile Community Corrections 0892
Initiative: Provides funding for the increased cost of electricity.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $813 $813
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $813 $813
JUVENILE COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS 0892
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 53 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $813 $813
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $813 $813
Long Creek Youth Development Center 0163
Initiative: Transfers funding from the Corrections Fuel program to the Long Creek Youth
Development Center program and Correctional Center program within the same fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $76,834 $76,834
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $76,834 $76,834
Long Creek Youth Development Center 0163
Initiative: Provides funding for the increased cost of electricity.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $29,819 $29,819
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $29,819 $29,819
LONG CREEK YOUTH DEVELOPMENT CENTER 0163
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $106,653 $106,653
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $106,653 $106,653
Mountain View Correctional Facility 0857
Initiative: Provides funding for the transportation of raw sewage to a local treatment plant.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $497,125 $497,125
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $497,125 $497,125
Mountain View Correctional Facility 0857
Initiative: Provides funding for the increased cost of electricity.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $38,548 $38,548
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $38,548 $38,548
MOUNTAIN VIEW CORRECTIONAL FACILITY 0857
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $535,673 $535,673
__________ __________
Page 54 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $535,673 $535,673
State Prison 0144
Initiative: Transfers all positions and related All Other costs from the Bolduc Correctional
Facility program to the State Prison program within the same fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 53.000 53.000
Personal Services $6,493,241 $6,652,829
All Other $458,342 $458,342
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,951,583 $7,111,171
State Prison 0144
Initiative: Provides funding for the increased cost of electricity.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $77,330 $77,330
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $77,330 $77,330
State Prison 0144
Initiative: Transfers funding from the Downeast Correctional Facility program to the State
Prison program within the same fund to help the Maine State Prison close a deficit.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $50,000 $50,000
STATE PRISON 0144
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 53.000 53.000
Personal Services $6,493,241 $6,652,829
All Other $585,672 $585,672
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,078,913 $7,238,501
CORRECTIONS, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $5,789,489 $3,000,756
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $3,661,559 $0
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $9,451,048 $3,000,756
Sec. A-10. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
Page 55 - 132LR2409(17)

DEFENSE, VETERANS AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT, DEPARTMENT
OF
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Reallocates funding of leased space for the Maine Emergency Management
Agency from 100% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% General Fund and provides
additional funding to support increased costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $259,000 $259,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $259,000 $259,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($200,000) ($200,000)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($200,000) ($200,000)
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace outdated equipment in and remodel the
layout of the State Emergency Operations Center, funded 25% General Fund and 75%
Federal Expenditures Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $57,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $57,500
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $172,500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $172,500
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to support maintenance of emergency management
trailers.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $12,000 $0
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace and repair deployable emergency
management generators.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $0
__________ __________
Page 56 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $0
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace the state vehicle used to transport
emergency management materiel throughout the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $92,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $92,000 $0
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Contract/Grant Manager position funded 50%
General Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $59,373 $64,020
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $59,373 $64,020
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($59,373) ($64,020)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($59,373) ($64,020)
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Contract/Grant Manager position
funded 70% Federal Expenditures Fund and 30% General Fund to 100% General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $96,077 $100,476
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $96,077 $100,476
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($96,077) ($100,476)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($96,077) ($100,476)
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Secretary Associate position funded 44% General
Fund and 56% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $48,370 $50,893
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $48,370 $50,893
Page 57 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($48,370) ($50,893)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($48,370) ($50,893)
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the costs of one Contract/Grant Specialist position and
one Emergency Response Training Coordinator position funded 100% Federal
Expenditures Fund to 100% General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $221,661 $234,047
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $221,661 $234,047
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (2.000) (2.000)
Personal Services ($221,661) ($234,047)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($221,661) ($234,047)
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Public Service Manager II position
funded 75% Federal Expenditures Fund and 25% General Fund to 100% General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $113,224 $120,217
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $113,224 $120,217
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($113,224) ($120,217)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($113,224) ($120,217)
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Public Service Manager II position
funded 100% Federal Expenditures Fund to 60% General Fund and 40% Federal
Expenditures Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $103,085 $107,276
__________ __________
Page 58 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $103,085 $107,276
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($103,085) ($107,276)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($103,085) ($107,276)
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Public Service Manager II position
funded 100% Federal Expenditures Fund to 63% General Fund and 37% Federal
Expenditures Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $103,011 $107,518
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $103,011 $107,518
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($103,011) ($107,518)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($103,011) ($107,518)
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates between the Administration - Maine Emergency
Management Agency program and the Emergency Response Operations program the cost
of one Public Service Manager II position funded 50% Other Special Revenue Funds and
50% Federal Expenditures Fund to 50% General Fund and 50% Other Special Revenue
Funds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $73,950 $79,681
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $73,950 $79,681
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($73,943) ($79,677)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($73,943) ($79,677)
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Emergency Response Training
Coordinator position funded 75% Federal Expenditures Fund and 25% General Fund to
50% General Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund.
Page 59 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $30,239 $32,073
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $30,239 $32,073
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($30,239) ($32,073)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($30,239) ($32,073)
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Emergency Response Training Coordinator position
funded 37.5% General Fund and 62.5% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $66,784 $71,968
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $66,784 $71,968
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($66,784) ($71,968)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($66,784) ($71,968)
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Continues one Contract/Grant Specialist position previously established by
Financial Order 003288 F4 to function as a hazard mitigation grant administrator in support
of hazard mitigation assistance grants for natural hazards and disasters. The position ends
June 19, 2027.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $99,312 $103,555
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $99,312 $103,555
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent 2 Contract/Grant Specialist positions
previously established by Financial Order 003288 F4 to function as recovery program
officers in support of the public assistance program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $201,707 $217,028
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $201,707 $217,028
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Page 60 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Establishes 2 Contract/Grant Specialist positions and provides funding for
related All Other costs to function as recovery program officers within the public assistance
program.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $192,550 $207,110
All Other $10,000 $10,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $202,550 $217,110
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Establishes one Contract/Grant Specialist position and provides funding for
related All Other costs to function as a hazard mitigation grant administrator in support of
hazard mitigation assistance grants for natural hazards and disasters.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $96,275 $103,555
All Other $5,000 $5,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $101,275 $108,555
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one State Dam Inspector
position from range 31 to range 33.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $17,049 $17,519
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $17,049 $17,519
ADMINISTRATION - MAINE EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY 0214
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.000 10.000
Personal Services $1,134,530 $1,202,716
All Other $463,000 $316,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,597,530 $1,519,216
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (4.000) (4.000)
Personal Services ($527,630) ($553,945)
All Other ($185,000) ($12,500)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($712,630) ($566,445)
Emergency Response Operations 0918
Page 61 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Transfers and reallocates between the Administration - Maine Emergency
Management Agency program and the Emergency Response Operations program the cost
of one Public Service Manager II position funded 50% Other Special Revenue Funds and
50% Federal Expenditures Fund to 50% General Fund and 50% Other Special Revenue
Funds.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($7) ($4)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($7) ($4)
EMERGENCY RESPONSE OPERATIONS 0918
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($7) ($4)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($7) ($4)
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the design and construction of sustainment,
restoration and modernization projects for a Maine National Guard readiness center located
in Bangor.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,926,700 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,926,700 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,780,000 $0
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $5,780,000 $0
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Director of Building Control Operations
from 73% Federal Expenditures Fund and 27% General Fund to 100% Federal
Expenditures Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($38,418) ($41,187)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($38,418) ($41,187)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Page 62 - 132LR2409(17)

Personal Services $38,418 $41,187
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $38,418 $41,187
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Groundskeeper II
position to a Heavy Vehicle and Equipment Technician position.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $18,986 $19,706
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $18,986 $19,706
MILITARY TRAINING AND OPERATIONS 0108
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($38,418) ($41,187)
All Other $1,926,700 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,888,282 ($41,187)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $57,404 $60,893
All Other $5,780,000 $0
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $5,837,404 $60,893
Stream Gaging Cooperative Program 0858
Initiative: Provides funding for the operation and maintenance of 5 additional stream gages
to ensure public safety given the increase in frequency and intensity of flood events.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $83,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $83,500
Stream Gaging Cooperative Program 0858
Initiative: Provides funding for the increased cost for the operation and maintenance of
existing stream gages.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $30,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $30,000
STREAM GAGING COOPERATIVE PROGRAM 0858
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 63 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $113,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $113,500
Veterans Services 0110
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $19,161 $18,895
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $19,161 $18,895
VETERANS SERVICES 0110
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $19,161 $18,895
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $19,161 $18,895
DEFENSE, VETERANS AND EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $3,485,812 $1,591,529
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $5,124,774 ($505,552)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $19,154 $18,891
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $8,629,740 $1,104,868
Sec. A-11. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Economic and Community Development 0069
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Public Executive I position, previously established
by Public Law 2023, chapter 412, through June 19, 2027 and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $146,692 $158,069
All Other $6,089 $6,563
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $152,781 $164,632
ADMINISTRATION - ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT 0069
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 64 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $146,692 $158,069
All Other $6,089 $6,563
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $152,781 $164,632
Business Development 0585
Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Coordinator II position and provides funding for
related All Other costs to create a domestic trade program to support small businesses in
the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $135,029 $146,038
All Other $550,000 $550,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $685,029 $696,038
BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT 0585
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $135,029 $146,038
All Other $550,000 $550,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $685,029 $696,038
Community Development Block Grant Program 0587
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Public Service Coordinator I position, previously
continued by Financial Order 003630 F5, through June 19, 2027 and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $138,102 $148,679
All Other $5,729 $6,170
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $143,831 $154,849
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT PROGRAM 0587
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $138,102 $148,679
All Other $5,729 $6,170
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $143,831 $154,849
Housing Opportunity Program Z336
Page 65 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Continues and makes permanent 2 Public Service Coordinator II positions
previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 412 and previously established by
Public Law 2021, chapter 635 and reduces All Other to fund the positions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $327,236 $340,694
All Other ($327,236) ($340,694)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
HOUSING OPPORTUNITY PROGRAM Z336
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $327,236 $340,694
All Other ($327,236) ($340,694)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Office of Tourism 0577
Initiative: Continues 2 limited-period Public Service Coordinator I positions, previously
established by Public Law 2023, chapter 412, through December 19, 2026.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $155,935 $127,698
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $155,935 $127,698
Office of Tourism 0577
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $106,231 $350,159
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $106,231 $350,159
OFFICE OF TOURISM 0577
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $106,231 $350,159
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $106,231 $350,159
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $155,935 $127,698
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $155,935 $127,698
Page 66 - 132LR2409(17)

ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $685,029 $696,038
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $296,612 $319,481
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $106,231 $350,159
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $155,935 $127,698
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $1,243,807 $1,493,376
Sec. A-12. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Child Development Services 0449
Initiative: Provides funding to bring allocation in line with available resources for the so-
called Part C grant under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act for infants
and toddlers with disabilities and their families.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $231,872 $231,872
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $231,872 $231,872
CHILD DEVELOPMENT SERVICES 0449
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $231,872 $231,872
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $231,872 $231,872
Climate Education Professional Development Pilot Program Fund Z361
Initiative: Continues one limited-period State Education Representative position,
previously established by Resolve 2021, chapter 178, through June 30, 2026 and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $146,115 $12,185
All Other $3,464 $286
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $149,579 $12,471
CLIMATE EDUCATION PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT PILOT
PROGRAM FUND Z361
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $146,115 $12,185
Page 67 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $3,464 $286
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $149,579 $12,471
Early Childhood Infrastructure Z315
Initiative: Provides one-time allocation in Federal Expenditures Fund - ARP State Fiscal
Recovery accounts.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
EARLY CHILDHOOD INFRASTRUCTURE Z315
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Education in Unorganized Territory 0220
Initiative: Provides funding to change one seasonal Education Specialist III position from
48 weeks to 52 weeks annually.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT (0.923) (0.923)
Personal Services $10,569 $14,994
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,569 $14,994
Education in Unorganized Territory 0220
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for maintenance of 3 state-owned schools in the
unorganized territory.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $150,000 $150,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $150,000 $150,000
Education in Unorganized Territory 0220
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for maintenance of a fleet of school buses in the
unorganized territory.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $30,000 $30,000
__________ __________
Page 68 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $30,000 $30,000
EDUCATION IN UNORGANIZED TERRITORY 0220
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT (0.923) (0.923)
Personal Services $10,569 $14,994
All Other $180,000 $180,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $190,569 $194,994
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Public Service Manager II position
previously established by Public Law 2023, chapter 412 and reduces All Other to fund the
position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $180,164
All Other $0 ($180,164)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Coordinator I position and reduces All Other to
fund the position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $126,737 $137,217
All Other ($126,737) ($137,217)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Education Specialist III position previously
established by Financial Order 003854 F5 and reduces All Other to fund the position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $111,129 $120,191
All Other ($111,129) ($120,191)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Adjusts funding to bring allocations in line with projected available resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $625,499 $1,266,635
Page 69 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $625,499 $1,266,635
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,429,535) ($1,380,256)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($1,429,535) ($1,380,256)
GENERAL PURPOSE AID FOR LOCAL SCHOOLS 0308
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $237,866 $437,572
All Other ($237,866) ($437,572)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($804,036) ($113,621)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($804,036) ($113,621)
Higher Education and Educator Support Services Z082
Initiative: Adjusts funding between the General Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds
within the same program to pay annual dues to the New England Board of Higher
Education.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($142,280) ($142,280)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($142,280) ($142,280)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $151,410 $151,410
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $151,410 $151,410
HIGHER EDUCATION AND EDUCATOR SUPPORT SERVICES Z082
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($142,280) ($142,280)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($142,280) ($142,280)
Page 70 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $151,410 $151,410
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $151,410 $151,410
Innovative Teaching and Learning Z394
Initiative: Transfers one Interdisciplinary Instruction Specialist position from the School
Facilities program, Other Special Revenue Funds to the Innovative Teaching and Learning
program, General Fund and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $119,238 $123,914
All Other $9,328 $9,328
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $128,566 $133,242
Innovative Teaching and Learning Z394
Initiative: Provides Federal Expenditures Fund allocation for the Innovative Teaching and
Learning program.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
Innovative Teaching and Learning Z394
Initiative: Provides Other Special Revenue Funds allocation for the Innovative Teaching
and Learning program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
INNOVATIVE TEACHING AND LEARNING Z394
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $119,238 $123,914
All Other $9,328 $9,328
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $128,566 $133,242
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
Page 71 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Leadership Team Z077
Initiative: Eliminates one part-time Office Associate II position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (0.500) (0.500)
Personal Services ($40,027) ($43,699)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($40,027) ($43,699)
Leadership Team Z077
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Public Service Coordinator I position
and related All Other costs from the School Finance and Operations program to the
Leadership Team program within the same fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $142,267 $148,080
All Other $9,328 $9,328
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $151,595 $157,408
Leadership Team Z077
Initiative: Transfers one Public Service Executive II position and related All Other costs
from the Leadership Team program to the Office of Innovation program within the same
fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($196,483) ($204,498)
All Other ($9,328) ($9,328)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($205,811) ($213,826)
LEADERSHIP TEAM Z077
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (0.500) (0.500)
Personal Services ($94,243) ($100,117)
All Other $0 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($94,243) ($100,117)
Learning Systems Team Z081
Page 72 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Reduces funding to align allocations with projected resources as grant funding
is no longer available.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($519,860) ($519,860)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($519,860) ($519,860)
Learning Systems Team Z081
Initiative: Provides funding to bring allocation in line with available resources for the Head
Start Collaboration Office grant.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,291 $1,763
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $6,291 $1,763
Learning Systems Team Z081
Initiative: Provides funding to bring allocation in line with available resources for the 21st
Century Community Learning Centers Program grant.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $569,635 $566,941
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $569,635 $566,941
Learning Systems Team Z081
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Management Analyst II position from 100% Federal
Expenditures Fund to 90% Federal Expenditures Fund and 10% General Fund within the
same program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,966 $11,412
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,966 $11,412
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($10,966) ($11,412)
All Other $10,966 $11,412
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Learning Systems Team Z081
Initiative: Continues one limited-period State Education Representative position, one
limited-period Education Specialist III position and 2 limited-period Education Specialist
II positions previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 643 through December 31,
2026 and reduces All Other funding to fund the positions.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $210,393 $307,861
All Other ($210,393) ($307,861)
Page 73 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Learning Systems Team Z081
Initiative: Provides one-time allocation in Federal Expenditures Fund - ARP State Fiscal
Recovery accounts.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $2,000 $2,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $2,000 $2,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Learning Systems Team Z081
Initiative: Reduces funding to align allocation with available resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($3,000,969) ($2,710,451)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($3,000,969) ($2,710,451)
Learning Systems Team Z081
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Office Associate II
position to an Office Specialist II position.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,463 $6,201
All Other ($10,463) ($6,201)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Learning Systems Team Z081
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of 4 Education Specialist III
positions to State Education Representative positions retroactive to June 13, 2024 and
reduces All Other to fund the reclassifications.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $59,793 $35,436
All Other ($59,793) ($35,436)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
LEARNING SYSTEMS TEAM Z081
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,966 $11,412
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,966 $11,412
Page 74 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $269,683 $338,086
All Other ($3,214,586) ($2,999,693)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($2,944,903) ($2,661,607)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $2,000 $2,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $2,000 $2,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Maine Climate Corps Prog - ME Commission for Comm Svc Z350
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Senior Planner position previously established by
financial order and reduces All Other to partially fund the position. This position ends on
June 19, 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $105,595 $113,841
All Other ($71,982) ($71,982)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $33,613 $41,859
MAINE CLIMATE CORPS PROG - ME COMMISSION FOR COMM SVC Z350
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $105,595 $113,841
All Other ($71,982) ($71,982)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $33,613 $41,859
Maine Commission for Community Service Z134
Initiative: Reduces funding to align allocations with projected resources as grant funding
is no longer available.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($2,864) ($2,864)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL ($2,864) ($2,864)
MAINE COMMISSION FOR COMMUNITY SERVICE Z134
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($2,864) ($2,864)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL ($2,864) ($2,864)
Maine School Safety Center Z293
Page 75 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Transfers one Public Service Coordinator II position from the Federal
Expenditures Fund to the General Fund within the same program and reduces All Other to
fund the position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $161,385 $168,015
All Other ($161,385) ($168,015)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($161,385) ($168,015)
All Other ($3,461) ($3,461)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($164,846) ($171,476)
Maine School Safety Center Z293
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Public Service Coordinator I position
previously established by Financial Order 003773 F5, and provides funding for related All
Other costs, and eliminates one State Education Representative position, and reduces
related All Other costs, in the Maine School Safety Center program and the School and
Student Supports program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $117,056 $126,304
All Other $9,328 $9,328
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $126,384 $135,632
Maine School Safety Center Z293
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Public Service Coordinator II position
previously established by Public Law 2023, chapter 643 and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $131,682 $146,119
All Other $9,878 $9,328
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $141,560 $155,447
MAINE SCHOOL SAFETY CENTER Z293
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $410,123 $440,438
Page 76 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other ($142,179) ($149,359)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $267,944 $291,079
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($161,385) ($168,015)
All Other ($3,461) ($3,461)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($164,846) ($171,476)
Maine Service Fellows Program Z311
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Volunteer Services Coordinator position,
previously established by Financial Order 003931 F5, through September 30, 2029 and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $98,611 $106,558
All Other $12,433 $12,072
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $111,044 $118,630
MAINE SERVICE FELLOWS PROGRAM Z311
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $98,611 $106,558
All Other $12,433 $12,072
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $111,044 $118,630
Office of Innovation Z333
Initiative: Transfers one Public Service Executive II position and related All Other costs
from the Leadership Team program to the Office of Innovation program within the same
fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $196,483 $204,498
All Other $9,328 $9,328
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $205,811 $213,826
OFFICE OF INNOVATION Z333
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $196,483 $204,498
All Other $9,328 $9,328
Page 77 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $205,811 $213,826
Office of Workforce Development and Innovative Pathways Z334
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Public Service Manager I position and one limited-
period Management Analyst II position previously established by Public Law 2023, chapter
412 through June 30, 2027 and reduces All Other to fund the positions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $228,711 $247,044
All Other ($228,711) ($247,044)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Office of Workforce Development and Innovative Pathways Z334
Initiative: Reduces funding for debt service costs associated with the bonding authority
granted in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 30-A, section 5953-G, for career and technical
education centers and regions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,307,572) ($1,311,185)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($1,307,572) ($1,311,185)
Office of Workforce Development and Innovative Pathways Z334
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Office Associate II
position to an Office Specialist II position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $5,510 $8,769
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,510 $8,769
OFFICE OF WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND INNOVATIVE PATHWAYS
Z334
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $234,221 $255,813
All Other ($1,536,283) ($1,558,229)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($1,302,062) ($1,302,416)
Preschool Special Education Z399
Initiative: Provides funding pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, section
7304 to continue support of special education and related services for preschool-aged
children 3 to 5 years of age.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,000,000
Page 78 - 132LR2409(17)

PRESCHOOL SPECIAL EDUCATION Z399
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,000,000
School and Student Supports Z270
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Public Service Coordinator I position
previously established by Financial Order 003773 F5, and provides funding for related All
Other costs, and eliminates one State Education Representative position, and reduces
related All Other costs, in the Maine School Safety Center program and the School and
Student Supports program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($119,600) ($124,279)
All Other ($8,860) ($8,860)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($128,460) ($133,139)
School and Student Supports Z270
Initiative: Provides funding to bring allocation in line with available resources for the
federal McKinney-Vento Education for Homeless Children and Youth program grant.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $35,549 $28,116
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $35,549 $28,116
School and Student Supports Z270
Initiative: Reduces funding for a 2-year pilot program to help students avoid homelessness
that ended on June 30, 2024.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,500,000) ($1,500,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($1,500,000) ($1,500,000)
SCHOOL AND STUDENT SUPPORTS Z270
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($119,600) ($124,279)
All Other ($1,508,860) ($1,508,860)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($1,628,460) ($1,633,139)
Page 79 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $35,549 $28,116
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $35,549 $28,116
School Facilities Z271
Initiative: Transfers one Interdisciplinary Instruction Specialist position from the School
Facilities program, Other Special Revenue Funds to the Innovative Teaching and Learning
program, General Fund and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($119,238) ($123,914)
All Other ($11,901) ($12,013)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($131,139) ($135,927)
School Facilities Z271
Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Coordinator II position and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $135,107 $146,119
All Other $13,312 $13,011
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $148,419 $159,130
SCHOOL FACILITIES Z271
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 0.000
Personal Services $15,869 $22,205
All Other $1,411 $998
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $17,280 $23,203
School Finance and Operations Z078
Initiative: Provides funding pursuant to Public Law 2021, chapter 398, Part OOOO to pay
the difference between the federal reimbursement for a free breakfast or lunch and the full
price of a breakfast or lunch for each student in a public school and for publicly funded
students who attend an eligible private school that participates in the National School
Lunch Program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,800,387 $4,101,781
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,800,387 $4,101,781
School Finance and Operations Z078
Page 80 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Public Service Coordinator I position
and related All Other costs from the School Finance and Operations program to the
Leadership Team program within the same fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($142,267) ($148,080)
All Other ($9,328) ($9,328)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($151,595) ($157,408)
SCHOOL FINANCE AND OPERATIONS Z078
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($142,267) ($148,080)
All Other $1,791,059 $4,092,453
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,648,792 $3,944,373
Special Services Team Z080
Initiative: Provides funding to bring allocation in line with available resources for the so-
called Part B grant under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,890,159 $5,732,497
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $5,890,159 $5,732,497
Special Services Team Z080
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 3 Education Specialist II
positions to Education Specialist III positions and reduces All Other to fund the
reorganizations.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $27,385 $28,445
All Other ($27,385) ($28,445)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
SPECIAL SERVICES TEAM Z080
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $27,385 $28,445
All Other $5,862,774 $5,704,052
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $5,890,159 $5,732,497
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Page 81 - 132LR2409(17)

DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND ($680,784) $2,652,833
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $3,159,375 $3,278,532
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($485,267) $73,963
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $2,500 $2,500
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP ($2,864) ($2,864)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $1,992,960 $6,004,964
Sec. A-13. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, DEPARTMENT OF
Air Quality 0250
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for optical gas imaging camera certification training
for department staff.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,000 $0
Air Quality 0250
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for an optical gas imaging camera.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $117,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $117,000 $0
AIR QUALITY 0250
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,000 $0
Capital Expenditures $117,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $126,000 $0
Land Resources Z188
Initiative: Transfers one Environmental Licensing Specialist II position and related All
Other costs from the Land Resources program, Federal Expenditures Fund to the Maine
Environmental Protection Fund program, Other Special Revenue Funds.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($103,675) ($111,657)
All Other ($5,539) ($5,810)
__________ __________
Page 82 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($109,214) ($117,467)
LAND RESOURCES Z188
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($103,675) ($111,657)
All Other ($5,539) ($5,810)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($109,214) ($117,467)
Maine Environmental Protection Fund 0421
Initiative: Provides funding for salmon habitat monitoring costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000 $5,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,000 $5,000
Maine Environmental Protection Fund 0421
Initiative: Establishes 2 Environmental Specialist III positions to assist the public and
regulated entities in navigating and accessing licensing services and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $196,592 $211,750
All Other $10,713 $11,228
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $207,305 $222,978
Maine Environmental Protection Fund 0421
Initiative: Continues 3 limited-period Environmental Specialist III positions, previously
established by Public Law 2023, chapter 482, through June 19, 2027 and provides funding
for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $326,917 $0
All Other $5,850 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $332,767 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $347,346
All Other $0 $5,850
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $353,196
Maine Environmental Protection Fund 0421
Page 83 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Establishes 2 Environmental Licensing Specialist I positions and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $189,836 $204,308
All Other $10,483 $10,975
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $200,319 $215,283
Maine Environmental Protection Fund 0421
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Environmental Specialist III position
previously established by Public Law 2023, chapter 412 and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $98,296 $105,875
All Other $5,356 $5,614
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $103,652 $111,489
Maine Environmental Protection Fund 0421
Initiative: Establishes one Environmental Specialist III position and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $98,296 $105,875
All Other $5,356 $5,614
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $103,652 $111,489
Maine Environmental Protection Fund 0421
Initiative: Transfers one Environmental Licensing Specialist II position and related All
Other costs from the Land Resources program, Federal Expenditures Fund to the Maine
Environmental Protection Fund program, Other Special Revenue Funds.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $103,675 $111,657
All Other $5,539 $5,810
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $109,214 $117,467
Maine Environmental Protection Fund 0421
Initiative: Provides funding for the Cost and Carbon Efficient Technology Fund pursuant
to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 38, section 3108-A, subsection 2, paragraph B,
subparagraph (5).
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 84 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $499,500 $499,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $499,500 $499,500
Maine Environmental Protection Fund 0421
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Environmental
Engineer position to an Environmental Engineer Specialist position retroactive to June
2024.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $20,301 $9,911
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,301 $9,911
MAINE ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION FUND 0421
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $347,218 $9,911
All Other $5,850 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $353,068 $9,911
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services $686,695 $1,086,811
All Other $541,947 $549,591
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,228,642 $1,636,402
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Establishes one Environmental Specialist III position and one Environmental
Specialist IV position and provides funding for related All Other costs to support the
implementation of the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 38, section 1614.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $211,874 $228,525
All Other $3,900 $3,900
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $215,774 $232,425
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for 2 gas detection and identification units for rapid
chemical identification.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $50,000 $50,000
Page 85 - 132LR2409(17)

Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for 2 truck cabs and frames and 2 custom truck
bodies.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $140,000 $80,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $140,000 $80,000
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for 8 truck cabs and frames and 8 custom truck
bodies.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $140,000 $420,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $140,000 $420,000
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for 8 custom truck bodies.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $80,000 $240,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $80,000 $240,000
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for a forklift.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 $40,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $40,000
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the replacement of a skimmer boat to collect and
remove petroleum from the water.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 $600,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $600,000
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for 2 2,000-foot lay-flat booms and 2 boom reels.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $230,000 $230,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $230,000 $230,000
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Page 86 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Provides one-time funding for 2 2,000-foot non-lay-flat booms.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 $6,400
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $6,400
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for 2 small disk oil skimmers.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $30,000 $30,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $30,000 $30,000
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for one hazardous material operations and
decontamination trailer.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $50,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $50,000 $0
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for one outboard motor.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 $10,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $10,000
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for 2 photoionization detectors.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $9,000 $9,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,000 $9,000
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for 2 10-foot-by-6-foot aluminum frame mobile
pump-and-treat trailers.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $17,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $17,000 $0
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for one multiparameter meter with a flow cell.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 87 - 132LR2409(17)

Capital Expenditures $10,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $10,000 $0
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Planning and Research
Assistant position to a Chemist II position and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $33,094 $36,241
All Other $1,125 $1,231
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $34,219 $37,472
REMEDIATION AND WASTE MANAGEMENT 0247
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $211,874 $228,525
All Other $3,900 $3,900
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $215,774 $232,425
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $33,094 $36,241
All Other $1,125 $1,231
Capital Expenditures $756,000 $1,715,400
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $790,219 $1,752,872
Water Quality 0248
Initiative: Provides funding for aerial imagery acquisition and processing and for annual
maintenance and replacement of equipment for the marine vegetation mapping program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $14,000 $14,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $14,000 $14,000
Water Quality 0248
Initiative: Provides funding to increase the hours of one Environmental Specialist II
position from 78 hours to 80 hours biweekly.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $2,294 $1,403
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,294 $1,403
WATER QUALITY 0248
Page 88 - 132LR2409(17)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $2,294 $1,403
All Other $14,000 $14,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $16,294 $15,403
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $711,136 $257,739
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ($109,214) ($117,467)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $2,018,861 $3,389,274
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $2,620,783 $3,529,546
Sec. A-14. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ETHICS AND ELECTION PRACTICES, COMMISSION ON GOVERNMENTAL
Governmental Ethics and Election Practices - Commission on 0414
Initiative: Establishes one limited-period Planning and Research Assistant position from
January 1, 2026 to December 31, 2026 for administering 2026 election responsibilities.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $44,732 $46,641
All Other $6,069 $6,069
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $50,801 $52,710
Governmental Ethics and Election Practices - Commission on 0414
Initiative: Provides funding to administer Maine Clean Election Act payments to legislative
and gubernatorial candidates in 2026.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,760,693 $1,285,243
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,760,693 $1,285,243
GOVERNMENTAL ETHICS AND ELECTION PRACTICES - COMMISSION
ON 0414
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $44,732 $46,641
All Other $4,766,762 $1,291,312
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,811,494 $1,337,953
Page 89 - 132LR2409(17)

ETHICS AND ELECTION PRACTICES,
COMMISSION ON GOVERNMENTAL
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $4,811,494 $1,337,953
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $4,811,494 $1,337,953
Sec. A-15. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
Blaine House 0072
Initiative: Provides funding for the operational needs of the Blaine House.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $30,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $30,000
BLAINE HOUSE 0072
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $30,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $30,000
Governor's Energy Office Z122
Initiative: Continues one Public Service Coordinator II position, established by Financial
Order 003775 F5, through September 8, 2026 to provide programmatic leadership and
administration for the activities undertaken by the Governor's Energy Office and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $149,092 $29,856
All Other $15,118 $3,322
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $164,210 $33,178
Governor's Energy Office Z122
Initiative: Provides funding for an increase in federal grant awards issued to the Governor's
Energy Office.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,028,590 $12,028,590
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $12,028,590 $12,028,590
Governor's Energy Office Z122
Page 90 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one limited-period Public Service Coordinator
II position previously continued by Financial Order 003730 F5, one limited-period Public
Service Coordinator II position previously continued by Financial Order 003631 F5 and
one limited-period Public Service Coordinator II position established by Financial Order
003632 F5 and provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $434,773 $470,139
All Other $15,995 $16,336
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $450,768 $486,475
Governor's Energy Office Z122
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one limited-period Public Service Coordinator
II position previously continued by Financial Order 003601 F5 and one limited-period
Public Service Coordinator II position established by Financial Order 003712 F5, transfers
these positions from the Governor's Energy Office, Other Special Revenue Funds account
to the Governor's Energy Office, Federal Expenditures Fund account within the same
program and provides funding for related All Other costs. These positions are responsible
for supporting the goals and objectives contained within the various federally funded grant
awards.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $285,681 $308,620
All Other $11,012 $11,228
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $296,693 $319,848
Governor's Energy Office Z122
Initiative: Provides funding to allocate supplemental federal funds received through various
grants from the United States Department of Labor, the United States Department of
Energy and the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $750,000 $750,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $750,000 $750,000
Governor's Energy Office Z122
Initiative: Provides funding to sustain and implement the offshore wind program to meet
climate, clean energy and economic goals for the State, as well as advance regional
collaboration opportunities.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000 $250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $250,000 $250,000
Governor's Energy Office Z122
Page 91 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Provides funding to sustain energy planning efforts and design and
implementation of energy procurements in coordination with the Public Utilities
Commission and advance regional collaboration to meet the State's energy and economic
goals.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
GOVERNOR'S ENERGY OFFICE Z122
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,500,000 $1,500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,500,000 $1,500,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $869,546 $808,615
All Other $12,070,715 $12,059,476
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $12,940,261 $12,868,091
Office of Policy Innovation and the Future Z135
Initiative: Provides allocation to align with projected resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $317,490 $317,490
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $317,490 $317,490
Office of Policy Innovation and the Future Z135
Initiative: Establishes All Other baseline funding for federal grant award expenditures.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,106,377 $7,106,377
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $7,106,377 $7,106,377
Office of Policy Innovation and the Future Z135
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Public Service Coordinator I position, previously
continued by Financial Order 003600 F5, through June 19, 2027 to conduct youth
engagement and outreach on issues related to climate change and supporting public
education efforts related to state and local actions and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $142,137 $152,618
All Other $13,937 $14,598
Page 92 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $156,074 $167,216
Office of Policy Innovation and the Future Z135
Initiative: Continues 2 limited-period Public Service Coordinator II positions and one
limited-period Public Service Manager III position, previously continued by Financial
Order CV0725 F5, through December 31, 2026 and provides funding for related All Other
costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
Personal Services $553,911 $164,416
All Other $47,078 $16,873
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $600,989 $181,289
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Office of Policy Innovation and the Future Z135
Initiative: Continues 2 limited-period Public Service Coordinator II positions, previously
continued by Financial Order 003665 F5, through June 19, 2027 to support the federal
Building Resilient Infrastructure and Communities program grant and the federal Energy
Efficiency and Conservation Block Grant and provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $316,600 $340,151
All Other $31,284 $32,406
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $347,884 $372,557
Office of Policy Innovation and the Future Z135
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Public Service Manager I position, previously
continued by Financial Order 003617 F5, through June 19, 2027 to oversee the integration
of data from early childhood programs and planning, organizing and managing the
implementation of a statewide early childhood integrated data system and provides funding
for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $151,818 $163,050
All Other $14,545 $15,190
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $166,363 $178,240
Office of Policy Innovation and the Future Z135
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Public Service Coordinator II position, previously
continued by Financial Order 003633 F5, through June 19, 2027 to provide budgeting,
reporting and contracting services to support federal grant activities and provides funding
for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $171,020 $178,065
All Other $15,043 $15,727
Page 93 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $186,063 $193,792
Office of Policy Innovation and the Future Z135
Initiative: Continues 2 limited-period Public Service Coordinator II positions, previously
continued by Financial Order 003634 F5, through June 19, 2027 to develop policy and
provide executive branch expertise on issues related to natural resources, climate changes
and waste management and provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $326,279 $350,586
All Other $29,776 $31,174
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $356,055 $381,760
OFFICE OF POLICY INNOVATION AND THE FUTURE Z135
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $965,717 $1,031,852
All Other $7,197,025 $7,200,874
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $8,162,742 $8,232,726
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $142,137 $152,618
All Other $331,427 $332,088
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $473,564 $484,706
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
Personal Services $553,911 $164,416
All Other $47,078 $16,873
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $600,989 $181,289
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Public Advocate 0410
Initiative: Provides funding for an increase in consulting services.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $221,470 $221,470
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $221,470 $221,470
PUBLIC ADVOCATE 0410
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 94 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $221,470 $221,470
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $221,470 $221,470
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $1,500,000 $1,530,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $21,103,003 $21,100,817
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $695,034 $706,176
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $600,989 $181,289
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $23,899,026 $23,518,282
Sec. A-16. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
FINANCE AUTHORITY OF MAINE
Dairy Improvement Fund Z143
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($16,925) ($3,477)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($16,925) ($3,477)
DAIRY IMPROVEMENT FUND Z143
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($16,925) ($3,477)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($16,925) ($3,477)
Sec. A-17. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Additional Support for People in Retraining and Employment 0146
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 375 Eligibility Specialist
positions in the Department of Health and Human Services from range 19 to range 21 and
provides funding to increase the hours of one Eligibility Specialist position from 57 to 80
hours biweekly. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $72,057 $72,419
Page 95 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $1,672 $1,680
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $73,729 $74,099
ADDITIONAL SUPPORT FOR PEOPLE IN RETRAINING AND
EMPLOYMENT 0146
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $72,057 $72,419
All Other $1,672 $1,680
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $73,729 $74,099
Bridging Rental Assistance Program Z205
Initiative: Provides additional funding for the Bridging Rental Assistance Program to meet
increased housing needs of vulnerable persons in the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $480,000 $480,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $480,000 $480,000
BRIDGING RENTAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM Z205
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $480,000 $480,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $480,000 $480,000
Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Social Services Program Specialist II position,
previously continued by Financial Order 003671 F5, through June 12, 2027 to serve as the
child care data system coordinator and provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $134,634 $136,036
All Other $14,921 $14,996
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $149,555 $151,032
Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Developmental Disabilities Resource Coordinator
position previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 643 through June 12, 2027 to
serve as the so-called Help Me Grow Cultural Broker/Family Support Specialist and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $38,340 $120,312
All Other $2,620 $7,047
__________ __________
Page 96 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $40,960 $127,359
Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Community Care Worker position, previously
continued by Public Law 2021, chapter 635, through June 12, 2027 and provides funding
for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $92,256 $96,927
All Other $13,273 $13,512
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $105,529 $110,439
Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Management Analyst II position from 100% Child
Care Services program, General Fund to 72% General Fund and 28% Other Special
Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and Family Services - Central program and adjusts
funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($121,890) ($123,113)
All Other ($7,256) ($7,256)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($129,146) ($130,369)
Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: Continues 3 limited-period Social Services Program Specialist II positions, one
limited-period Social Services Program Manager position previously continued by Public
Law 2023, chapter 643 and one limited-period Social Services Manager I position,
previously established by Financial Order 003673 F5, through June 12, 2027 and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $295,110 $668,173
All Other $31,243 $74,331
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $326,353 $742,504
Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Financial Resource Specialist position, previously
continued by Public Law 2021, chapter 635, through June 12, 2027 and provides one-time
funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $100,391 $101,782
All Other $13,067 $13,141
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $113,458 $114,923
Child Care Services 0563
Page 97 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Reduces funding in the Child Care Services program, Federal Block Grant Fund
- ARP to align allocations with projected available resources.
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($40,919,784) ($40,919,784)
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP TOTAL ($40,919,784) ($40,919,784)
Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: Reduces funding approved in Public Law 2023, chapter 412 for the child care
employment award program, which includes child care staff in the Maine Child Care
Affordability Program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($2,500,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($2,500,000)
CHILD CARE SERVICES 0563
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($121,890) ($123,113)
All Other ($7,256) ($2,507,256)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($129,146) ($2,630,369)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $333,450 $788,485
All Other $33,863 $81,378
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $367,313 $869,863
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $327,281 $334,745
All Other $41,261 $41,649
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $368,542 $376,394
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($40,919,784) ($40,919,784)
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP TOTAL ($40,919,784) ($40,919,784)
Community Services Block Grant 0716
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Social Services Program Specialist II position
previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 17 to serve as the so-called Community
Page 98 - 132LR2409(17)

Services Block Grant State Administrator/Program Manager through June 12, 2027. This
initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $122,822 $127,980
All Other $14,281 $14,560
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $137,103 $142,540
COMMUNITY SERVICES BLOCK GRANT 0716
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $122,822 $127,980
All Other $14,281 $14,560
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $137,103 $142,540
Developmental Services - Community Z208
Initiative: Establishes 3 Developmental Disabilities Resources Coordinator positions and 4
Public Service Manager II positions funded 50% Developmental Services - Community
program, General Fund and 50% Office of MaineCare Services program, Federal
Expenditures Fund for the new federal home and community-based services lifespan
waiver. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services $419,827 $439,942
All Other $25,396 $25,396
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $445,223 $465,338
Developmental Services - Community Z208
Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Manager II position funded 100% in the Office
of Aging and Disability Services Central Office program, General Fund and one Public
Service Manager II position funded 50% in the Developmental Services - Community
program, General Fund and 50% in the Office of MaineCare Services program, Federal
Expenditures Fund for quality assurance work. This initiative also provides funding for
related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $72,263 $75,970
All Other $3,369 $3,369
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $75,632 $79,339
Developmental Services - Community Z208
Initiative: Reallocates 2 Social Services Program Specialist I positions and one Social
Services Program Manager position from 100% Developmental Services - Community
program, General Fund to 50% Developmental Services - Community program, General
Page 99 - 132LR2409(17)

Fund and 50% Office of MaineCare Services program, Federal Expenditures Fund and
adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($167,562) ($170,494)
All Other ($10,884) ($10,884)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($178,446) ($181,378)
Developmental Services - Community Z208
Initiative: Reallocates 21 positions and transfers and reallocates one Social Services
Program Specialist II position within the Office of Aging and Disability Services Central
Office program, Long Term Care - Office of Aging and Disability Services program and
Developmental Services - Community program to align the duties being performed with
the proper funding source. This initiative also adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
Position detail is on file with the Bureau of the Budget.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($786,293) ($807,547)
All Other ($38,539) ($38,539)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($824,832) ($846,086)
DEVELOPMENTAL SERVICES - COMMUNITY Z208
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services ($461,765) ($462,129)
All Other ($20,658) ($20,658)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($482,423) ($482,787)
Developmental Services Waiver - MaineCare Z211
Initiative: Provides funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations across
programs to reflect increases in costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $17,618,034
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $17,618,034
Developmental Services Waiver - MaineCare Z211
Initiative: Reduces funding for efficiencies achieved under the department's rule Chapter
101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter II, Section 21, Home and Community Based
Services for Members with Intellectual Disabilities or Autism Spectrum Disorder, by
returning to pre-COVID-19 residential assignment practices to ensure efficient use of
facilities.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 100 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other ($3,549,044) ($3,566,477)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($3,549,044) ($3,566,477)
Developmental Services Waiver - MaineCare Z211
Initiative: Provides funding for cost-of-living increases to reimbursement for services
regularly scheduled for July 1, 2025 and January 1, 2026 adjustments. Increases must be
applied as a consistent percentage that allows full expenditure of General Fund
appropriations for this purpose, leveraging available federal matching funds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,206,289 $2,412,577
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,206,289 $2,412,577
DEVELOPMENTAL SERVICES WAIVER - MAINECARE Z211
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($2,342,755) $16,464,134
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($2,342,755) $16,464,134
Developmental Services Waiver - Supports Z212
Initiative: Provides funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations across
programs to reflect increases in costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $874,749
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $874,749
Developmental Services Waiver - Supports Z212
Initiative: Provides funding for cost-of-living increases to reimbursement for services
regularly scheduled for July 1, 2025 and January 1, 2026 adjustments. Increases must be
applied as a consistent percentage that allows full expenditure of General Fund
appropriations for this purpose, leveraging available federal matching funds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $243,785 $487,569
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $243,785 $487,569
DEVELOPMENTAL SERVICES WAIVER - SUPPORTS Z212
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $243,785 $1,362,318
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $243,785 $1,362,318
Disability Determination - Division of 0208
Page 101 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Continues 5 limited-period Disability Claims Adjudicator positions, one limited-
period Disability Claims Supervisor position and one limited-period Office Associate II
position, previously established by Public Law 2023, chapter 17, through June 12, 2027
and provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $741,174 $773,156
All Other $70,395 $71,117
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $811,569 $844,273
DISABILITY DETERMINATION - DIVISION OF 0208
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $741,174 $773,156
All Other $70,395 $71,117
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $811,569 $844,273
Disproportionate Share - Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center Z225
Initiative: Establishes one Family Nurse Practitioner position funded 62.08% Other Special
Revenue Funds in the Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center program and 37.92% General Fund
in the Disproportionate Share - Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center program and transfers
General Fund All Other to Personal Services to cover the cost of the position, which was
previously contracted.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $55,987 $58,383
All Other ($55,987) ($58,383)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Disproportionate Share - Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center Z225
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Public Service Coordinator I position from 62.21%
Riverview Psychiatric Center program, Other Special Revenue Funds and 37.79%
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center program, General Fund to 31.04%
Riverview Psychiatric Center program, Other Special Revenue Funds, 18.96%
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center program, General Fund, 31.04%
Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center program, Other Special Revenue Funds and 18.96%
Disproportionate Share - Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center program, General Fund. This
initiative also adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $23,726 $24,871
All Other $1,377 $1,377
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $25,103 $26,248
DISPROPORTIONATE SHARE - DOROTHEA DIX PSYCHIATRIC CENTER
Z225
Page 102 - 132LR2409(17)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $79,713 $83,254
All Other ($54,610) ($57,006)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $25,103 $26,248
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center Z220
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Public Service Coordinator I position from 62.21%
Riverview Psychiatric Center program, Other Special Revenue Funds and 37.79%
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center program, General Fund to 31.04%
Riverview Psychiatric Center program, Other Special Revenue Funds, 18.96%
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center program, General Fund, 31.04%
Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center program, Other Special Revenue Funds and 18.96%
Disproportionate Share - Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center program, General Fund. This
initiative also adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($24,479) ($25,908)
All Other ($1,366) ($1,366)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($25,845) ($27,274)
DISPROPORTIONATE SHARE - RIVERVIEW PSYCHIATRIC CENTER Z220
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($24,479) ($25,908)
All Other ($1,366) ($1,366)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($25,845) ($27,274)
Division of Licensing and Certification Z036
Initiative: Reduces Federal Expenditures Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds allocation
across programs to align with available resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($884,177) ($884,177)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($884,177) ($884,177)
Division of Licensing and Certification Z036
Initiative: Establishes 4 Social Service Program Specialist I positions funded 66% Other
Special Revenue Funds and 34% General Fund in the Division of Licensing and
Certification program for required personal care agency and so-called waiver home surveys
and to address complaints. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $130,000 $136,028
All Other $9,868 $9,868
Page 103 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $139,868 $145,896
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $252,360 $264,048
All Other $25,500 $25,774
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $277,860 $289,822
Division of Licensing and Certification Z036
Initiative: Establishes one Social Services Program Manager position funded 66% Other
Special Revenue Funds and 34% General Fund in the Division of Licensing and
Certification program to serve as the program manager for the new team providing personal
care agency and so-called waiver home surveys. This initiative also provides funding for
related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $40,847 $42,891
All Other $2,467 $2,467
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $43,314 $45,358
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $79,291 $83,256
All Other $6,755 $6,848
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $86,046 $90,104
Division of Licensing and Certification Z036
Initiative: Reallocates the costs of 80 positions and transfers and reallocates one
Comprehensive Health Planner II position between various accounts within the Division
of Licensing and Certification program to align funding with the tasks performed by the
positions. This initiative also reallocates funding for related All Other costs. Position detail
is on file in the Bureau of the Budget.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($402,399) ($412,132)
All Other ($27,065) ($27,065)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($429,464) ($439,197)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $427,488 $440,532
Page 104 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $37,358 $37,588
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $464,846 $478,120
DIVISION OF LICENSING AND CERTIFICATION Z036
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($231,552) ($233,213)
All Other ($14,730) ($14,730)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($246,282) ($247,943)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($884,177) ($884,177)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($884,177) ($884,177)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $759,139 $787,836
All Other $69,613 $70,210
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $828,752 $858,046
Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center Z222
Initiative: Establishes one Family Nurse Practitioner position funded 62.08% Other Special
Revenue Funds in the Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center program and 37.92% General Fund
in the Disproportionate Share - Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center program and transfers
General Fund All Other to Personal Services to cover the cost of the position, which was
previously contracted.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $91,660 $95,584
All Other $6,133 $6,145
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $97,793 $101,729
Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center Z222
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Public Service Coordinator I position from 62.21%
Riverview Psychiatric Center program, Other Special Revenue Funds and 37.79%
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center program, General Fund to 31.04%
Riverview Psychiatric Center program, Other Special Revenue Funds, 18.96%
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center program, General Fund, 31.04%
Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center program, Other Special Revenue Funds and 18.96%
Page 105 - 132LR2409(17)

Disproportionate Share - Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center program, General Fund. This
initiative also adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $38,845 $40,715
All Other $2,825 $2,852
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $41,670 $43,567
Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center Z222
Initiative: Allocates ongoing funds for the prospective costs of certain employees within
the Department of Health and Human Services being allowed to participate in the 1998
Special Plan effective October 1, 2025.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $20,684 $28,131
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $20,684 $28,131
DOROTHEA DIX PSYCHIATRIC CENTER Z222
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $151,189 $164,430
All Other $8,958 $8,997
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $160,147 $173,427
Food Supplement Administration Z019
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Senior Planner position, previously continued and
reorganized by Public Law 2023, chapter 412, through June 12, 2027 and provides funding
for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $124,502 $129,767
All Other $10,251 $10,370
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $134,753 $140,137
Food Supplement Administration Z019
Initiative: Increases funding for state-funded Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
benefits within the Food Supplement Administration program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,500,000 $2,500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,500,000 $2,500,000
FOOD SUPPLEMENT ADMINISTRATION Z019
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 106 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,500,000 $2,500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,500,000 $2,500,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $124,502 $129,767
All Other $10,251 $10,370
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $134,753 $140,137
General Assistance - Reimbursement to Cities and Towns 0130
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding for state reimbursement of the costs of municipal
general assistance.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,000,000 $2,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,000,000 $2,000,000
General Assistance - Reimbursement to Cities and Towns 0130
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for state reimbursement of the costs of municipal
general assistance.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,000,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,000,000 $0
General Assistance - Reimbursement to Cities and Towns 0130
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for supplemental payments to municipalities
distributed proportionately to municipalities based on each municipality’s share of overall
state general assistance reimbursement costs in fiscal year 2023-24.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,000,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,000,000 $0
GENERAL ASSISTANCE - REIMBURSEMENT TO CITIES AND TOWNS 0130
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,000,000 $2,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,000,000 $2,000,000
Housing First Program Z374
Initiative: Provides funding in the Housing First Program, Other Special Revenue Funds
pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 20-A.
Page 107 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,695,781 $10,294,281
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,695,781 $10,294,281
Housing First Program Z374
Initiative: Adjusts funding for the Housing First Fund due to changes in the real estate
transfer tax.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,491,000 ($46,000)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,491,000 ($46,000)
HOUSING FIRST PROGRAM Z374
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $11,186,781 $10,248,281
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $11,186,781 $10,248,281
IV-E Foster Care/Adoption Assistance 0137
Initiative: Provides funding for child welfare cycle payments.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,389,123 $8,954,026
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,389,123 $8,954,026
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $13,389,493 $14,177,015
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $13,389,493 $14,177,015
IV-E Foster Care/Adoption Assistance 0137
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for system enhancements to the child welfare
information system as it relates to the needs and requirements of the psychotropic
medication settlement agreement.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $250,000 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $255,800 $0
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $255,800 $0
Page 108 - 132LR2409(17)

IV-E FOSTER CARE/ADOPTION ASSISTANCE 0137
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,639,123 $8,954,026
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,639,123 $8,954,026
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $13,645,293 $14,177,015
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $13,645,293 $14,177,015
Long Term Care - Office of Aging and Disability Services 0420
Initiative: Reallocates 21 positions and transfers and reallocates one Social Services
Program Specialist II position within the Office of Aging and Disability Services Central
Office program, Long Term Care - Office of Aging and Disability Services program and
Developmental Services - Community program to align the duties being performed with
the proper funding source. This initiative also adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
Position detail is on file with the Bureau of the Budget.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($91,294) ($92,826)
All Other ($5,053) ($5,053)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($96,347) ($97,879)
Long Term Care - Office of Aging and Disability Services 0420
Initiative: Reduces funding in the Long Term Care - Office of Aging and Disability
Services program, General Fund to align with projected expenditures.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($4,000,000) ($4,000,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($4,000,000) ($4,000,000)
Long Term Care - Office of Aging and Disability Services 0420
Initiative: Provides funding for a cost-of-living increase for state-funded home and
community-based services related to the department's rule Chapter 5, Office of Aging and
Disability Services Policy Manual, Sections 61, 63, 68 and 69 to maintain parity with
similar MaineCare programs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $300,000 $300,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $300,000 $300,000
LONG TERM CARE - OFFICE OF AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES 0420
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 109 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($91,294) ($92,826)
All Other ($3,705,053) ($3,705,053)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($3,796,347) ($3,797,879)
Low-cost Drugs To Maine's Elderly 0202
Initiative: Provides funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations across
programs to reflect increases in costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $344,872
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $344,872
LOW-COST DRUGS TO MAINE'S ELDERLY 0202
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $344,872
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $344,872
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Coordinator II position to serve as the laboratory
safety officer and provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $131,567 $137,856
All Other $7,256 $7,256
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $138,823 $145,112
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Chemist II position and one Chemist III
position, previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 17, and establishes 2 Chemist
II positions and provides funding for related All Other costs. This initiative also provides
funding for a lab instrument service contract and lab consumables.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $552,790 $558,404
All Other $74,783 $76,285
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $627,573 $634,689
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent 8 Environmental Specialist III positions
previously continued by Public Law 2021, chapter 398 in the Maine Center for Disease
Page 110 - 132LR2409(17)

Control and Prevention program, General Fund for the childhood lead poisoning prevention
program and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.000 8.000
Personal Services $848,417 $881,970
All Other $58,048 $58,048
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $906,465 $940,018
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Continues 5 limited-period Environmental Specialist III positions and one
limited-period Environmental Specialist IV position previously established by Public Law
2023, chapter 412, 2 limited-period Environmental Specialist III positions, one limited-
period Environmental Engineer position and one limited-period Assistant Environmental
Engineer position previously continued by Financial Order CV0718 F5 and one limited-
period Environmental Specialist III position previously continued by Public Law 2023,
chapter 17 through June 12, 2027 and provides one-time funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,217,871 $1,263,140
All Other $110,219 $111,291
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,328,090 $1,374,431
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Public Health Educator III position and one
Planning and Research Associate I position previously continued by Financial Order
CV0733 F5 to support oral health services provided in Maine schools and provides funding
for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $189,534 $198,024
All Other $19,280 $19,478
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $208,814 $217,502
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Health Program Manager position, previously
continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 17, through June 12, 2027 to support the work of
the office of population health equity and provides one-time funding for related All Other
costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $122,891 $128,087
All Other $7,256 $7,256
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $130,147 $135,343
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Page 111 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Continues one limited-period Comprehensive Health Planner II position,
previously continued by Financial Order CV0733 F5, through June 12, 2027 to provide
oversight and support to municipality-appointed local health officers and provides one-time
funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $131,893 $133,294
All Other $7,256 $7,256
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $139,149 $140,550
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Establishes one Chemist III position, funded 62% General Fund and 38% Other
Special Revenue Funds in the Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention program
to serve as the seized-drug testing supervisor within the Health and Environmental Testing
Laboratory and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $78,356 $82,123
All Other $4,499 $4,499
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $82,855 $86,622
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $48,025 $50,333
All Other $3,945 $3,999
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $51,970 $54,332
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Continues 2 limited-period Toxicologist positions and one limited-period
Epidemiologist position, previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 17, through
June 12, 2027 to support the State's perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances, or
PFAS, response and provides one-time funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $370,487 $382,905
All Other $30,854 $31,139
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $401,341 $414,044
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Continues 2 limited-period Comprehensive Health Planner II positions and 2
limited-period Public Health Educator III positions, previously continued by Public Law
2023, chapter 17, through June 12, 2027 and provides one-time funding for related All
Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $463,826 $480,538
Page 112 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $29,024 $29,024
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $492,850 $509,562
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Continues 8 Public Health Educator III positions, previously continued by Public
Law 2023, chapter 17, through June 12, 2027 and provides funding for related All Other
costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $851,064 $888,551
All Other $58,048 $58,048
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $909,112 $946,599
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Provides allocation to align with available resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $15,070,818 $15,070,818
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $15,070,818 $15,070,818
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Provides funding for increased fees on manufacturers or wholesalers of paint
sold in the State to replace reliance on the Fund for a Healthy Maine to support the
childhood lead poisoning prevention program. This initiative also transfers one Public
Health Nurse I position from the Fund for a Healthy Maine to the Lead Poisoning
Prevention Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account.
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($122,372)
All Other $0 ($1,117,877)
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $0 ($1,240,249)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $122,372
All Other $0 $1,117,877
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $1,240,249
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Provides one-time funding in the Maine Center for Disease Control and
Prevention program, General Fund for family planning services delivered through Family
Planning Association of Maine, Inc.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 113 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $3,000,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,000,000 $0
MAINE CENTER FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION 0143
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
Personal Services $1,049,664 $1,092,180
All Other $3,069,803 $69,803
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,119,467 $1,161,983
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $1,777,892 $1,844,069
All Other $15,231,171 $15,232,726
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $17,009,063 $17,076,795
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 (1.000)
Personal Services $0 ($122,372)
All Other $0 ($1,117,877)
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $0 ($1,240,249)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 5.000
Personal Services $600,815 $731,109
All Other $78,728 $1,198,161
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $679,543 $1,929,270
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $1,578,350 $1,640,239
All Other $101,584 $101,584
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $1,679,934 $1,741,823
Maine Health Insurance Marketplace Trust Fund Z292
Page 114 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Coordinator II position in the Maine Health
Insurance Marketplace Trust Fund program to serve as the data and reporting manager and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $135,681 $142,254
All Other $10,598 $10,752
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $146,279 $153,006
Maine Health Insurance Marketplace Trust Fund Z292
Initiative: Establishes one Senior Planner position in the Maine Health Insurance
Marketplace Trust Fund program to serve as the program specialist and provides funding
for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $106,169 $111,186
All Other $9,907 $10,025
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $116,076 $121,211
Maine Health Insurance Marketplace Trust Fund Z292
Initiative: Provides allocation to align with available resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,077,244 $4,026,623
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,077,244 $4,026,623
MAINE HEALTH INSURANCE MARKETPLACE TRUST FUND Z292
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $241,850 $253,440
All Other $4,097,749 $4,047,400
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,339,599 $4,300,840
Maternal and Child Health 0191
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Comprehensive Health Planner II position,
previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 412, through June 12, 2027 and provides
one-time funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $127,895 $133,294
All Other $10,240 $10,359
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $138,135 $143,653
Page 115 - 132LR2409(17)

Maternal and Child Health 0191
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Health Program Manager position from 100% Federal
Block Grant Fund to 50% Federal Block Grant Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund
and adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $67,374 $70,212
All Other $5,289 $5,355
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $72,663 $75,567
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($67,374) ($70,212)
All Other ($5,289) ($5,355)
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL ($72,663) ($75,567)
Maternal and Child Health 0191
Initiative: Provides allocation to align with available resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,244,468 $1,244,468
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,244,468 $1,244,468
MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH 0191
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $67,374 $70,212
All Other $1,249,757 $1,249,823
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,317,131 $1,320,035
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $60,521 $63,082
All Other $4,951 $5,004
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $65,472 $68,086
Medicaid Services - Developmental Services Z210
Initiative: Provides funding for cost-of-living increases to reimbursement for services
regularly scheduled for July 1, 2025 and January 1, 2026 adjustments. Increases must be
applied as a consistent percentage that allows full expenditure of General Fund
appropriations for this purpose, leveraging available federal matching funds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $321,461 $402,581
__________ __________
Page 116 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $321,461 $402,581
MEDICAID SERVICES - DEVELOPMENTAL SERVICES Z210
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $321,461 $402,581
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $321,461 $402,581
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides additional funding for final rates resulting from rate determination work
and updated utilization assumptions for the department's rule Chapter 101: MaineCare
Benefits Manual pursuant to Public Law 2023, chapter 412, Part A.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,560,422 $2,506,621
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,560,422 $2,506,621
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,490,518 $3,968,763
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,490,518 $3,968,763
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding to annualize the investment in the new mobile crisis rates and
services to be included in the MaineCare Benefits Manual.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $735,476 $777,054
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $735,476 $777,054
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,426,812 $2,385,352
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,426,812 $2,385,352
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $61,216 $61,098
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $61,216 $61,098
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations across
programs to reflect increases in costs and enrollment.
Page 117 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $96,840,359
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $96,840,359
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $360,655,916
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $360,655,916
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $3,215,701
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $3,215,701
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $8,299,977
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $0 $8,299,977
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding to annualize funds received in Public Law 2021, chapter 635
for psychiatric residential treatment facility services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $33,769 $1,790,712
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $33,769 $1,790,712
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,226 $1,703,510
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $4,226 $1,703,510
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,181 $384,558
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $4,181 $384,558
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Reduces funding to reflect rate changes for the department's rule Chapter 101:
MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter II, Section 43, Hospice Services, from 123% to 100%
of the Medicare rate and Section 55, Laboratory Services, from 70% of the 2009 Medicare
rates to 72.4% of current Medicare rates.
Page 118 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($213,401) ($853,604)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($213,401) ($853,604)
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Reduces funding for efficiencies achieved under the department's rule Chapter
101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter III, Section 21, Allowances for Home and
Community Based Services for Members with Intellectual Disabilities or Autism Spectrum
Disorder, by returning to pre-COVID-19 residential assignment practices to ensure
efficient use of facilities.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($57,708) ($57,991)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($57,708) ($57,991)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($5,868,823) ($5,851,107)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($5,868,823) ($5,851,107)
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Reduces funding, on a one-time basis, in the Medical Care - Payments to
Providers program, General Fund account.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($24,000,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($24,000,000)
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding to make supplemental payments to private psychiatric
hospitals. The amount of the supplemental payments will transition into reimbursement
reform for psychiatric hospitals upon implementation of reform in the next biennium.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,664,409 $1,109,606
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,664,409 $1,109,606
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,823,950 $1,828,080
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,823,950 $1,828,080
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Page 119 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Adjusts funding to reflect an increase in hospital tax collections due to raising
the tax for private psychiatric hospitals from 2.23% to 3.25%, retroactive to January 1,
2025.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,664,409) ($1,109,606)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($1,664,409) ($1,109,606)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,664,409 $1,109,606
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,664,409 $1,109,606
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding for cost-of-living increases to reimbursement for services
regularly scheduled for July 1, 2025 and January 1, 2026 adjustments. Increases must be
applied as a consistent percentage that allows full expenditure of General Fund
appropriations for this purpose, leveraging available federal matching funds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,083,505 $7,459,250
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,083,505 $7,459,250
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $16,289,051 $21,329,830
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $16,289,051 $21,329,830
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $342,366 $437,657
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $342,366 $437,657
MEDICAL CARE - PAYMENTS TO PROVIDERS 0147
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,142,063 $84,462,401
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,142,063 $84,462,401
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $18,165,734 $386,020,344
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $18,165,734 $386,020,344
Page 120 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,664,409 $4,325,307
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,664,409 $4,325,307
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $407,763 $9,183,290
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $407,763 $9,183,290
Mental Health Services - Child Medicaid Z207
Initiative: Provides funding for cost-of-living increases to reimbursement for services
regularly scheduled for July 1, 2025 and January 1, 2026 adjustments. Increases must be
applied as a consistent percentage that allows full expenditure of General Fund
appropriations for this purpose, leveraging available federal matching funds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $301,481 $301,481
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $301,481 $301,481
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES - CHILD MEDICAID Z207
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $301,481 $301,481
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $301,481 $301,481
Mental Health Services - Children Z206
Initiative: Reduces Federal Expenditures Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds allocation
across programs to align with available resources.
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($2,388,417)
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP TOTAL $0 ($2,388,417)
Mental Health Services - Children Z206
Initiative: Provides funding to continue the children's behavioral health level-of-care
assessment under Public Law 2023, chapter 412 funded 75% Office of MaineCare
Services, Federal Expenditures Fund and 25% Mental Health Services - Children, General
Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $315,666 $315,666
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $315,666 $315,666
Page 121 - 132LR2409(17)

Mental Health Services - Children Z206
Initiative: Provides funding to continue the Center of Excellence hub for youth behavioral
health service providers, as described in the department's children's behavioral health
services plan and per the recommendation of the federal Department of Justice.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,154,355 $1,539,141
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,154,355 $1,539,141
Mental Health Services - Children Z206
Initiative: Establishes one Management Analyst I position in the Mental Health Services -
Children program, General Fund to support expanded data and reporting requirements and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $92,982 $96,927
All Other $7,256 $7,256
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,238 $104,183
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES - CHILDREN Z206
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $92,982 $96,927
All Other $1,477,277 $1,862,063
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,570,259 $1,958,990
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($2,388,417)
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP TOTAL $0 ($2,388,417)
Mental Health Services - Community Z198
Initiative: Reduces Federal Expenditures Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds allocation
across programs to align with available resources.
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,872,874) ($1,872,874)
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL ($1,872,874) ($1,872,874)
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($3,138,475)
__________ __________
Page 122 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP TOTAL $0 ($3,138,475)
Mental Health Services - Community Z198
Initiative: Provides funding to annualize funds received in Public Law 2023, chapter 643
to operate 2 behavioral health crisis receiving centers open 24 hours per day, 7 days per
week, in Penobscot County and in Androscoggin County.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $900,000 $2,700,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $900,000 $2,700,000
Mental Health Services - Community Z198
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Management Analyst I position from the Office of
Behavioral Health program, Federal Expenditures Fund to the Mental Health Services -
Community program, Federal Block Grant Fund and adjusts related All Other costs.
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $80,458 $84,392
All Other $9,308 $9,400
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $89,766 $93,792
Mental Health Services - Community Z198
Initiative: Provides Federal Expenditures Fund allocation to align with available resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,934,602 $2,934,602
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,934,602 $2,934,602
Mental Health Services - Community Z198
Initiative: Provides funding to support out-of-state services for specialized mental health
treatment not provided in Maine or covered under the MaineCare program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $376,680 $376,680
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $376,680 $376,680
Mental Health Services - Community Z198
Initiative: Reduces funding approved in Public Law 2023, chapter 643 for employee
recruitment and retention incentives to staff that provide medication management services
provided by the Office of Behavioral Health that are similar to the services provided under
the department's rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter II, Section 65,
Behavioral Health Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,500,000) ($1,500,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($1,500,000) ($1,500,000)
Page 123 - 132LR2409(17)

Mental Health Services - Community Z198
Initiative: Reduces funding approved in Public Law 2023, chapter 643 establishing a crisis
receiving center in Aroostook County.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($450,000) ($450,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($450,000) ($450,000)
Mental Health Services - Community Z198
Initiative: Reduces funding approved in Public Law 2023, chapter 643 to establish 24
mental health law enforcement liaisons to support mental health crisis intervention mobile
response services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($953,300) ($953,300)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($953,300) ($953,300)
Mental Health Services - Community Z198
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service Manager
II position in the Mental Health Services - Community program and one Public Service
Manager II position in the Office of Behavioral Health program to Public Service Manager
III positions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $13,092 $19,194
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $13,092 $19,194
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES - COMMUNITY Z198
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $13,092 $19,194
All Other ($1,626,620) $173,380
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($1,613,528) $192,574
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,934,602 $2,934,602
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,934,602 $2,934,602
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $80,458 $84,392
All Other ($1,863,566) ($1,863,474)
__________ __________
Page 124 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL ($1,783,108) ($1,779,082)
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($3,138,475)
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP TOTAL $0 ($3,138,475)
Mental Health Services - Community Medicaid Z201
Initiative: Provides funding for cost-of-living increases to reimbursement for services
regularly scheduled for July 1, 2025 and January 1, 2026 adjustments. Increases must be
applied as a consistent percentage that allows full expenditure of General Fund
appropriations for this purpose, leveraging available federal matching funds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $171,425 $171,425
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $171,425 $171,425
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES - COMMUNITY MEDICAID Z201
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $171,425 $171,425
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $171,425 $171,425
Multicultural Services Z034
Initiative: Reduces Federal Expenditures Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds allocation
across programs to align with available resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,469,248) ($1,469,248)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($1,469,248) ($1,469,248)
MULTICULTURAL SERVICES Z034
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,469,248) ($1,469,248)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($1,469,248) ($1,469,248)
Nursing Facilities 0148
Initiative: Provides funding to annualize funds received in Public Law 2023, chapter 643
to support nursing facility rate reform efforts beginning January 1, 2025.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,252,000 $3,271,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,252,000 $3,271,000
Page 125 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,148,000 $6,129,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $6,148,000 $6,129,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $600,000 $600,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $600,000 $600,000
Nursing Facilities 0148
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,455,716 $1,455,716
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,455,716 $1,455,716
Nursing Facilities 0148
Initiative: Provides funding for cost-of-living increases to reimbursement for services
regularly scheduled for July 1, 2025 and January 1, 2026 adjustments. Increases must be
applied as a consistent percentage that allows full expenditure of General Fund
appropriations for this purpose, leveraging available federal matching funds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $703,037 $1,406,075
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $703,037 $1,406,075
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,712,708 $3,041,820
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,712,708 $3,041,820
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $129,712 $259,423
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $129,712 $259,423
NURSING FACILITIES 0148
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,955,037 $4,677,075
__________ __________
Page 126 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,955,037 $4,677,075
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,860,708 $9,170,820
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $7,860,708 $9,170,820
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,185,428 $2,315,139
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,185,428 $2,315,139
Office for Family Independence Z020
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Family Independence Program Manager position,
previously established by Public Law 2023, chapter 412, through June 12, 2027, funded
50% General Fund and 50% Other Special Revenue Funds, and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $62,376 $65,557
All Other $3,628 $3,628
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $66,004 $69,185
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $62,373 $65,553
All Other $5,172 $5,246
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $67,545 $70,799
Office for Family Independence Z020
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Family Independence Program Manager position,
previously established by Public Law 2023, chapter 412 and funded 50% General Fund and
50% Other Special Revenue Funds, through June 12, 2027 and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $62,376 $65,557
All Other $3,628 $3,628
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $66,004 $69,185
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $62,373 $65,553
All Other $5,172 $5,246
__________ __________
Page 127 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $67,545 $70,799
Office for Family Independence Z020
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 375 Eligibility Specialist
positions in the Department of Health and Human Services from range 19 to range 21 and
provides funding to increase the hours of one Eligibility Specialist position from 57 to 80
hours biweekly. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $75,284 $76,460
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $75,284 $76,460
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $91,471 $93,107
All Other $2,122 $2,160
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $93,593 $95,267
OFFICE FOR FAMILY INDEPENDENCE Z020
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $200,036 $207,574
All Other $7,256 $7,256
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $207,292 $214,830
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $216,217 $224,213
All Other $12,466 $12,652
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $228,683 $236,865
Office for Family Independence - District 0453
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 45 Customer Representative
Associate II - Human Services positions to Eligibility Specialist I positions and reallocates
45 Eligibility Specialist I positions and 3 Family Independence Unit Supervisor positions
from 62.1% Other Special Revenue Funds and 37.9% General Fund to 75% Other Special
Revenue Funds and 25% General Fund in the Office for Family Independence - District
program. This initiative also adjusts related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($499,063) ($521,717)
All Other ($44,929) ($44,929)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($543,992) ($566,646)
Page 128 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $683,929 $706,992
All Other $62,540 $63,018
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $746,469 $770,010
Office for Family Independence - District 0453
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent 45 limited-period Customer Representative
Associate II - Human Services positions and 3 limited-period Family Independence Unit
Supervisor positions previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 17 funded 62.1%
Other Special Revenue Funds and 37.9% General Fund in the Office for Family
Independence - District program. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other
costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,601,976 $1,668,762
All Other $132,001 $132,001
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,733,977 $1,800,763
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 48.000 48.000
Personal Services $2,625,029 $2,734,372
All Other $282,205 $284,742
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,907,234 $3,019,114
Office for Family Independence - District 0453
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 375 Eligibility Specialist
positions in the Department of Health and Human Services from range 19 to range 21 and
provides funding to increase the hours of one Eligibility Specialist position from 57 to 80
hours biweekly. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $884,896 $904,330
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $884,896 $904,330
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,461,028 $1,492,713
All Other $33,896 $34,631
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,494,924 $1,527,344
OFFICE FOR FAMILY INDEPENDENCE - DISTRICT 0453
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 129 - 132LR2409(17)

Personal Services $1,987,809 $2,051,375
All Other $87,072 $87,072
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,074,881 $2,138,447
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 48.000 48.000
Personal Services $4,769,986 $4,934,077
All Other $378,641 $382,391
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,148,627 $5,316,468
Office of Aging and Disability Services Adult Protective Services Z040
Initiative: Reallocates 99 Human Services Caseworker positions, 16 Human Services
Casework Supervisor positions and 4 Public Service Manager II positions from 90%
General Fund to 87% General Fund and from 10% Other Special Revenue Funds to 13%
Other Special Revenue Funds. This initiative also adjusts funding for related All Other
costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($422,263) ($431,172)
All Other ($25,904) ($25,904)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($448,167) ($457,076)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $425,611 $434,520
All Other $36,469 $36,677
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $462,080 $471,197
OFFICE OF AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES ADULT PROTECTIVE
SERVICES Z040
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($422,263) ($431,172)
All Other ($25,904) ($25,904)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($448,167) ($457,076)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $425,611 $434,520
All Other $36,469 $36,677
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $462,080 $471,197
Page 130 - 132LR2409(17)

Office of Aging and Disability Services Central Office 0140
Initiative: Reduces Federal Expenditures Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds allocation
across programs to align with available resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($105,000) ($105,000)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($105,000) ($105,000)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,382,751) ($2,782,751)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL ($1,382,751) ($2,782,751)
Office of Aging and Disability Services Central Office 0140
Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Manager II position funded 100% in the Office
of Aging and Disability Services Central Office program, General Fund and one Public
Service Manager II position funded 50% in the Developmental Services - Community
program, General Fund and 50% in the Office of MaineCare Services program, Federal
Expenditures Fund for quality assurance work. This initiative also provides funding for
related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $135,681 $142,254
All Other $6,737 $6,737
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $142,418 $148,991
Office of Aging and Disability Services Central Office 0140
Initiative: Reallocates 21 positions and transfers and reallocates one Social Services
Program Specialist II position within the Office of Aging and Disability Services Central
Office program, Long Term Care - Office of Aging and Disability Services program and
Developmental Services - Community program to align the duties being performed with
the proper funding source. This initiative also adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
Position detail is on file with the Bureau of the Budget.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services ($20,018) ($18,266)
All Other ($674) ($674)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($20,692) ($18,940)
Office of Aging and Disability Services Central Office 0140
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to address unmet needs of older adults through
community-based services and programs delivered by the area agency in each of the State's
coordinated community program areas. The appropriation must be distributed to the area
agencies, based on priorities identified by local advisory councils to meet regional needs,
Page 131 - 132LR2409(17)

through the intrastate funding formula to develop programs and deliver services necessary
for the general well-being of older adults, including, but not limited to, in-home services,
case management services, meals programs, wellness services, respite for caregivers,
public education and outreach, volunteer services and information and referral services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,000,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,000,000 $0
OFFICE OF AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES CENTRAL OFFICE 0140
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $115,663 $123,988
All Other $3,006,063 $6,063
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,121,726 $130,051
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($105,000) ($105,000)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($105,000) ($105,000)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,382,751) ($2,782,751)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL ($1,382,751) ($2,782,751)
Office of Behavioral Health Z199
Initiative: Reduces Federal Expenditures Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds allocation
across programs to align with available resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($4,040,153) ($4,040,153)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($4,040,153) ($4,040,153)
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($6,530,972) ($6,530,972)
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL ($6,530,972) ($6,530,972)
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($3,640,385) ($5,640,385)
__________ __________
Page 132 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP TOTAL ($3,640,385) ($5,640,385)
Office of Behavioral Health Z199
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Management Analyst I position from the Office of
Behavioral Health program, Federal Expenditures Fund to the Mental Health Services -
Community program, Federal Block Grant Fund and adjusts related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($80,458) ($84,392)
All Other ($9,308) ($9,400)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($89,766) ($93,792)
Office of Behavioral Health Z199
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Social Services Program Specialist II position,
previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 17, through June 12, 2027 and transfers
the position from the Mental Health Services - Children program, General Fund to the
Office of Behavioral Health program, Federal Expenditures Fund. This initiative also
provides one-time funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $126,580 $131,926
All Other $14,485 $14,773
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $141,065 $146,699
Office of Behavioral Health Z199
Initiative: Reduces funding approved in Public Law 2023, chapter 412 to establish a crisis
receiving center in Kennebec County.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,600,000) ($1,600,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($1,600,000) ($1,600,000)
Office of Behavioral Health Z199
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service Manager
II position in the Mental Health Services - Community program and one Public Service
Manager II position in the Office of Behavioral Health program to Public Service Manager
III positions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $19,114 $24,971
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $19,114 $24,971
OFFICE OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH Z199
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $19,114 $24,971
Page 133 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other ($1,600,000) ($1,600,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($1,580,886) ($1,575,029)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services $46,122 $47,534
All Other ($4,034,976) ($4,034,780)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($3,988,854) ($3,987,246)
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($6,530,972) ($6,530,972)
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL ($6,530,972) ($6,530,972)
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($3,640,385) ($5,640,385)
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP TOTAL ($3,640,385) ($5,640,385)
Office of Child and Family Services - Central 0307
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Social Service Program Specialist II position,
previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 17, through June 12, 2027 and transfers
the position from 100% Purchased Social Services program, General Fund to 72% General
Fund and 28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and Family Services -
Central program. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $96,937 $97,946
All Other $5,225 $5,225
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $102,162 $103,171
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $37,697 $38,090
All Other $4,177 $4,198
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $41,874 $42,288
Office of Child and Family Services - Central 0307
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates one Management Analyst II position from 100% Child
Care Services program, General Fund to 72% General Fund and 28% Other Special
Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and Family Services - Central program and adjusts
funding for related All Other costs.
Page 134 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $87,760 $88,641
All Other $5,225 $5,225
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $92,985 $93,866
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $34,130 $34,472
All Other $3,985 $4,003
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $38,115 $38,475
Office of Child and Family Services - Central 0307
Initiative: Establishes one Financial Resources Specialist position funded 72% General
Fund and 28% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and Family Services -
Central program to support the federal so-called Title IV-E Prevention Program and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $61,459 $64,183
All Other $2,613 $2,613
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $64,072 $66,796
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $23,900 $24,960
All Other $2,361 $2,418
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $26,261 $27,378
Office of Child and Family Services - Central 0307
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service Manager
III position from range 34 to range 36 funded 72% General Fund and 28% Other Special
Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and Family Services - Central program and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $12,946 $11,057
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $12,946 $11,057
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $5,034 $4,300
All Other $229 $233
__________ __________
Page 135 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,263 $4,533
OFFICE OF CHILD AND FAMILY SERVICES - CENTRAL 0307
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $259,102 $261,827
All Other $13,063 $13,063
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $272,165 $274,890
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $100,761 $101,822
All Other $10,752 $10,852
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $111,513 $112,674
Office of Child and Family Services - District 0452
Initiative: Establishes 2 Child Protective Services Case Aide positions funded 79% General
Fund and 21% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Office of Child and Family Services -
District program. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $134,864 $140,846
All Other $8,600 $8,600
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $143,464 $149,446
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $35,854 $37,440
All Other $4,129 $4,174
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $39,983 $41,614
OFFICE OF CHILD AND FAMILY SERVICES - DISTRICT 0452
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $134,864 $140,846
All Other $8,600 $8,600
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $143,464 $149,446
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $35,854 $37,440
Page 136 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $4,129 $4,174
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $39,983 $41,614
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Reduces Federal Expenditures Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds allocation
across programs to align with available resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($77,500) ($77,500)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($77,500) ($77,500)
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($4,571,186) ($4,571,186)
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL ($4,571,186) ($4,571,186)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ARRA 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,505,268) ($1,505,268)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ARRA TOTAL ($1,505,268) ($1,505,268)
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Establishes 3 Developmental Disabilities Resources Coordinator positions and 4
Public Service Manager II positions funded 50% Developmental Services - Community
program, General Fund and 50% Office of MaineCare Services program, Federal
Expenditures Fund for the new federal home and community-based services lifespan
waiver. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $455,119 $475,687
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $455,119 $475,687
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Manager II position funded 100% in the Office
of Aging and Disability Services Central Office program, General Fund and one Public
Service Manager II position funded 50% in the Developmental Services - Community
program, General Fund and 50% in the Office of MaineCare Services program, Federal
Expenditures Fund for quality assurance work. This initiative also provides funding for
related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $72,255 $75,965
All Other $5,124 $5,194
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $77,379 $81,159
Page 137 - 132LR2409(17)

Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Reallocates 2 Social Services Program Specialist I positions and one Social
Services Program Manager position from 100% Developmental Services - Community
program, General Fund to 50% Developmental Services - Community program, General
Fund and 50% Office of MaineCare Services program, Federal Expenditures Fund and
adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $167,562 $170,494
All Other $15,061 $15,129
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $182,623 $185,623
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Reallocates 21 positions and transfers and reallocates one Social Services
Program Specialist II position within the Office of Aging and Disability Services Central
Office program, Long Term Care - Office of Aging and Disability Services program and
Developmental Services - Community program to align the duties being performed with
the proper funding source. This initiative also adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
Position detail is on file with the Bureau of the Budget.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $897,605 $918,639
All Other $66,312 $66,804
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $963,917 $985,443
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides funding to continue a children's behavioral health level-of-care
assessment under Public Law 2023, chapter 412 funded 75% Office of MaineCare
Services, Federal Expenditures Fund and 25% Mental Health Services - Children, General
Fund.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $968,968 $968,968
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $968,968 $968,968
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides funding to continue the Center of Excellence hub for youth behavioral
health service providers, as described in the department's children's behavioral health
services plan and per the recommendation of the federal Department of Justice.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,181,136 $1,574,849
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,181,136 $1,574,849
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Page 138 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Establishes one limited-period Public Service Coordinator II position, funded
50% General Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Office of MaineCare
Services program, through June 12, 2027 and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $65,781 $68,927
All Other $3,628 $3,628
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $69,409 $72,555
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $65,786 $68,929
All Other $5,308 $5,386
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $71,094 $74,315
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Public Service Coordinator I position, one limited-
period Social Services Manager I position and one limited-period Social Services Program
Specialist II position, previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 17, through June
12, 2027, funded 50% General Fund and 50% Federal Expenditures Fund, for the
development and implementation of certified community behavioral health clinics. This
initiative also provides one-time funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $212,790 $216,948
All Other $10,884 $10,884
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $223,674 $227,832
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $212,796 $216,959
All Other $16,116 $16,213
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $228,912 $233,172
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides funding for a contracted vendor funded 50% General Fund and 50%
Federal Expenditures Fund to serve as the federally required waiver evaluator for the State's
waiver related to expanding behavioral health and justice-related services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $62,500 $62,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $62,500 $62,500
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 139 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $63,950 $63,950
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $63,950 $63,950
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Reallocates one Comprehensive Health Planner II position from 50% Federal
Expenditures Fund and 50% General Fund to 75% Federal Expenditures Fund and 25%
General Fund and adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($29,922) ($30,139)
All Other ($1,814) ($1,814)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($31,736) ($31,953)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $29,922 $30,139
All Other $2,557 $2,562
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $32,479 $32,701
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service Manager
III position from range 34 to range 36 funded 50% General Fund and 50% Federal
Expenditures Fund in the Office of MaineCare Services and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $7,406 $7,678
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,406 $7,678
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $7,407 $7,679
All Other $96 $106
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $7,503 $7,785
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 375 Eligibility Specialist
positions in the Department of Health and Human Services from range 19 to range 21 and
provides funding to increase the hours of one Eligibility Specialist position from 57 to 80
hours biweekly. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,634 $3,635
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,634 $3,635
Page 140 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,635 $3,635
All Other $84 $84
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $3,719 $3,719
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Business Data Analytics
Specialist position to a Public Service Manager III position to serve as the Maine Integrated
Health Management Solution director and transfers and reallocates the position from 50%
to 25% General Fund and 50% to 75% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Office of
MaineCare Services program. This initiative also transfers All Other to Personal Services
to cover the position, which was previously procured through a staff augmentation contract.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($17,392) ($18,111)
All Other ($89,929) ($89,929)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($107,321) ($108,040)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $60,484 $63,602
All Other ($268,008) ($267,952)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($207,524) ($204,350)
OFFICE OF MAINECARE SERVICES 0129
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services $242,297 $248,938
All Other ($14,731) ($14,731)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $227,566 $234,207
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $1,517,452 $1,556,041
All Other $2,511,823 $2,926,980
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $4,029,275 $4,483,021
Page 141 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($77,500) ($77,500)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($77,500) ($77,500)
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($4,571,186) ($4,571,186)
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL ($4,571,186) ($4,571,186)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ARRA 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,505,268) ($1,505,268)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ARRA TOTAL ($1,505,268) ($1,505,268)
Office of Violence Prevention Z411
Initiative: Reduces funding one time for annual grants to communities approved in Public
Law 2023, chapter 643, Part FFFF.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,000,000) ($1,000,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($1,000,000) ($1,000,000)
OFFICE OF VIOLENCE PREVENTION Z411
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,000,000) ($1,000,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($1,000,000) ($1,000,000)
PNMI Room and Board Z009
Initiative: Provides funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations across
programs to reflect increases in costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $7,072,368
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $7,072,368
PNMI Room and Board Z009
Initiative: Provides funding for cost-of-living increases to reimbursement for services
regularly scheduled for July 1, 2025 and January 1, 2026 adjustments. Increases must be
applied as a consistent percentage that allows full expenditure of General Fund
appropriations for this purpose, leveraging available federal matching funds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $325,311 $328,724
Page 142 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $325,311 $328,724
PNMI ROOM AND BOARD Z009
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $325,311 $7,401,092
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $325,311 $7,401,092
Purchased Social Services 0228
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding to replace current and anticipated reductions in grants
to the department under the federal victim assistance formula grant program administered
by the United States Department of Justice, Office of Justice Programs, Office for Victims
of Crime pursuant to the federal Victims of Crime Act of 1984.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,000,000 $3,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,000,000 $3,000,000
Purchased Social Services 0228
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace current and anticipated reductions in grants
to the department under the federal victim assistance formula grant program administered
by the United States Department of Justice, Office of Justice Programs, Office for Victims
of Crime pursuant to the federal Victims of Crime Act of 1984.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,000,000 $3,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,000,000 $3,000,000
PURCHASED SOCIAL SERVICES 0228
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,000,000 $6,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,000,000 $6,000,000
Recovery Community Centers Fund Z406
Initiative: Provides funding for the required revenue transfer for the Recovery Community
Centers Fund.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,999,500 $1,999,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,999,500 $1,999,500
RECOVERY COMMUNITY CENTERS FUND Z406
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 143 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,999,500 $1,999,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,999,500 $1,999,500
Riverview Psychiatric Center Z219
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Public Service Coordinator I position from 62.21%
Riverview Psychiatric Center program, Other Special Revenue Funds and 37.79%
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center program, General Fund to 31.04%
Riverview Psychiatric Center program, Other Special Revenue Funds, 18.96%
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center program, General Fund, 31.04%
Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center program, Other Special Revenue Funds and 18.96%
Disproportionate Share - Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center program, General Fund. This
initiative also adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($38,092) ($39,678)
All Other ($2,845) ($2,872)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($40,937) ($42,550)
Riverview Psychiatric Center Z219
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds for the prospective costs of certain employees within the
Department of Health and Human Services being allowed to participate in the 1998 Special
Plan effective October 1, 2025.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $573 $779
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $573 $779
Riverview Psychiatric Center Z219
Initiative: Allocates ongoing funds for the prospective costs of certain employees within
the Department of Health and Human Services being allowed to participate in the 1998
Special Plan effective October 1, 2025.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $38,680 $52,604
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $38,680 $52,604
RIVERVIEW PSYCHIATRIC CENTER Z219
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $573 $779
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $573 $779
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 144 - 132LR2409(17)

Personal Services $588 $12,926
All Other ($2,845) ($2,872)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($2,257) $10,054
State-funded Foster Care/Adoption Assistance 0139
Initiative: Provides funding for child welfare cycle payments.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,670,666 $8,258,410
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,670,666 $8,258,410
STATE-FUNDED FOSTER CARE/ADOPTION ASSISTANCE 0139
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,670,666 $8,258,410
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,670,666 $8,258,410
Universal Childhood Immunization Program Z121
Initiative: Provides funding in the Childhood Immunization Fund to account for new
vaccines and increased price rates.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,572,660 $12,572,660
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $12,572,660 $12,572,660
UNIVERSAL CHILDHOOD IMMUNIZATION PROGRAM Z121
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,572,660 $12,572,660
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $12,572,660 $12,572,660
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $49,847,469 $140,043,903
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $59,828,162 $430,591,234
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE $0 ($1,240,249)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $41,527,948 $44,833,842
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND ($11,832,657) ($3,036,831)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ARRA ($1,505,268) ($1,505,268)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $297,183 ($1,040,928)
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP ($44,560,169) ($52,087,061)
Page 145 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $93,602,668 $556,558,642
Sec. A-18. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HISTORIC PRESERVATION COMMISSION, MAINE
Historic Preservation Commission 0036
Initiative: Provides funding for the operational needs of the Maine Historic Preservation
Commission's Federal Expenditures Fund.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $225,000 $225,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $225,000 $225,000
Historic Preservation Commission 0036
Initiative: Provides funding for the administrative cost associated with a recent bond.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,000 $25,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $25,000 $25,000
HISTORIC PRESERVATION COMMISSION 0036
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,000 $25,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $25,000 $25,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $225,000 $225,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $225,000 $225,000
HISTORIC PRESERVATION COMMISSION,
MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $25,000 $25,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $225,000 $225,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $250,000 $250,000
Sec. A-19. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Page 146 - 132LR2409(17)

Housing Authority - State 0442
Initiative: Adjusts funding to bring allocations in line with projected available resources
for fiscal year 2025-26 and fiscal year 2026-27.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $297,985 $772,166
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $297,985 $772,166
Housing Authority - State 0442
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to support the authority's manufactured and mobile
home park preservation and assistance program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,000,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,000,000 $0
Housing Authority - State 0442
Initiative: Adjusts funding for the Housing Opportunities for Maine Fund due to changes
in the real estate transfer tax.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,982,000 ($6,709,000)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,982,000 ($6,709,000)
HOUSING AUTHORITY - STATE 0442
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,279,985 ($5,936,834)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $6,279,985 ($5,936,834)
Housing Production Fund N557
Initiative: Allocates funds to support the federal low-income housing tax credit, the rural
affordable rental housing program and the affordable homeownership program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $17,258,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $17,258,000
HOUSING PRODUCTION FUND N557
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $17,258,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $17,258,000
Page 147 - 132LR2409(17)

Maine Energy, Housing and Economic Recovery Program Z124
Initiative: Increases funding in fiscal year 2025-26 and decreases funding in fiscal year
2026-27 to bring debt service payments into accordance with the repayment schedule.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $672 ($114)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $672 ($114)
MAINE ENERGY, HOUSING AND ECONOMIC RECOVERY PROGRAM Z124
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $672 ($114)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $672 ($114)
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $6,280,657 $11,321,052
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $6,280,657 $11,321,052
Sec. A-20. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION, MAINE
Human Rights Commission - Regulation 0150
Initiative: Provides funding for the operational needs of the Maine Human Rights
Commission.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,369 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $25,369 $0
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION - REGULATION 0150
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,369 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $25,369 $0
Sec. A-21. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE, DEPARTMENT OF
Administrative Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0530
Page 148 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Chief Planner position from 70%
Federal Expenditures Fund and 30% General Fund within the Resource Management
Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program to 40% Federal Expenditures Fund within
the Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations program, 30% General Fund within the
Administrative Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program and 30% Other Special
Revenue Funds within the Boating Access Sites program and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $40,076 $41,822
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $40,076 $41,822
ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES - INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE 0530
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $40,076 $41,822
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $40,076 $41,822
ATV Enforcement Fund Z276
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of 2 Game Warden positions from the Enforcement
Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, 50% General Fund and 50% Federal
Expenditures Fund, to 50% General Fund in the Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries
and Wildlife program and, for one position, 50% Other Special Revenue Funds in the
Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, and, for the other
position, 50% Other Special Revenue Funds in the ATV Enforcement Fund program, and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $65,895 $68,542
All Other $480 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $66,375 $69,042
ATV Enforcement Fund Z276
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the replacement of 21 all-terrain vehicles, 28
snowmobiles, one snowmobile trailer, 2 boat trailers, 3 outboard motors, 2 boats, 8 trap
nets, one electrofishing backpack, 10 electric utility vehicles, 2 one-ton trucks, 2 2-ton
trucks, 4 truck beds and 2 fish stocking tanks.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $98,000 $98,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $98,000 $98,000
ATV Enforcement Fund Z276
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of the following positions: 88
Game Warden positions from range 20 to range 22; 4 Game Warden Investigator positions
from range 22 to range 24; 5 Game Warden Lieutenant positions from range 27 to range
Page 149 - 132LR2409(17)

29; 2 Game Warden Pilot positions from range 24 to range 26; one Game Warden Pilot
Supervisor position from range 26 to range 28; 15 Game Warden Sergeant positions from
range 24 to range 27; and 7 Game Warden Specialist positions from range 22 to range 24.
This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs. Position details are on file
with the Bureau of the Budget.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $4,936 $5,128
All Other $36 $37
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,972 $5,165
ATV ENFORCEMENT FUND Z276
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $70,831 $73,670
All Other $516 $537
Capital Expenditures $98,000 $98,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $169,347 $172,207
ATV Safety and Educational Program 0559
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $28,676 $28,774
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $28,676 $28,774
ATV SAFETY AND EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM 0559
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $28,676 $28,774
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $28,676 $28,774
Boating Access Sites 0631
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to purchase and improve land and facilities for boat
launch sites throughout the State.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $575,000 $575,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $575,000 $575,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $265,000 $265,000
__________ __________
Page 150 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $265,000 $265,000
Boating Access Sites 0631
Initiative: Establishes one limited-period Parks Maintenance Coordinator position and
provides funding for related All Other costs. This position ends June 18, 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $92,784 $99,488
All Other $150,000 $150,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $242,784 $249,488
Boating Access Sites 0631
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Chief Planner position from 70%
Federal Expenditures Fund and 30% General Fund within the Resource Management
Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program to 40% Federal Expenditures Fund within
the Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations program, 30% General Fund within the
Administrative Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program and 30% Other Special
Revenue Funds within the Boating Access Sites program and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $40,077 $41,818
All Other $959 $1,001
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $41,036 $42,819
BOATING ACCESS SITES 0631
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $92,784 $99,488
All Other $150,000 $150,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $242,784 $249,488
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $575,000 $575,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $575,000 $575,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $40,077 $41,818
All Other $959 $1,001
Capital Expenditures $265,000 $265,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $306,036 $307,819
Endangered Nongame Operations 0536
Page 151 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Establishes one IF&W Senior Resource Biologist position and 2 IF&W Resource
Biologist positions and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $54,466 $58,880
All Other $1,303 $1,409
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $55,769 $60,289
Endangered Nongame Operations 0536
Initiative: Transfers one IF&W Resource Supervisor position from the Fisheries and
Hatcheries Operations program, General Fund to the Endangered Nongame Operations
program, Federal Expenditures Fund.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
ENDANGERED NONGAME OPERATIONS 0536
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $54,466 $58,880
All Other $1,303 $1,409
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $55,769 $60,289
Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0537
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of 2 Game Warden positions from the Enforcement
Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, 50% General Fund and 50% Federal
Expenditures Fund, to 50% General Fund in the Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries
and Wildlife program and, for one position, 50% Other Special Revenue Funds in the
Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, and, for the other
position, 50% Other Special Revenue Funds in the ATV Enforcement Fund program, and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($124,129) ($130,746)
All Other ($905) ($953)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($125,034) ($131,699)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 152 - 132LR2409(17)

Personal Services $58,234 $62,204
All Other $424 $453
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $58,658 $62,657
Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0537
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Game Warden Specialist position from
50% Whitewater Rafting - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, Other Special Revenue
Funds and 50% Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, General
Fund to 70% Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, General
Fund and 30% Whitewater Rafting - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, Other Special
Revenue Funds and reduces funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $28,579 $30,252
All Other ($28,579) ($30,252)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0537
Initiative: Establishes one Game Warden Sergeant position and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $129,511 $140,133
All Other $952 $1,030
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $130,463 $141,163
Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0537
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the replacement of 21 all-terrain vehicles, 28
snowmobiles, one snowmobile trailer, 2 boat trailers, 3 outboard motors, 2 boats, 8 trap
nets, one electrofishing backpack, 10 electric utility vehicles, 2 one-ton trucks, 2 2-ton
trucks, 4 truck beds and 2 fish stocking tanks.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $119,000 $119,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $119,000 $119,000
Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0537
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of the following positions: 88
Game Warden positions from range 20 to range 22; 4 Game Warden Investigator positions
from range 22 to range 24; 5 Game Warden Lieutenant positions from range 27 to range
29; 2 Game Warden Pilot positions from range 24 to range 26; one Game Warden Pilot
Supervisor position from range 26 to range 28; 15 Game Warden Sergeant positions from
range 24 to range 27; and 7 Game Warden Specialist positions from range 22 to range 24.
Page 153 - 132LR2409(17)

This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs. Position details are on file
with the Bureau of the Budget.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,186,520 $1,253,367
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,186,520 $1,253,367
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $34,502 $36,198
All Other $251 $264
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $34,753 $36,462
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $24,212 $25,658
All Other $177 $187
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $24,389 $25,845
ENFORCEMENT OPERATIONS - INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE 0537
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $1,215,099 $1,283,619
All Other ($28,579) ($30,252)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,186,520 $1,253,367
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($89,627) ($94,548)
All Other ($654) ($689)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($90,281) ($95,237)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $211,957 $227,995
All Other $1,553 $1,670
Capital Expenditures $119,000 $119,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $332,510 $348,665
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Page 154 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Provides funding for operating expenses in the Fisheries and Hatcheries
Operations - Lake and River Protection Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $203,762 $203,762
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $203,762 $203,762
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Initiative: Establishes one IF&W Resource Biologist position and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $108,937 $117,764
All Other $2,628 $2,842
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $111,565 $120,606
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one IF&W Resource Supervisor position from 80%
General Fund and 20% Other Special Revenue Funds to 100% General Fund and reduces
funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $31,278 $32,591
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $31,278 $32,591
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($31,278) ($32,591)
All Other ($755) ($787)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($32,033) ($33,378)
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Initiative: Transfers one IF&W Resource Supervisor position from the Fisheries and
Hatcheries Operations program, General Fund to the Endangered Nongame Operations
program, Federal Expenditures Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Initiative: Establishes 2 Fish Culturist Assistant Supervisor positions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $191,454 $205,972
Page 155 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $191,454 $205,972
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the replacement of 21 all-terrain vehicles, 28
snowmobiles, one snowmobile trailer, 2 boat trailers, 3 outboard motors, 2 boats, 8 trap
nets, one electrofishing backpack, 10 electric utility vehicles, 2 one-ton trucks, 2 2-ton
trucks, 4 truck beds and 2 fish stocking tanks.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $7,500 $42,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $7,500 $42,000
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for 3 snowmobiles, 3 all-terrain vehicles, 2 trailers,
one electrofishing control box and 2 boats.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $13,875 $0
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $13,875 $0
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Chief Planner position from 70%
Federal Expenditures Fund and 30% General Fund within the Resource Management
Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program to 40% Federal Expenditures Fund within
the Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations program, 30% General Fund within the
Administrative Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program and 30% Other Special
Revenue Funds within the Boating Access Sites program and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $53,436 $55,762
All Other $1,290 $1,347
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $54,726 $57,109
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Fish Culturist position from 50% General Fund and
50% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% General Fund within the same program and
reduces funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $40,259 $43,110
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $40,259 $43,110
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 156 - 132LR2409(17)

Personal Services ($40,259) ($43,110)
All Other ($963) ($1,031)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($41,222) ($44,141)
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 2 Office Associate II
positions to 2 Office Specialist I positions and one Office Associate II Manager Supervisor
position to an Office Specialist II Supervisor position and reduces funding for related All
Other costs. This initiative also transfers and reallocates the cost of one Office Specialist I
position and one Office Specialist II Supervisor position from 70% Federal Expenditures
Fund and 30% General Fund, Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and
Wildlife program to 75% General Fund and 25% Federal Expenditures Fund, Fisheries and
Hatcheries Operations program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $125,077 $135,193
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $125,077 $135,193
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $41,687 $45,066
All Other $998 $1,079
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $42,685 $46,145
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Office Associate II
position to an Office Specialist I position and provides funding for related All Other costs.
This initiative also transfers and reallocates the cost of one Office Specialist I position from
65% General Fund and 35% Federal Expenditures Fund, Fisheries and Hatcheries
Operations program to 70% Federal Expenditures Fund and 30% General Fund, Resource
Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($58,686) ($61,152)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($58,686) ($61,152)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($31,600) ($32,927)
All Other ($756) ($788)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($32,356) ($33,715)
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Page 157 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 18 Fish Culturist positions
from range 16 to range 18, 6 Fish Culturist Assistant Supervisor positions from range 19
to range 22 and 8 Fish Culturist Supervisor positions from range 23 to range 25. Position
details are on file with the Bureau of the Budget.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $257,225 $267,546
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $257,225 $267,546
FISHERIES AND HATCHERIES OPERATIONS 0535
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $586,607 $623,260
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $586,607 $623,260
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $23,264 $24,791
All Other $569 $607
Capital Expenditures $21,375 $42,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $45,208 $67,398
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $77,659 $85,173
All Other $205,635 $205,817
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $283,294 $290,990
Inland Fisheries Conservation and Enhancement Z427
Initiative: Provides funding for operating expenses and to recognize the revenue increase
from the sale of fishing licenses.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,244,000 $1,244,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,244,000 $1,244,000
Inland Fisheries Conservation and Enhancement Z427
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the replacement of 21 all-terrain vehicles, 28
snowmobiles, one snowmobile trailer, 2 boat trailers, 3 outboard motors, 2 boats, 8 trap
nets, one electrofishing backpack, 10 electric utility vehicles, 2 one-ton trucks, 2 2-ton
trucks, 4 truck beds and 2 fish stocking tanks.
Page 158 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $244,835 $234,705
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $244,835 $234,705
INLAND FISHERIES CONSERVATION AND ENHANCEMENT Z427
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,244,000 $1,244,000
Capital Expenditures $244,835 $234,705
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,488,835 $1,478,705
Landowner Relations Z140
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of the following positions: 88
Game Warden positions from range 20 to range 22; 4 Game Warden Investigator positions
from range 22 to range 24; 5 Game Warden Lieutenant positions from range 27 to range
29; 2 Game Warden Pilot positions from range 24 to range 26; one Game Warden Pilot
Supervisor position from range 26 to range 28; 15 Game Warden Sergeant positions from
range 24 to range 27; and 7 Game Warden Specialist positions from range 22 to range 24.
This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs. Position details are on file
with the Bureau of the Budget.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $601 $625
All Other $17 $18
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $618 $643
Landowner Relations Z140
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 3 full-time Recreational
Safety Coordinator positions and 3 part-time Recreational Safety Coordinator positions
from range 15 to range 18. This initiative also reallocates the cost from Resource
Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, 72% Federal Expenditures
Fund and 4 positions Division of Public Information and Education program and 2
positions Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, 26%
General Fund and Landowner Relations program, 2% Other Special Revenue Funds to
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, 72% Federal
Expenditures Fund and 4 positions Division of Public Information and Education program
and 2 positions Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program,
21% General Fund and Landowner Relations program, 7% Other Special Revenue Funds
and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $16,901 $17,734
All Other $271 $284
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $17,172 $18,018
LANDOWNER RELATIONS Z140
Page 159 - 132LR2409(17)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $17,502 $18,359
All Other $288 $302
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $17,790 $18,661
Licensing Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0531
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for repairs to an aviation hangar and a storage garage
at the Greenville regional facility.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $550,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $550,000 $0
Licensing Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0531
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the replacement of one excavator.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 $230,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $230,000
Licensing Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0531
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the construction of a heated garage bay and
bunkroom at the Strong regional facility.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 $260,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $260,000
Licensing Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0531
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the replacement of 21 all-terrain vehicles, 28
snowmobiles, one snowmobile trailer, 2 boat trailers, 3 outboard motors, 2 boats, 8 trap
nets, one electrofishing backpack, 10 electric utility vehicles, 2 one-ton trucks, 2 2-ton
trucks, 4 truck beds and 2 fish stocking tanks.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $9,500 $52,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,500 $52,500
Licensing Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0531
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for 3 snowmobiles, 3 all-terrain vehicles, 2 trailers,
one electrofishing control box and 2 boats.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $4,625 $31,000
__________ __________
Page 160 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,625 $31,000
LICENSING SERVICES - INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE 0531
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $564,125 $573,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $564,125 $573,500
Office of the Commissioner - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0529
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the repair of department-owned dams.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $1,250,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,250,000 $0
Office of the Commissioner - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0529
Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Manager II position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $144,655 $156,912
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $144,655 $156,912
OFFICE OF THE COMMISSIONER - INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE
0529
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $144,655 $156,912
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $144,655 $156,912
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $1,250,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,250,000 $0
Public Information and Education, Division of 0729
Initiative: Provides funding for operating expenses in the Public Information and
Education, Division of program, Youth Conservation Education Other Special Revenue
Funds account.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $73,700 $73,700
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $73,700 $73,700
Page 161 - 132LR2409(17)

Public Information and Education, Division of 0729
Initiative: Establishes one Public Relations Specialist position and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $89,978 $96,353
All Other $1,451 $1,555
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $91,429 $97,908
Public Information and Education, Division of 0729
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the replacement of 21 all-terrain vehicles, 28
snowmobiles, one snowmobile trailer, 2 boat trailers, 3 outboard motors, 2 boats, 8 trap
nets, one electrofishing backpack, 10 electric utility vehicles, 2 one-ton trucks, 2 2-ton
trucks, 4 truck beds and 2 fish stocking tanks.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $110,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $110,000 $0
Public Information and Education, Division of 0729
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 3 full-time Recreational
Safety Coordinator positions and 3 part-time Recreational Safety Coordinator positions
from range 15 to range 18. This initiative also reallocates the cost from Resource
Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, 72% Federal Expenditures
Fund and 4 positions Division of Public Information and Education program and 2
positions Resource Management Services Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, 26%
General Fund and Landowner Relations program, 2% Other Special Revenue Funds to
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, 72% Federal
Expenditures Fund and 4 positions Division of Public Information and Education program
and 2 positions Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program,
21% General Fund and Landowner Relations program, 7% Other Special Revenue Funds
and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($4,426) ($4,606)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($4,426) ($4,606)
PUBLIC INFORMATION AND EDUCATION, DIVISION OF 0729
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($4,426) ($4,606)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($4,426) ($4,606)
Page 162 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $89,978 $96,353
All Other $75,151 $75,255
Capital Expenditures $110,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $275,129 $171,608
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Provides funding for operating expenses in the Black Bear Research and
Management Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $84,986 $84,986
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $84,986 $84,986
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Provides funding for operating expenses in the Moose Research and
Management Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $69,627 $69,627
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $69,627 $69,627
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to purchase land for wildlife habitat.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $1,935,990 $1,935,990
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,935,990 $1,935,990
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the reconstruction of the Swan Island pier.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $150,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $150,000 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $350,000 $0
Page 163 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $350,000 $0
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Establishes 2 IF&W Senior Resource Biologist positions and reduces All Other
to fund these positions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $68,792 $74,164
All Other ($68,792) ($74,164)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $160,526 $173,056
All Other ($160,526) ($173,056)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Establishes one IF&W Resource Biologist position and reduces All Other to fund
the position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $32,679 $35,327
All Other ($32,679) ($35,327)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $76,258 $82,437
All Other ($76,258) ($82,437)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Establishes one IF&W Senior Resource Biologist position and 2 IF&W Resource
Biologist positions and provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $249,403 $269,356
All Other $6,017 $6,501
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $255,420 $275,857
Page 164 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $28,664 $30,902
All Other $686 $739
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $29,350 $31,641
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Establishes one IF&W Resource Technician position and reduces All Other to
fund a portion of the position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $46,193 $49,886
All Other ($46,193) ($49,886)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $46,200 $49,890
All Other $1,114 $1,203
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $47,314 $51,093
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the replacement of 21 all-terrain vehicles, 28
snowmobiles, one snowmobile trailer, 2 boat trailers, 3 outboard motors, 2 boats, 8 trap
nets, one electrofishing backpack, 10 electric utility vehicles, 2 one-ton trucks, 2 2-ton
trucks, 4 truck beds and 2 fish stocking tanks.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $21,000 $115,500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $21,000 $115,500
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for 3 snowmobiles, 3 all-terrain vehicles, 2 trailers,
one electrofishing control box and 2 boats.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 $93,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $93,000
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Chief Planner position from 70%
Federal Expenditures Fund and 30% General Fund within the Resource Management
Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program to 40% Federal Expenditures Fund within
the Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations program, 30% General Fund within the
Administrative Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program and 30% Other Special
Page 165 - 132LR2409(17)

Revenue Funds within the Boating Access Sites program and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($40,075) ($41,820)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($40,075) ($41,820)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($93,514) ($97,582)
All Other ($2,257) ($2,356)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($95,771) ($99,938)
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Establishes 10 limited-period seasonal IF&W Resource Technician positions and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $230,260 $254,980
All Other ($230,260) ($254,980)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $230,190 $254,910
All Other $5,530 $6,124
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $235,720 $261,034
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 2 Office Associate II
positions to 2 Office Specialist I positions and one Office Associate II Manager Supervisor
position to an Office Specialist II Supervisor position and reduces funding for related All
Other costs. This initiative also transfers and reallocates the cost of one Office Specialist I
position and one Office Specialist II Supervisor position from 70% Federal Expenditures
Fund and 30% General Fund, Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and
Wildlife program to 75% General Fund and 25% Federal Expenditures Fund, Fisheries and
Hatcheries Operations program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($44,691) ($48,329)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($44,691) ($48,329)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 166 - 132LR2409(17)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (2.000) (2.000)
Personal Services ($104,284) ($112,774)
All Other ($2,496) ($2,699)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($106,780) ($115,473)
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Office Associate II
position to an Office Specialist I position and provides funding for related All Other costs.
This initiative also transfers and reallocates the cost of one Office Specialist I position from
65% General Fund and 35% Federal Expenditures Fund, Fisheries and Hatcheries
Operations program to 70% Federal Expenditures Fund and 30% General Fund, Resource
Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $28,830 $30,034
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $28,830 $30,034
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $67,271 $70,087
All Other $1,610 $1,677
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $68,881 $71,764
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 3 full-time Recreational
Safety Coordinator positions and 3 part-time Recreational Safety Coordinator positions
from range 15 to range 18. This initiative also reallocates the cost from Resource
Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, 72% Federal Expenditures
Fund and 4 positions Division of Public Information and Education program and 2
positions Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, 26%
General Fund and Landowner Relations program, 2% Other Special Revenue Funds to
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, 72% Federal
Expenditures Fund and 4 positions Division of Public Information and Education program
and 2 positions Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program,
21% General Fund and Landowner Relations program, 7% Other Special Revenue Funds
and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($3,558) ($3,772)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($3,558) ($3,772)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $22,921 $24,052
All Other $548 $575
Page 167 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $23,469 $24,627
RESOURCE MANAGEMENT SERVICES - INLAND FISHERIES AND
WILDLIFE 0534
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $318,430 $350,470
All Other ($377,924) ($414,357)
Capital Expenditures $150,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $90,506 ($63,887)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $654,971 $713,432
All Other ($226,718) ($244,468)
Capital Expenditures $2,306,990 $2,144,490
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,735,243 $2,613,454
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $28,664 $30,902
All Other $155,299 $155,352
Capital Expenditures $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $683,963 $686,254
Search and Rescue 0538
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of the following positions: 88
Game Warden positions from range 20 to range 22; 4 Game Warden Investigator positions
from range 22 to range 24; 5 Game Warden Lieutenant positions from range 27 to range
29; 2 Game Warden Pilot positions from range 24 to range 26; one Game Warden Pilot
Supervisor position from range 26 to range 28; 15 Game Warden Sergeant positions from
range 24 to range 27; and 7 Game Warden Specialist positions from range 22 to range 24.
This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs. Position details are on file
with the Bureau of the Budget.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $27,685 $28,792
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $27,685 $28,792
SEARCH AND RESCUE 0538
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 168 - 132LR2409(17)

Personal Services $27,685 $28,792
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $27,685 $28,792
Waterfowl Habitat Acquisition and Management 0561
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to purchase land for wildlife habitat.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $1,800,000 $1,800,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,800,000 $1,800,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $80,000 $80,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $80,000 $80,000
WATERFOWL HABITAT ACQUISITION AND MANAGEMENT 0561
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $1,800,000 $1,800,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,800,000 $1,800,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $80,000 $80,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $80,000 $80,000
Whitewater Rafting - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0539
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Game Warden Specialist position from
50% Whitewater Rafting - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, Other Special Revenue
Funds and 50% Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, General
Fund to 70% Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, General
Fund and 30% Whitewater Rafting - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, Other Special
Revenue Funds and reduces funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($28,579) ($30,252)
All Other ($210) ($223)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($28,789) ($30,475)
Whitewater Rafting - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0539
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of the following positions: 88
Game Warden positions from range 20 to range 22; 4 Game Warden Investigator positions
from range 22 to range 24; 5 Game Warden Lieutenant positions from range 27 to range
Page 169 - 132LR2409(17)

29; 2 Game Warden Pilot positions from range 24 to range 26; one Game Warden Pilot
Supervisor position from range 26 to range 28; 15 Game Warden Sergeant positions from
range 24 to range 27; and 7 Game Warden Specialist positions from range 22 to range 24.
This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs. Position details are on file
with the Bureau of the Budget.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,182 $3,288
All Other $23 $24
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,205 $3,312
WHITEWATER RAFTING - INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE 0539
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($25,397) ($26,964)
All Other ($187) ($199)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($25,584) ($27,163)
INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $3,803,242 $3,763,853
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $5,065,170 $4,960,615
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $4,021,055 $2,711,604
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $12,889,467 $11,436,072
Sec. A-22. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the purchase of supplies and equipment for
security staff.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $191,759 $75,814
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $191,759 $75,814
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for contracted audio and visual support.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $125,000 $150,000
Page 170 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $125,000 $150,000
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to upgrade courtrooms with video bar conferencing
technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $210,000 $50,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $210,000 $50,000
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for contracted recording software support services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $165,500 $165,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $165,500 $165,500
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for recording software upgrades.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $129,000 $129,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $129,000 $129,000
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace analog sound mixers with digital sound
processor equipment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $525,000 $525,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $525,000 $525,000
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for cloud services and ransomware protection.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,200 $100,200
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,200 $100,200
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for contracted technical account management
services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $75,000 $75,000
__________ __________
Page 171 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $75,000 $75,000
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the increased cost of virtual-machine storage technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $60,000 $60,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $60,000 $60,000
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Reallocates funding for the Odyssey case management system from the CMS-
Technology Fee account in Other Special Revenue Funds to the Supreme JD & Superior
Courts account in the General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,838,125 $1,838,125
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,838,125 $1,838,125
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($988,852) ($988,525)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($988,852) ($988,525)
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding to modernize the ADRIS case management system.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $100,000
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Staff Accountant position, previously continued
by Public Law 2023, chapter 643, through June 12, 2027 and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $122,424 $128,497
All Other $2,348 $2,405
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $124,772 $130,902
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for courthouse facility improvements to comply with the 2010
ADA Standards for Accessible Design from the United States Department of Justice.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
Page 172 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $50,000 $50,000
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the continued support of the Maine Judicial
Information System.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000 $125,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $250,000 $125,000
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace Google Enterprise licensing with Microsoft
365.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $0
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for Microsoft 365 security costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $0
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Reduces allocation to reflect a decrease in funding transferred from the
Department of Health and Human Services for the federal victim assistance formula grant
program administered by the United States Department of Justice, Office of Justice
Programs, Office for Victims of Crime pursuant to the federal Victims of Crime Act of
1984.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($344,800) ($344,800)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($344,800) ($344,800)
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the increased cost of contracted marshal services in Lincoln
and Somerset counties.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $260,000 $260,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $260,000 $260,000
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding to cover the volume increase in documents signed by justices
of the peace.
Page 173 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $62,598 $62,598
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $62,598 $62,598
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for a volume increase in guardian ad litem, interpreter and
mental health examiner services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $490,000 $490,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $490,000 $490,000
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Continues 2 limited-period Court Appointed Special Advocate Legal Services
Advisor positions, previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 17, through June 12,
2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $337,446 $340,582
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $337,446 $340,582
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Child Protective and Juvenile Process Specialist
position, previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 17, through June 12, 2027 and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $53,949 $54,421
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $53,949 $54,421
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $125,881 $126,981
All Other $1,169 $1,180
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $127,050 $128,161
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Continues 5 limited-period Law Clerk positions, previously continued by Public
Law 2023, chapter 17, through June 12, 2027 and provides funding for related All Other
costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $254,402 $263,700
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $254,402 $263,700
Page 174 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $381,588 $395,535
All Other $3,545 $3,675
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $385,133 $399,210
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Continues 2 limited-period Service Center/Violations Bureau Assistant Clerk
positions, previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 17, through June 12, 2027
and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $197,820 $200,914
All Other $1,838 $1,866
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $199,658 $202,780
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Assistant Clerk position, previously continued by
Public Law 2023, chapter 17, through June 12, 2027 and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $100,198 $104,567
All Other $931 $971
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $101,129 $105,538
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the increased cost of legal research.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $40,961 $40,961
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $40,961 $40,961
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Continues 2 limited-period Assistant Clerk positions, previously continued by
Public Law 2023, chapter 17, through June 12, 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $183,959 $192,556
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $183,959 $192,556
COURTS - SUPREME, SUPERIOR AND DISTRICT 0063
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $829,756 $851,259
All Other $4,873,143 $4,297,198
__________ __________
Page 175 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,702,899 $5,148,457
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $125,881 $126,981
All Other ($343,631) ($343,620)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($217,750) ($216,639)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $802,030 $829,513
All Other ($980,190) ($979,608)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($178,160) ($150,095)
Judicial - Debt Service Z097
Initiative: Provides funding for increased debt service costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,836,355 $7,841,837
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,836,355 $7,841,837
JUDICIAL - DEBT SERVICE Z097
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,836,355 $7,841,837
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,836,355 $7,841,837
Maine Civil Legal Services Fund Z367
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for civil legal services for persons unable to afford a
lawyer by providing additional funds available for distribution by the Civil Legal Services
Fund Commission pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 4, section 18-A, subsection
1.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,000,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,000,000 $0
MAINE CIVIL LEGAL SERVICES FUND Z367
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,000,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,000,000 $0
Page 176 - 132LR2409(17)

JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $11,539,254 $12,990,294
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ($217,750) ($216,639)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($178,160) ($150,095)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $11,143,344 $12,623,560
Sec. A-23. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
LABOR, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Labor 0030
Initiative: Transfers 11 Hearings Examiner positions, one Public Service Manager I
position and one Public Service Manager II position from the Employment Security
Services program, Federal Expenditures Fund to the Administration - Labor program,
Other Special Revenue Funds.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Personal Services $1,591,301 $1,685,699
All Other $111,906 $114,163
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,703,207 $1,799,862
Administration - Labor 0030
Initiative: Establishes 4 Hearings Officer positions effective January 1, 2026 and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $235,132 $507,020
All Other $28,350 $34,848
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $263,482 $541,868
Administration - Labor 0030
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service Manager
I position to a Public Service Manager II position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $793 $821
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $793 $821
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $9,476 $9,859
All Other $226 $236
Page 177 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,702 $10,095
ADMINISTRATION - LABOR 0030
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $793 $821
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $793 $821
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 17.000 17.000
Personal Services $1,835,909 $2,202,578
All Other $140,482 $149,247
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,976,391 $2,351,825
Blind and Visually Impaired - Division for the 0126
Initiative: Establishes 3 limited-period Assistive Technology Specialist positions and
provides funding for related All Other costs. These positions end on June 19, 2027.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $317,913 $342,696
All Other $30,837 $31,433
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $348,750 $374,129
Blind and Visually Impaired - Division for the 0126
Initiative: Provides funding for assistive devices and services for individuals who are blind
or visually impaired.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $200,000 $200,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $200,000 $200,000
BLIND AND VISUALLY IMPAIRED - DIVISION FOR THE 0126
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $200,000 $200,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $200,000 $200,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $317,913 $342,696
All Other $30,837 $31,433
__________ __________
Page 178 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $348,750 $374,129
Employment Security Services 0245
Initiative: Reduces funding in the Trade Allowances Federal Expenditures Fund account to
align allocation with available resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($3,993,260) ($3,993,260)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($3,993,260) ($3,993,260)
Employment Security Services 0245
Initiative: Transfers 11 Hearings Examiner positions, one Public Service Manager I
position and one Public Service Manager II position from the Employment Security
Services program, Federal Expenditures Fund to the Administration - Labor program,
Other Special Revenue Funds.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (13.000) (13.000)
Personal Services ($1,591,301) ($1,685,699)
All Other ($16,059) ($17,017)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($1,607,360) ($1,702,716)
Employment Security Services 0245
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocation with anticipated revenues in the Special
Administrative Account Other Special Revenue Funds account.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $252,500 $252,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $252,500 $252,500
Employment Security Services 0245
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocation with anticipated revenues in the
Unemployment Program Administrative Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,525,000 $2,525,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,525,000 $2,525,000
Employment Security Services 0245
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 2 Secretary Legal positions
to Secretary Associate Legal positions.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $7,700 $8,553
All Other $77 $85
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $7,777 $8,638
Page 179 - 132LR2409(17)

EMPLOYMENT SECURITY SERVICES 0245
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (13.000) (13.000)
Personal Services ($1,591,301) ($1,685,699)
All Other ($4,009,319) ($4,010,277)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($5,600,620) ($5,695,976)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $7,700 $8,553
All Other $2,777,577 $2,777,585
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,785,277 $2,786,138
Employment Services Activity 0852
Initiative: Establishes baseline allocation in the Employment Services - Jobs and Recovery
Support Other Special Revenue Funds account.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Employment Services Activity 0852
Initiative: Provides funding to increase the hours of one CareerCenter Consultant position
from 27 hours to 80 hours biweekly. This initiative also provides funding for related All
Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.500 0.500
Personal Services $58,889 $62,719
All Other $1,883 $2,006
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $60,772 $64,725
Employment Services Activity 0852
Initiative: Reduces allocation in the Direct Delivery Services Other Special Revenue Funds
account to align with available resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($14,706) ($14,706)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($14,706) ($14,706)
Employment Services Activity 0852
Initiative: Establishes baseline allocation in the Targeted Workforce Investment program.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 180 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
EMPLOYMENT SERVICES ACTIVITY 0852
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.500 0.500
Personal Services $58,889 $62,719
All Other $2,383 $2,506
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $61,272 $65,225
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($13,706) ($13,706)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($13,706) ($13,706)
Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund Z383
Initiative: Provides funding to increase the hours of one Office Associate II position from
73 hours to 80 hours biweekly. This initiative also provides funding for related All Other
costs.
PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE 2025-26 2026-27
INSURANCE FUND
Personal Services $6,944 $6,493
All Other $152 $143
__________ __________
PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE $7,096 $6,636
INSURANCE FUND TOTAL
Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund Z383
Initiative: Establishes 3 Labor and Safety Inspector positions effective January 1, 2026 and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE 2025-26 2026-27
INSURANCE FUND
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $148,152 $319,119
All Other $29,430 $33,206
__________ __________
Page 181 - 132LR2409(17)

PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE $177,582 $352,325
INSURANCE FUND TOTAL
PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE INSURANCE FUND Z383
PROGRAM SUMMARY
PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE 2025-26 2026-27
INSURANCE FUND
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $155,096 $325,612
All Other $29,582 $33,349
__________ __________
PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE $184,678 $358,961
INSURANCE FUND TOTAL
Regulation and Enforcement 0159
Initiative: Provides funding for appeal hearings on wage and hour violation decisions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,000 $25,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $25,000 $25,000
Regulation and Enforcement 0159
Initiative: Provides funding for information technology support for the Bureau of Labor
Standards case management system.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $75,000 $75,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $75,000 $75,000
Regulation and Enforcement 0159
Initiative: Provides funding for the collection of labor law fines and penalties.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $50,000 $50,000
REGULATION AND ENFORCEMENT 0159
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $150,000 $150,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $150,000 $150,000
Rehabilitation Services 0799
Initiative: Provides funding for increased costs and demand for assistive technology for
individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing.
Page 182 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $142,479 $142,479
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $142,479 $142,479
Rehabilitation Services 0799
Initiative: Provides funding for contractual services to assist individuals who are deaf, hard
of hearing or late deafened in gaining full and equitable access to community services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $107,000 $107,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $107,000 $107,000
Rehabilitation Services 0799
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of 3 Rehabilitation Counselor II positions from 67% Federal
Expenditures Fund and 33% Other Special Revenue Funds to 100% Federal Expenditures
Fund.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $98,646 $105,640
All Other $993 $1,064
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $99,639 $106,704
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($98,646) ($105,640)
All Other ($993) ($1,064)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($99,639) ($106,704)
Rehabilitation Services 0799
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Rehabilitation Services Manager position and one
limited-period Rehabilitation Counselor I position previously continued by Public Law
2023, chapter 643 and provides one-time funding for related All Other costs. These
positions end June 19, 2027.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $203,941 $220,153
All Other $1,243,279 $1,243,443
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,447,220 $1,463,596
Rehabilitation Services 0799
Initiative: Continues 2 limited-period Rehabilitation Assistant positions, previously
established by Public Law 2023, chapter 412, through June 19, 2027. This initiative also
provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $153,354 $164,060
Page 183 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $1,530 $1,637
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $154,884 $165,697
REHABILITATION SERVICES 0799
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $107,000 $107,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $107,000 $107,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $455,941 $489,853
All Other $1,245,802 $1,246,144
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,701,743 $1,735,997
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($98,646) ($105,640)
All Other $141,486 $141,415
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $42,840 $35,775
Workforce Research Z164
Initiative: Establishes one Workforce Data Analyst position and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $89,643 $96,005
All Other $7,550 $7,550
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $97,193 $103,555
Workforce Research Z164
Initiative: Reduces allocation in the Workforce Research Special Projects Other Special
Revenue Funds account to align with available resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($49,379) ($49,379)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($49,379) ($49,379)
Workforce Research Z164
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Statistical Program
Supervisor position to a Principal Economic Research Analyst position.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 184 - 132LR2409(17)

Personal Services $20,329 $22,722
All Other $295 $329
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $20,624 $23,051
WORKFORCE RESEARCH Z164
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $89,643 $96,005
All Other $7,550 $7,550
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $97,193 $103,555
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $20,329 $22,722
All Other $295 $329
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $20,624 $23,051
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($49,379) ($49,379)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($49,379) ($49,379)
LABOR, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $554,986 $561,376
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ($3,468,231) ($3,497,574)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $4,741,423 $5,110,653
PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE $184,678 $358,961
INSURANCE FUND
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $2,012,856 $2,533,416
Sec. A-24. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
LEGISLATURE
Legislature 0081
Initiative: Continues one Executive Assistant, one Legislative Aide, 2 Legislative Policy
and one Calendar Clerk Assistant limited-period positions through June 19, 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $693,898 $706,691
Page 185 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $693,898 $706,691
Legislature 0081
Initiative: Adjusts appropriations to fund the Advisory Committee on the Fund to Address
PFAS Contamination.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,500 $4,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,500 $4,500
Legislature 0081
Initiative: Appropriates funds on an ongoing basis for technology costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $422,126 $432,331
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $422,126 $432,331
Legislature 0081
Initiative: Adjusts appropriations to increase the number of weeks of one Executive
Secretary position from 42 weeks to 52 weeks and adjusts the position count for the position
from 0.808 FTE to one Legislative Count position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT (0.808) (0.808)
Personal Services $12,563 $13,203
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $12,563 $13,203
LEGISLATURE 0081
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT (0.808) (0.808)
Personal Services $706,461 $719,894
All Other $426,626 $436,831
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,133,087 $1,156,725
Study Commissions - Funding 0444
Initiative: Adjusts appropriations to fund the Advisory Committee on the Fund to Address
PFAS Contamination.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($4,500) ($4,500)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($4,500) ($4,500)
Page 186 - 132LR2409(17)

STUDY COMMISSIONS - FUNDING 0444
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($4,500) ($4,500)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($4,500) ($4,500)
LEGISLATURE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $1,128,587 $1,152,225
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $1,128,587 $1,152,225
Sec. A-25. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
LIBRARY, MAINE STATE
Imagination Library of Maine Program Z338
Initiative: Provides funding for the ongoing costs associated with the Imagination Library
of Maine Program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $100,000
Imagination Library of Maine Program Z338
Initiative: Provides funding for the Imagination Library of Maine Fund Other Special
Revenue Funds account.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
IMAGINATION LIBRARY OF MAINE PROGRAM Z338
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $100,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Page 187 - 132LR2409(17)

Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Provides funding for anticipated increases in Federal Expenditures Fund
amounts available in the Maine State Library.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $130,797 $130,797
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $130,797 $130,797
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Reduces funding in the Maine State Library's Private Support Other Special
Revenue Funds account.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($167,905) ($167,905)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($167,905) ($167,905)
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Provides funding for the Maine State Library's Reading Round-Up Conference
Other Special Revenue Funds account.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,400 $10,400
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $10,400 $10,400
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Provides funding for the Maine State Library's Talking Books Other Special
Revenue Funds account.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Reallocates 10% of one Librarian-Specialized Services position between Federal
Expenditures Fund accounts and provides funding for operational needs in the Read World,
Real Science project funded by the National Aeronautics and Space Administration.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $11,915 $11,915
All Other $34,465 $34,465
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $46,380 $46,380
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Provides funding for the Maine State Library's Collections Preservation Other
Special Revenue Funds account.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 188 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Librarian-Specialized Services position
established through Public Law 2021, chapter 635 and provides funding for related All
Other costs. This position ends on June 19, 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $127,851 $137,272
All Other $6,069 $6,069
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $133,920 $143,341
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Provides funding for the cost increase of van delivery services in the Maine State
Library.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $75,000 $75,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $75,000 $75,000
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Librarian III position
to a Librarian Specialized Services position.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $24,058 $7,523
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $24,058 $7,523
MAINE STATE LIBRARY 0217
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $127,851 $137,272
All Other $81,069 $81,069
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $208,920 $218,341
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $35,973 $19,438
All Other $165,262 $165,262
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $201,235 $184,700
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 189 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other ($156,505) ($156,505)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($156,505) ($156,505)
Statewide Library Information System 0185
Initiative: Provides funding for the cloud library cost increase in the Maine State Library.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,000 $25,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $25,000 $25,000
Statewide Library Information System 0185
Initiative: Provides funding for the large print program cost increase in the Maine State
Library.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,000 $10,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,000 $10,000
STATEWIDE LIBRARY INFORMATION SYSTEM 0185
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $35,000 $35,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $35,000 $35,000
LIBRARY, MAINE STATE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $343,920 $353,341
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $201,235 $184,700
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($156,005) ($156,005)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $389,150 $382,036
Sec. A-26. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MARINE RESOURCES, DEPARTMENT OF
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Provides funding for contractual custodial services at the department's West
Boothbay Harbor facility in the Bureau of Marine Science program, General Fund. This
initiative also reduces All Other funding in the Bureau of Policy and Management program,
General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $95,000 $95,000
Page 190 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $95,000 $95,000
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Provides funding to expand a coastal ecosystem survey.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $31,296 $31,296
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $31,296 $31,296
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Provides funding to expand the annual scallop survey.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $46,944 $46,944
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $46,944 $46,944
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Marine Resource Scientist II position and 2
limited-period Marine Resource Scientist I positions previously continued by Public Law
2023, chapter 17 and 2 limited-period Marine Resource Specialist positions, 3 limited-
period Office Associate II positions and one limited-period Office Specialist I Supervisor
position previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 643 through June 19, 2027.
This initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $905,172 $973,245
All Other $96,835 $99,777
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,002,007 $1,073,022
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Management Analyst I position and one limited-
period Public Service Coordinator I position, previously continued by Financial Order
003621 F5, through June 19, 2027. This initiative also provides funding for related All
Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $233,760 $248,279
All Other $14,274 $14,901
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $248,034 $263,180
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Marine Resource Scientist II position, previously
continued by Financial Order 003637 F5, through June 19, 2027. This initiative also
provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $120,752 $130,369
Page 191 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $11,631 $12,047
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $132,383 $142,416
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Continues 5 limited-period Marine Resource Scientist I positions, previously
continued by Financial Order 003639 F5, through June 19, 2027. This initiative also
provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $522,167 $562,853
All Other $54,631 $56,389
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $576,798 $619,242
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Marine Resource Scientist IV position, 3 limited-
period Marine Resource Scientist III positions, 3 limited-period Marine Resource Scientist
II positions and one limited-period Office Associate II position, previously continued by
Financial Order 003640 F5, through June 19, 2027. This initiative also provides funding
for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,045,729 $1,122,005
All Other $96,495 $99,791
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,142,224 $1,221,796
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Marine Resource Scientist I position and one
limited-period Marine Resource Specialist position, previously continued by Financial
Order 003642 F5, through June 19, 2027. This initiative also provides funding for related
All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $198,713 $214,504
All Other $21,414 $22,096
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $220,127 $236,600
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Continues 3 limited-period Marine Resource Specialist positions and 2 limited-
period Marine Resource Scientist II positions, previously continued by Financial Order
003643 F5, through June 19, 2027. This initiative also provides funding for related All
Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $541,719 $583,922
All Other $55,476 $57,300
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $597,195 $641,222
Page 192 - 132LR2409(17)

Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Marine Resource Scientist I position, previously
continued by Financial Order 003644 F5, through June 19, 2027. This initiative also
provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $106,561 $114,781
All Other $11,018 $11,373
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $117,579 $126,154
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Reduces allocation to align with available resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($43,371) ($43,371)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($43,371) ($43,371)
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace the galvanized steel shroud on the recovery
unit at the West Boothbay Harbor laboratory.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $100,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $0
BUREAU OF MARINE SCIENCE 0027
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $95,000 $95,000
Capital Expenditures $100,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $195,000 $95,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,674,573 $3,949,958
All Other $361,774 $373,674
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $4,036,347 $4,323,632
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $34,869 $34,869
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $34,869 $34,869
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Page 193 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Establishes one Management Analyst II position to provide administrative
support for aquaculture leasing and provides funding for related All Other costs in the
Bureau of Public Health program, General Fund. This initiative also reduces All Other
funding in the Bureau of Policy and Management program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($108,631) ($116,504)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($108,631) ($116,504)
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Establishes one Marine Resource Management Coordinator position dedicated
to discharge leases in the aquaculture division and provides funding for related All Other
costs in the Bureau of Public Health program, General Fund. This initiative also reduces
All Other funding in the Bureau of Policy and Management program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($127,346) ($136,945)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($127,346) ($136,945)
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Public Service Coordinator II position
previously continued by Financial Order 003620 F5 to provide pathology services. This
initiative also provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $151,001 $162,393
All Other $12,938 $13,431
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $163,939 $175,824
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Public Service Coordinator II position
previously established by financial order in fiscal year 2024-25. This initiative also
provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $177,971 $185,285
All Other $14,104 $14,420
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $192,075 $199,705
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Provides funding for contractual custodial services at the department's West
Boothbay Harbor facility in the Bureau of Marine Science program, General Fund. This
initiative also reduces All Other funding in the Bureau of Policy and Management program,
General Fund.
Page 194 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($95,000) ($95,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($95,000) ($95,000)
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Office Specialist II position previously established
by financial order in fiscal year 2024-25 through June 19, 2027 and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $89,002 $96,028
All Other $10,259 $10,563
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $99,261 $106,591
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Transfers one Office Specialist I position from the Marine Patrol - Bureau of
program, General Fund to the Bureau of Policy and Management program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $84,623 $91,310
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $84,623 $91,310
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Management Analyst I position and one limited-
period Public Service Coordinator I position, previously continued by Financial Order
003621 F5, through June 19, 2027. This initiative also provides funding for related All
Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,296 $8,296
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,296 $8,296
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Transfers one Public Service Manager II position from the Bureau of Policy and
Management program, Other Special Revenue Funds to the Bureau of Public Health
program, General Fund. This initiative also reduces All Other funding in the Bureau of
Policy and Management program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($214,488) ($226,437)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($214,488) ($226,437)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Page 195 - 132LR2409(17)

Personal Services ($147,509) ($159,458)
All Other ($71,014) ($70,934)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($218,523) ($230,392)
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Continues 2 limited-period Marine Resource Scientist II positions and one
limited-period Marine Resource Scientist III position previously continued by Financial
Order 003622 F5 and transfers All Other to Personal Services to fund the positions. These
positions end on June 19, 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $384,387 $415,855
All Other ($384,387) ($415,855)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Marine Resource Management Coordinator
position previously continued by Financial Order 003623 F5 through June 19, 2027 and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $138,460 $148,854
All Other $12,397 $12,846
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $150,857 $161,700
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Provides funding for additional services required from the Department of the
Attorney General.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $148,889 $160,156
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $148,889 $160,156
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Continues 3 limited-period Marine Resource Specialist positions, previously
continued and reorganized by Public Law 2023, chapter 643, through June 19, 2027 and
transfers All Other to Personal Services to fund the positions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $284,549 $306,614
All Other ($284,549) ($306,614)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Page 196 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Continues 2 limited-period Marine Resource Scientist I positions, previously
continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 643, through June 19, 2027 and transfers All Other
to Personal Services to fund the positions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $223,996 $240,915
All Other ($223,996) ($240,915)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent one Marine Resource Management Coordinator
position previously continued by Financial Order CV0719 F5 and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $147,506 $153,631
All Other $12,787 $13,052
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $160,293 $166,683
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Transfers one Marine Resource Management Coordinator position from the
Bureau of Policy and Management program, General Fund to the Sea Run Fisheries and
Habitat program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($124,766) ($134,429)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($124,766) ($134,429)
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Establishes one Marine Resource Management Coordinator position to assist in
conducting aquaculture lease hearings and provides funding for related All Other costs in
the Bureau of Public Health program, General Fund. This initiative also reduces All Other
funding in the Bureau of Policy and Management program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($127,346) ($136,945)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($127,346) ($136,945)
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Reduces allocation to align with available resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($34,013) ($34,013)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($34,013) ($34,013)
Page 197 - 132LR2409(17)

Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Transfers 3 Marine Resource Management Coordinator positions, one Marine
Resource Scientist I position, one Marine Resource Scientist II position, one Marine
Resource Scientist III position, one Public Service Coordinator II position and one Senior
Aquaculture Inspector position from the Bureau of Policy and Management program,
General Fund to the Bureau of Public Health program, General Fund. This initiative also
transfers related All Other for the aquaculture division from the Bureau of Policy and
Management program, General Fund to the Bureau of Public Health program, General
Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (8.000) (8.000)
Personal Services ($995,735) ($1,068,889)
All Other ($17,800) ($17,800)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($1,013,535) ($1,086,689)
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Transfers one Secretary Specialist position from the Bureau of Policy and
Management program to the Bureau of Public Health program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($102,162) ($106,407)
All Other ($4,414) ($4,598)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($106,576) ($111,005)
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Establishes one Marine Resource Scientist I position in the aquaculture
inspection division and provides funding for related All Other costs in the Bureau of Public
Health program, General Fund. This initiative also reduces All Other funding in the Bureau
of Policy and Management program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($112,709) ($120,929)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($112,709) ($120,929)
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Establishes one Marine Resource Scientist I position to conduct aquaculture
lease site visits and provides funding for related All Other costs in the Bureau of Public
Health program, General Fund. This initiative also reduces All Other funding in the Bureau
of Policy and Management program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($112,709) ($120,929)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($112,709) ($120,929)
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Page 198 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Provide funding for the approved reorganization of one Marine Resource
Management Coordinator position to a Public Service Coordinator II position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $17,470 $18,877
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $17,470 $18,877
BUREAU OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT 0258
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (8.000) (8.000)
Personal Services ($125,476) ($129,747)
All Other ($1,651,776) ($1,766,421)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($1,777,252) ($1,896,168)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $147,506 $153,631
All Other $12,787 $13,052
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $160,293 $166,683
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 0.000
Personal Services $306,763 $326,695
All Other ($59,743) ($58,285)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $247,020 $268,410
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: Establishes one Management Analyst II position to provide administrative
support for aquaculture leasing and provides funding for related All Other costs in the
Bureau of Public Health program, General Fund. This initiative also reduces All Other
funding in the Bureau of Policy and Management program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $102,483 $110,356
All Other $6,148 $6,148
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $108,631 $116,504
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: Establishes one Marine Resource Management Coordinator position dedicated
to discharge leases in the aquaculture division and provides funding for related All Other
Page 199 - 132LR2409(17)

costs in the Bureau of Public Health program, General Fund. This initiative also reduces
All Other funding in the Bureau of Policy and Management program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $121,198 $130,797
All Other $6,148 $6,148
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $127,346 $136,945
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: Transfers one Public Service Manager II position from the Bureau of Policy and
Management program, Other Special Revenue Funds to the Bureau of Public Health
program, General Fund. This initiative also reduces All Other funding in the Bureau of
Policy and Management program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $147,509 $159,458
All Other $66,979 $66,979
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $214,488 $226,437
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: Establishes one Marine Resource Management Coordinator position to assist in
conducting aquaculture lease hearings and provides funding for related All Other costs in
the Bureau of Public Health program, General Fund. This initiative also reduces All Other
funding in the Bureau of Policy and Management program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $121,198 $130,797
All Other $6,148 $6,148
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $127,346 $136,945
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: Transfers 3 Marine Resource Management Coordinator positions, one Marine
Resource Scientist I position, one Marine Resource Scientist II position, one Marine
Resource Scientist III position, one Public Service Coordinator II position and one Senior
Aquaculture Inspector position from the Bureau of Policy and Management program,
General Fund to the Bureau of Public Health program, General Fund. This initiative also
transfers related All Other for the aquaculture division from the Bureau of Policy and
Management program, General Fund to the Bureau of Public Health program, General
Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.000 8.000
Personal Services $995,735 $1,068,889
All Other $17,800 $17,800
__________ __________
Page 200 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,013,535 $1,086,689
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: Transfers one Secretary Specialist position from the Bureau of Policy and
Management program to the Bureau of Public Health program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $102,162 $106,407
All Other $4,414 $4,598
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $106,576 $111,005
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: Establishes one Marine Resource Scientist I position in the aquaculture
inspection division and provides funding for related All Other costs in the Bureau of Public
Health program, General Fund. This initiative also reduces All Other funding in the Bureau
of Policy and Management program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $106,561 $114,781
All Other $6,148 $6,148
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $112,709 $120,929
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: Establishes one Marine Resource Scientist I position to conduct aquaculture
lease site visits and provides funding for related All Other costs in the Bureau of Public
Health program, General Fund. This initiative also reduces All Other funding in the Bureau
of Policy and Management program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $106,561 $114,781
All Other $6,148 $6,148
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $112,709 $120,929
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 2 Microbiologist II positions
to Marine Resource Scientist II positions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $14,467 $19,508
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $14,467 $19,508
BUREAU OF PUBLIC HEALTH Z154
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 201 - 132LR2409(17)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 14.000 14.000
Personal Services $1,715,712 $1,849,367
All Other $115,519 $115,519
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,831,231 $1,964,886
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $102,162 $106,407
All Other $4,414 $4,598
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $106,576 $111,005
Marine Patrol - Bureau of 0029
Initiative: Transfers one Office Specialist I position from the Marine Patrol - Bureau of
program, General Fund to the Bureau of Policy and Management program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($84,623) ($91,310)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($84,623) ($91,310)
Marine Patrol - Bureau of 0029
Initiative: Reduces allocation to align with available resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($31,133) ($31,133)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($31,133) ($31,133)
MARINE PATROL - BUREAU OF 0029
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($84,623) ($91,310)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($84,623) ($91,310)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($31,133) ($31,133)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($31,133) ($31,133)
Sea Run Fisheries and Habitat Z295
Initiative: Transfers one Marine Resource Management Coordinator position from the
Bureau of Policy and Management program, General Fund to the Sea Run Fisheries and
Habitat program, General Fund.
Page 202 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $124,766 $134,429
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $124,766 $134,429
SEA RUN FISHERIES AND HABITAT Z295
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $124,766 $134,429
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $124,766 $134,429
MARINE RESOURCES, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $289,122 $206,837
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $4,196,640 $4,490,315
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $357,332 $383,151
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $4,843,094 $5,080,303
Sec. A-27. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MARITIME ACADEMY, MAINE
Maine Maritime Academy Scholarship Fund - Casino Z167
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocations with dedicated revenue as projected by the
March 2024 Revenue Forecasting Committee Report.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,958 $8,015
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,958 $8,015
Maine Maritime Academy Scholarship Fund - Casino Z167
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($9,267) ($8,299)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($9,267) ($8,299)
MAINE MARITIME ACADEMY SCHOLARSHIP FUND - CASINO Z167
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 203 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other ($5,309) ($284)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($5,309) ($284)
Maritime Academy - Operations 0035
Initiative: Provides one-time funding in fiscal year 2025-26 and fiscal year 2026-27 only
for paid family and medical leave premiums for eligible Maine Maritime Academy
employees in compliance with state law.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $260,000 $260,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $260,000 $260,000
Maritime Academy - Operations 0035
Initiative: Provides additional funding for annual inflationary cost increases associated with
continuation of current Maine Maritime Academy operations.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $507,027 $1,034,335
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $507,027 $1,034,335
MARITIME ACADEMY - OPERATIONS 0035
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $767,027 $1,294,335
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $767,027 $1,294,335
MARITIME ACADEMY, MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $767,027 $1,294,335
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($5,309) ($284)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $761,718 $1,294,051
Sec. A-28. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MUSEUM, MAINE STATE
Maine State Museum 0180
Initiative: Establishes one Museum Technician III position and provides funding for related
All Other costs to support essential technology operations associated with virtual education
programs, in-gallery digital educational interactive displays, school group scheduling,
visitor admissions and visitor demographic data collection.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 204 - 132LR2409(17)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $89,765 $96,132
All Other $6,069 $6,069
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $95,834 $102,201
Maine State Museum 0180
Initiative: Establishes one limited-period Museum Technician III position through June 19,
2027 and provides funding for related All Other costs to serve as assistant exhibits
preparator.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $89,765 $96,132
All Other $6,069 $6,069
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $95,834 $102,201
MAINE STATE MUSEUM 0180
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $179,530 $192,264
All Other $12,138 $12,138
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $191,668 $204,402
MUSEUM, MAINE STATE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $191,668 $204,402
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $191,668 $204,402
Sec. A-29. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
OFFICE OF AFFORDABLE HEALTH CARE
Office of Affordable Health Care Z320
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for renovations, furniture and technology costs
required to establish a leased space necessary for the continued operations of the Office of
Affordable Health Care. This initiative also provides ongoing funding for leased space rent
costs and contracted services necessary to monitor compliance with the provider price
oversight program envisioned in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 3122.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $47,200 $47,200
Capital Expenditures $55,000 $0
__________ __________
Page 205 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $102,200 $47,200
OFFICE OF AFFORDABLE HEALTH CARE Z320
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $47,200 $47,200
Capital Expenditures $55,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $102,200 $47,200
Sec. A-30. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PERMANENT COMMISSION ON THE STATUS OF RACIAL, INDIGENOUS
AND TRIBAL POPULATIONS
Racial, Indigenous and Tribal Populations Z319
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service
Coordinator I position from range 24 to range 28 and one Public Service Coordinator I
position from range 26 to range 28.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $20,090 $21,722
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,090 $21,722
RACIAL, INDIGENOUS AND TRIBAL POPULATIONS Z319
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $20,090 $21,722
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,090 $21,722
Sec. A-31. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PROFESSIONAL AND FINANCIAL REGULATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Engineers - State Board of Licensure for Professional 0369
Initiative: Provides funding for cost increases for services provided by the Department of
the Attorney General and related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,263 $6,154
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,263 $6,154
Engineers - State Board of Licensure for Professional 0369
Initiative: Provides funding to align with anticipated expenses.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $24,202 $10,244
Page 206 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $24,202 $10,244
Engineers - State Board of Licensure for Professional 0369
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to align with anticipated expenses.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,175 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $7,175 $0
ENGINEERS - STATE BOARD OF LICENSURE FOR PROFESSIONAL 0369
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $35,640 $16,398
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $35,640 $16,398
Financial Institutions - Bureau of 0093
Initiative: Provides funding to establish a career ladder within the Bureau of Financial
Institutions Bank Examiner job classification series.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $146,182 $167,700
All Other $1,425 $1,549
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $147,607 $169,249
Financial Institutions - Bureau of 0093
Initiative: Establishes one part-time Office Specialist I position and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.500 0.500
Personal Services $41,965 $45,819
All Other $280 $306
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $42,245 $46,125
Financial Institutions - Bureau of 0093
Initiative: Provides funding to increase the hours of one Bank Examiner position from 57
hours to 80 hours biweekly and for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $27,511 $28,635
All Other $184 $191
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $27,695 $28,826
FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS - BUREAU OF 0093
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 207 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.500 0.500
Personal Services $215,658 $242,154
All Other $1,889 $2,046
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $217,547 $244,200
Insurance - Bureau of 0092
Initiative: Provides funding for cost increases for services provided by the Department of
the Attorney General and related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $48,032 $84,759
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $48,032 $84,759
INSURANCE - BUREAU OF 0092
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $48,032 $84,759
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $48,032 $84,759
Licensure in Medicine - Board of 0376
Initiative: Provides funding for cost increases for services provided by the Department of
the Attorney General and related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $32,061 $54,661
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $32,061 $54,661
Licensure in Medicine - Board of 0376
Initiative: Provides funding to align with anticipated expenses.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $75,838 $85,949
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $75,838 $85,949
Licensure in Medicine - Board of 0376
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to align with anticipated expenses.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $20,223 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $20,223 $0
LICENSURE IN MEDICINE - BOARD OF 0376
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 208 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $128,122 $140,610
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $128,122 $140,610
Nursing - Board of 0372
Initiative: Establishes one Office Specialist I position and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $83,465 $90,097
All Other $7,333 $5,594
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $90,798 $95,691
Nursing - Board of 0372
Initiative: Provides funding for cost increases for services provided by the Department of
the Attorney General and related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $53,372 $69,250
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $53,372 $69,250
Nursing - Board of 0372
Initiative: Provides funding to align with anticipated expenses.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $22,848 $22,848
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $22,848 $22,848
NURSING - BOARD OF 0372
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $83,465 $90,097
All Other $83,553 $97,692
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $167,018 $187,789
Office of Professional and Occupational Regulation 0352
Initiative: Provides funding for cost increases for services provided by the Department of
the Attorney General and related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $220,732 $297,398
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $220,732 $297,398
Page 209 - 132LR2409(17)

OFFICE OF PROFESSIONAL AND OCCUPATIONAL REGULATION 0352
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $220,732 $297,398
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $220,732 $297,398
Optometry - Board of 0385
Initiative: Provides funding to increase the hours of one Office Specialist II position from
60 hours to 80 hours biweekly and for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $23,723 $24,269
All Other $931 $953
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $24,654 $25,222
Optometry - Board of 0385
Initiative: Provides funding for cost increases for services provided by the Department of
the Attorney General and related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $663
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $663
Optometry - Board of 0385
Initiative: Provides funding to align with anticipated expenses.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,170 $6,170
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $6,170 $6,170
OPTOMETRY - BOARD OF 0385
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $23,723 $24,269
All Other $7,101 $7,786
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $30,824 $32,055
Osteopathic Licensure - Board of 0383
Initiative: Establishes one Office Specialist II position and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $87,844 $94,815
All Other $8,742 $7,071
Page 210 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $96,586 $101,886
Osteopathic Licensure - Board of 0383
Initiative: Provides funding for cost increases for services provided by the Department of
the Attorney General and related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $15,462 $26,185
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $15,462 $26,185
Osteopathic Licensure - Board of 0383
Initiative: Provides funding to align with anticipated expenses.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,863 $3,040
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,863 $3,040
OSTEOPATHIC LICENSURE - BOARD OF 0383
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $87,844 $94,815
All Other $27,067 $36,296
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $114,911 $131,111
PROFESSIONAL AND FINANCIAL
REGULATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $962,826 $1,134,320
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $962,826 $1,134,320
Sec. A-32. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PROPERTY TAX REVIEW, STATE BOARD OF
Property Tax Review - State Board of 0357
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Public Service Manager II position, previously
established by Public Law 2021, chapter 635, through June 18, 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $166,248 $167,999
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $166,248 $167,999
Page 211 - 132LR2409(17)

PROPERTY TAX REVIEW - STATE BOARD OF 0357
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $166,248 $167,999
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $166,248 $167,999
Sec. A-33. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC DEFENSE SERVICES, MAINE COMMISSION ON
Maine Commission on Public Defense Services Z112
Initiative: Reduces funding to align allocations with projected available resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($750,000) ($750,000)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($750,000) ($750,000)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other ($1,499,500) ($1,499,500)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE ($1,499,500) ($1,499,500)
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Maine Commission on Public Defense Services Z112
Initiative: Provides allocation to align with projected resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
MAINE COMMISSION ON PUBLIC DEFENSE SERVICES Z112
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($750,000) ($750,000)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($750,000) ($750,000)
Page 212 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other ($1,499,500) ($1,499,500)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE ($1,499,500) ($1,499,500)
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
PUBLIC DEFENSE SERVICES, MAINE
COMMISSION ON
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($750,000) ($750,000)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP ($1,499,500) ($1,499,500)
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($2,249,000) ($2,249,000)
Sec. A-34. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
Capitol Police - Bureau of 0101
Initiative: Provides funding to align with anticipated revenues.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $45,000 $45,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $45,000 $45,000
Capitol Police - Bureau of 0101
Initiative: Establishes one limited-period Capitol Police Security Agent position through
June 18, 2027 and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $86,110 $89,792
All Other $19,408 $8,774
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $105,518 $98,566
CAPITOL POLICE - BUREAU OF 0101
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $86,110 $89,792
All Other $19,408 $8,774
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $105,518 $98,566
Page 213 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $45,000 $45,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $45,000 $45,000
Consolidated Emergency Communications Z021
Initiative: Provide funding for an annual subscription for cross-jurisdiction incident
collaboration software.
CONSOLIDATED EMERGENCY 2025-26 2026-27
COMMUNICATIONS FUND
All Other $51,978 $51,978
__________ __________
CONSOLIDATED EMERGENCY $51,978 $51,978
COMMUNICATIONS FUND TOTAL
CONSOLIDATED EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS Z021
PROGRAM SUMMARY
CONSOLIDATED EMERGENCY 2025-26 2026-27
COMMUNICATIONS FUND
All Other $51,978 $51,978
__________ __________
CONSOLIDATED EMERGENCY $51,978 $51,978
COMMUNICATIONS FUND TOTAL
Criminal Justice Academy 0290
Initiative: Provides funding to align with anticipated revenues.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,000 $25,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $25,000 $25,000
Criminal Justice Academy 0290
Initiative: Provides funding for the increase in airport rental costs for the emergency vehicle
operations course conducted as part of the basic law enforcement training program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,000 $6,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,000 $6,000
Criminal Justice Academy 0290
Initiative: Establishes one Paralegal position and provides funding for related All Other
costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $91,463 $97,895
All Other $3,550 $3,550
__________ __________
Page 214 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $95,013 $101,445
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ACADEMY 0290
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $91,463 $97,895
All Other $9,550 $9,550
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $101,013 $107,445
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,000 $25,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $25,000 $25,000
Drug Enforcement Agency 0388
Initiative: Provides funding to align with anticipated revenues.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $750,000 $750,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $750,000 $750,000
DRUG ENFORCEMENT AGENCY 0388
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $750,000 $750,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $750,000 $750,000
Emergency Medical Services 0485
Initiative: Provides funding to align with anticipated revenues.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $422,321 $412,970
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $422,321 $412,970
Emergency Medical Services 0485
Initiative: Establishes one Comprehensive Health Planner II position to support community
paramedicine and critical care programming statewide and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $110,422 $119,306
All Other $4,550 $4,550
__________ __________
Page 215 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $114,972 $123,856
Emergency Medical Services 0485
Initiative: Establishes one Emergency Medical Services Licensing Agent position and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $107,791 $116,122
All Other $4,550 $4,550
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $112,341 $120,672
Emergency Medical Services 0485
Initiative: Continues one limited-period Business Systems Administrator position,
previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 412; one limited-period Health Program
Manager position and 2 limited-period Comprehensive Health Planner II positions,
previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 17; and one Public Service Manager II
position, previously continued by Public Law 2023, chapter 643, through June 19, 2027
and provides funding for related All Other.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $668,734 $714,844
All Other $32,401 $32,610
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $701,135 $747,454
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES 0485
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $218,213 $235,428
All Other $9,100 $9,100
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $227,313 $244,528
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $668,734 $714,844
All Other $454,722 $445,580
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,123,456 $1,160,424
Fire Marshal - Office of 0327
Initiative: Provide one-time funding for the purchase of a new command vehicle.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $1,200,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,200,000 $0
Page 216 - 132LR2409(17)

Fire Marshal - Office of 0327
Initiative: Provides funding for the purchase of 2 hybrid vehicles for the Office of the State
Fire Marshal in each year of the biennium in accordance with the established vehicle
replacement schedule.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $90,000 $90,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $90,000 $90,000
Fire Marshal - Office of 0327
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Office Associate II
position to an Office Specialist II position.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $9,432 $4,013
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,432 $4,013
FIRE MARSHAL - OFFICE OF 0327
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $9,432 $4,013
Capital Expenditures $1,290,000 $90,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,299,432 $94,013
Gambling Control Board Z002
Initiative: Establishes one Auditor II position and provides funding for related All Other
costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $100,589 $108,263
All Other $7,156 $7,156
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $107,745 $115,419
Gambling Control Board Z002
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($284,053) ($75,886)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($284,053) ($75,886)
GAMBLING CONTROL BOARD Z002
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 217 - 132LR2409(17)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $100,589 $108,263
All Other ($276,897) ($68,730)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($176,308) $39,533
Highway Safety DPS 0457
Initiative: Provides funding to align with anticipated revenues.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $650,000 $650,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $650,000 $650,000
Highway Safety DPS 0457
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Contract Grant Manager position and one Director of
Bureau of Highway Safety position from 100% Federal Expenditures Fund to 50% Federal
Expenditures Fund and 50% Highway Fund.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($158,377) ($166,343)
All Other ($1,122) ($1,179)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($159,499) ($167,522)
Highway Safety DPS 0457
Initiative: Establishes one Highway Safety Coordinator position and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $100,589 $108,263
All Other $4,287 $4,341
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $104,876 $112,604
Highway Safety DPS 0457
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to purchase breath-testing devices to be distributed to
various law enforcement agencies around the State.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $299,985 $0
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $299,985 $0
HIGHWAY SAFETY DPS 0457
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services ($57,788) ($58,080)
All Other $653,165 $653,162
Page 218 - 132LR2409(17)

Capital Expenditures $299,985 $0
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $895,362 $595,082
Licensing and Enforcement - Public Safety 0712
Initiative: Provides funding for the State Police weapons and professional licensing unit to
purchase software.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $60,000 $60,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $60,000 $60,000
LICENSING AND ENFORCEMENT - PUBLIC SAFETY 0712
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $60,000 $60,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $60,000 $60,000
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding to align with anticipated revenues.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $633,844 $633,844
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $633,844 $633,844
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $345,033 $345,033
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $345,033 $345,033
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace 2 bomb suits for the State Police bomb
team.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $109,200 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $109,200 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the purchase of one forensic laser for latent
fingerprints.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $16,250 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $16,250 $0
Page 219 - 132LR2409(17)

State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the purchase of a marine sonar device.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $44,070 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $44,070 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the purchase of a throwable robot for the tactical
team.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $13,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $13,000 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace 25 handgun lights.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,794 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,794 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding for a higher cost of fuel for State Police vehicles.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $455,000 $455,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $455,000 $455,000
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for 4 specialized digital cameras.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,400 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,400 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace 26 rifles.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $46,053 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $46,053 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace infrared lasers.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 220 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $0 $64,220
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $64,220
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to purchase 350 plate carriers.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $485,713 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $485,713 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to purchase 350 helmets.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,250 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $250,250 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace 2 ballistic shields.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $15,600 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $15,600 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace 10 sniper rifles.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $35,750 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $35,750 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace 25 ballistic vests.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $30,875 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $30,875 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the purchase of an unmanned aerial vehicle that
can be linked to existing software.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $17,781 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $17,781 $0
Page 221 - 132LR2409(17)

State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the purchase of a 3-dimensional scanner upgrade.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $42,226 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $42,226 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding for increased debt service costs associated with the purchase
of State Police vehicles on a regular vehicle replacement schedule.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $858,416 $1,127,817
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $858,416 $1,127,817
State Police 0291
Initiative: Establishes one State Police Lieutenant position and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $130,462 $139,834
All Other $11,983 $6,995
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $142,445 $146,829
STATE POLICE 0291
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $130,462 $139,834
All Other $2,153,484 $1,654,032
Capital Expenditures $293,877 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,577,823 $1,793,866
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $633,844 $633,844
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $633,844 $633,844
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $345,033 $345,033
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $345,033 $345,033
Page 222 - 132LR2409(17)

Traffic Safety - Commercial Vehicle Enforcement 0715
Initiative: Provides funding to align with anticipated revenues.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $179,175 $179,175
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $179,175 $179,175
TRAFFIC SAFETY - COMMERCIAL VEHICLE ENFORCEMENT 0715
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $179,175 $179,175
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $179,175 $179,175
Turnpike Enforcement 0547
Initiative: Provides funding for the purchase of hybrid vehicles for the State Police
divisions governing: turnpike enforcement, motor vehicle inspection, traffic safety and
commercial vehicle enforcement consistent with an established vehicle replacement
schedule.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $371,000 $371,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $371,000 $371,000
TURNPIKE ENFORCEMENT 0547
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $371,000 $371,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $371,000 $371,000
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $3,071,667 $2,304,405
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $3,651,837 $3,388,525
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $1,839,157 $849,579
CONSOLIDATED EMERGENCY $51,978 $51,978
COMMUNICATIONS FUND
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $8,614,639 $6,594,487
Sec. A-35. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION
Page 223 - 132LR2409(17)

Emergency Services Communication Bureau 0994
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide property leases provided through the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, division of leased space.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $126,276 $134,276
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $126,276 $134,276
Emergency Services Communication Bureau 0994
Initiative: Provides funding for contracted services in the Emergency Services
Communication Bureau.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,998,417 $1,998,417
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,998,417 $1,998,417
EMERGENCY SERVICES COMMUNICATION BUREAU 0994
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,124,693 $2,132,693
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,124,693 $2,132,693
Public Utilities - Administrative Division 0184
Initiative: Establishes one Utility Analyst-Safety Programs Inspector position and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $126,672 $133,006
All Other $7,408 $7,459
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $134,080 $140,465
Public Utilities - Administrative Division 0184
Initiative: Establishes one Utility Analyst position and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $149,069 $161,365
All Other $7,408 $7,459
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $156,477 $168,824
PUBLIC UTILITIES - ADMINISTRATIVE DIVISION 0184
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 224 - 132LR2409(17)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $275,741 $294,371
All Other $14,816 $14,918
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $290,557 $309,289
PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $2,415,250 $2,441,982
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $2,415,250 $2,441,982
Sec. A-36. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
RETIREMENT SYSTEM, MAINE PUBLIC EMPLOYEES
Retirement System - Retirement Allowance Fund 0085
Initiative: Provides funding for benefits for retired Governors and surviving spouses under
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 2, section 1-A.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,339 $30,643
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,339 $30,643
Retirement System - Retirement Allowance Fund 0085
Initiative: Provides one-time funds for the increase in the unfunded actuarial liability as a
result of allowing the service retirement benefits for certain employees within the
Department of Health and Human Services earned under the regular state employee and
teacher plan to be calculated under the 1998 Special Plan effective October 1, 2025.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,855,717 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,855,717 $0
RETIREMENT SYSTEM - RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE FUND 0085
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,864,056 $30,643
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,864,056 $30,643
RETIREMENT SYSTEM, MAINE PUBLIC
EMPLOYEES
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 225 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND $2,864,056 $30,643
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $2,864,056 $30,643
Sec. A-37. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the refresh of computer equipment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $92,005 $0
Capital Expenditures $9,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $101,005 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $80,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $80,000 $0
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: Provides funding for the increase in election ballot printing, postage and other
election costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: Eliminates one part-time Auditor I position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($72,034) ($78,001)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($72,034) ($78,001)
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: Provides funding for a contract programmer to support existing software
applications and future technology modernization.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $212,160 $212,160
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $212,160 $212,160
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Page 226 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Establishes one limited-period Election Security Analyst position through June
30, 2027 and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $128,621 $137,501
All Other $10,058 $2,958
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $138,679 $140,459
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: Provides funding for meetings, travel and supplies for the post-election audits
and training division.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $15,060 $33,300
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $15,060 $33,300
BUREAU OF CORPORATIONS, ELECTIONS AND COMMISSIONS 0692
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services $56,587 $59,500
All Other $829,283 $748,418
Capital Expenditures $9,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $894,870 $807,918
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $80,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $80,000 $0
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $894,870 $807,918
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $80,000 $0
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $974,870 $807,918
Sec. A-38. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
TREASURER OF STATE, OFFICE OF
Administration - Treasury 0022
Initiative: Provides funding to increase levels for the unclaimed property program by 5%
each year for the next 3 years, based upon current expenditures.
Page 227 - 132LR2409(17)

ABANDONED PROPERTY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $22,421 $45,963
__________ __________
ABANDONED PROPERTY FUND TOTAL $22,421 $45,963
ADMINISTRATION - TREASURY 0022
PROGRAM SUMMARY
ABANDONED PROPERTY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $22,421 $45,963
__________ __________
ABANDONED PROPERTY FUND TOTAL $22,421 $45,963
Debt Service - Treasury 0021
Initiative: Reduces funding one time based on anticipated authorized general obligation
bonds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($15,000,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($15,000,000)
DEBT SERVICE - TREASURY 0021
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($15,000,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($15,000,000)
Disproportionate Tax Burden Fund 0472
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,364,282 $4,593,420
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,364,282 $4,593,420
DISPROPORTIONATE TAX BURDEN FUND 0472
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,364,282 $4,593,420
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,364,282 $4,593,420
State - Municipal Revenue Sharing 0020
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 228 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other $7,704,200 $14,052,406
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $7,704,200 $14,052,406
STATE - MUNICIPAL REVENUE SHARING 0020
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,704,200 $14,052,406
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $7,704,200 $14,052,406
TREASURER OF STATE, OFFICE OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 ($15,000,000)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $11,068,482 $18,645,826
ABANDONED PROPERTY FUND $22,421 $45,963
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $11,090,903 $3,691,789
Sec. A-39. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE
Educational and General Activities - UMS 0031
Initiative: Provides one-time funding in fiscal year 2025-26 and fiscal year 2026-27 only
for paid family and medical leave premiums for eligible University of Maine System
employees.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $418,207 $2,509,242
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $418,207 $2,509,242
Educational and General Activities - UMS 0031
Initiative: Provides additional funding for annual inflationary cost increases associated with
the continuation of current University of Maine System operations.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,580,849 $19,544,932
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,580,849 $19,544,932
EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL ACTIVITIES - UMS 0031
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,999,056 $22,054,174
__________ __________
Page 229 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,999,056 $22,054,174
University of Maine Scholarship Fund Z011
Initiative: Provides funding for scholarships due to a projected increase in dedicated
revenues from slot machine proceeds from the March 2024 Revenue Forecasting
Committee report.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $89,191 $180,607
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $89,191 $180,607
University of Maine Scholarship Fund Z011
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($208,120) ($185,677)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($208,120) ($185,677)
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE SCHOLARSHIP FUND Z011
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($118,929) ($5,070)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($118,929) ($5,070)
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE SYSTEM, BOARD OF
TRUSTEES OF THE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $9,999,056 $22,054,174
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($118,929) ($5,070)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $9,880,127 $22,049,104
Sec. A-40. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD
Administration - Workers' Compensation Board 0183
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocation with projected available resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $68,131 $77,133
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $68,131 $77,133
ADMINISTRATION - WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD 0183
Page 230 - 132LR2409(17)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $68,131 $77,133
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $68,131 $77,133
Workers' Compensation Board 0751
Initiative: Increases funding for per diem expenses for Workers' Compensation Board
members.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $2,400 $2,400
All Other $16 $16
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,416 $2,416
WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD 0751
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $2,400 $2,400
All Other $16 $16
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,416 $2,416
WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $70,547 $79,549
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $70,547 $79,549
PART B
Sec. B-1. Transfer balances. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
at the close of fiscal year 2024-25, the State Controller shall transfer any remaining
unencumbered balance in the Bureau of Policy and Management program, Aquaculture
Research Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account to the Bureau of Public Health
program, Aquaculture Research Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account within the
Department of Marine Resources.
Sec. B-2. Transfer balances. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
at the close of fiscal year 2024-25, the State Controller shall transfer any remaining
unencumbered balance in the Bureau of Policy and Management program, Aquaculture
Management Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account to the Bureau of Public Health
program, Aquaculture Management Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account within the
Department of Marine Resources.
PART C
Page 231 - 132LR2409(17)

Sec. C-1. 20-A MRSA §6602, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 759, Pt. D,
§1, is further amended to read:
B. A public school or a private school approved for tuition purposes, as defined in
section 1, subsection 23, that enrolls at least 60% publicly funded students as
determined by the previous year's October and April average enrollment and
participates in the National School Lunch Program in accordance with 7 Code of
Federal Regulations, Part 210 (2007) that serves breakfast shall provide a publicly
funded student who is eligible for free and reduced-price meals under paragraph A a
meal that meets the requirements of the federal School Breakfast Program set forth in
7 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 220 (2007) at no cost to the publicly funded
student. The State shall provide to the public school or private school approved for
tuition purposes funding equal to the difference between the federal reimbursement for
a free breakfast and the federal reimbursement for a reduced-price breakfast for each
publicly funded student eligible for a reduced-price breakfast and receiving breakfast
if the public school or private school approved for tuition purposes meets the
requirements of section 6602-A.
Sec. C-2. 20-A MRSA §6602, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2021, c. 759, Pt. D,
§2, is further amended to read:
D. A public school or a private school approved for tuition purposes, as defined in
section 1, subsection 23, that enrolls at least 60% publicly funded students as
determined by the previous year's October and April average enrollment and
participates in the National School Lunch Program in accordance with 7 Code of
Federal Regulations, Part 210 (2007) that serves lunch shall provide a publicly funded
student who is eligible for free and reduced-price meals under paragraph A a meal that
meets the requirements of the federal National School Lunch Program set forth in 7
Code of Federal Regulations, Part 210 (2019) at no cost to the publicly funded student.
The State shall provide to the public school or private school approved for tuition
purposes funding equal to the difference between the federal reimbursement for a free
lunch and the federal reimbursement for a reduced-price lunch for each publicly funded
student eligible for a reduced-price lunch and receiving lunch if the public school or
private school approved for tuition purposes meets the requirements of section 6602-A.
Sec. C-3. 20-A MRSA §6602, sub-§1, ¶H, as amended by PL 2021, c. 759, Pt.
D, §3, is further amended to read:
H. A public school or a private school approved for tuition purposes, as defined in
section 1, subsection 23, that enrolls at least 60% publicly funded students as
determined by the previous year's October and April average enrollment and
participates in the National School Lunch Program in accordance with 7 Code of
Federal Regulations, Part 210 (2007) that serves breakfast shall provide a publicly
funded student who is ineligible for free or reduced-price meals under paragraph A a
meal that meets the requirements of the federal School Breakfast Program set forth in
7 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 220 (2007) at no cost to the publicly funded
student. The State shall provide to the public school or private school approved for
tuition purposes funding equal to the difference between the federal reimbursement for
a free breakfast and the full price of the federal reimbursement for a full-price regular
breakfast for each publicly funded student ineligible for a free or reduced-price
Page 232 - 132LR2409(17)

breakfast and receiving breakfast if the public school or private school approved for
tuition purposes meets the requirements of section 6602-A.
Sec. C-4. 20-A MRSA §6602, sub-§1, ¶I, as amended by PL 2021, c. 759, Pt. D,
§4, is further amended to read:
I. A public school or a private school approved for tuition purposes, as defined in
section 1, subsection 23, that enrolls at least 60% publicly funded students as
determined by the previous year's October and April average enrollment and
participates in the National School Lunch Program in accordance with 7 Code of
Federal Regulations, Part 210 (2007) that serves lunch shall provide a publicly funded
student who is ineligible for free or reduced-price meals under paragraph A a meal that
meets the requirements of the federal National School Lunch Program set forth in 7
Code of Federal Regulations, Part 210 (2019) at no cost to the publicly funded student.
The State shall provide to the public school or private school approved for tuition
purposes funding equal to the difference between the federal reimbursement for a free
lunch and the full price of the federal reimbursement for a full-price lunch for each
publicly funded student ineligible for a free or reduced-price lunch and receiving lunch
if the public school or private school approved for tuition purposes meets the
requirements of section 6602-A.
Sec. C-5. 20-A MRSA §6602-A is enacted to read:
§6602-A. Federal funding for school food service programs
1. Condition of schools receiving state reimbursement for school lunch and school
breakfast. A public school or a private school approved for tuition purposes that receives
state funding under section 6602, subsection 1, paragraph B, D, H or I shall maximize the
amount of federal reimbursement funds that the school receives in order to receive state
funding equal to the difference between the federal reimbursement for a free regular
breakfast and the federal reimbursement for a reduced-price regular breakfast and equal to
the difference between the federal reimbursement for a free lunch and the federal
reimbursement for a reduced-price lunch, and funding equal to the difference between the
federal reimbursement for a free breakfast or lunch and the federal reimbursement for a
full-price breakfast or lunch for each publicly funded student receiving breakfast or lunch.
The public school or private school approved for tuition purposes, if eligible for any
provisional school food service program, including, but not limited to, the community
eligibility provision under the federal Healthy, Hunger-Free Kids Act of 2010, Public Law
111-296, Section 104(a), shall maximize participation in that provisional school food
service program. The department shall determine whether the school is maximizing federal
reimbursement funds.
2. Department to communicate options to public schools and private schools to
maximize federal funding. The department shall annually communicate school food
service program options available to a public school or a private school approved for tuition
purposes to the school for the school to maximize federal funding in the school food service
program. The department may provide technical assistance to a public school or a private
school approved for tuition purposes and may contract with a 3rd-party entity.
3. School not eligible for state funding if school does not participate in National
School Lunch Program or provisional school food service program if eligible. A public
school or a private school approved for tuition purposes that does not participate in the
Page 233 - 132LR2409(17)

National School Lunch Program in accordance with 7 Code of Federal Regulations, Part
210 (2007) and does not participate in any provisional school food service program, if
eligible, or that chooses a provisional school food service program option other than a
school food service program option communicated to the public school or private school
approved for tuition purposes under subsection 2 by the department may not receive state
funding equal to the difference between the federal reimbursement for a free breakfast and
the federal reimbursement for a reduced-price breakfast and equal to the difference between
the federal reimbursement for a free lunch and the federal reimbursement for a reduced-
price lunch, and funding equal to the difference between the federal reimbursement for a
free breakfast or lunch and the federal reimbursement for a full-price breakfast or lunch for
each publicly funded student receiving breakfast or lunch.
PART D
Sec. D-1. 5 MRSA §1742-D, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 348, §10, is
further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
The Director of the Bureau of General Services may provide a waiver of the standards and
criteria established under this section if the director concludes that the unique conditions
of location, program or employee function require such a waiver or in order to meet the
purpose of Title 30‑A, section 4349‑A 3234, subsection 2, relating to priority locations for
state office buildings, courts and other state civic buildings.
Sec. D-2. 5 MRSA §3109, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. OOOO, §1 and
amended by PL 2025, c. 33, Pt. C, §1 and affected by §10, is repealed.
Sec. D-3. 5 MRSA §3201, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Growth management program. "Growth management program" has the same
meaning as in Title 30-A, section 4301, subsection 9.
Sec. D-4. 5 MRSA §3201, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Growth-related capital investment. "Growth-related capital investment" has
the same meaning as in Title 30-A, section 4301, subsection 5-B.
Sec. D-5. 5 MRSA §3201, sub-§1-C is enacted to read:
1-C. Multimunicipal region. "Multimunicipal region" has the same meaning as in
Title 30-A, section 4301, subsection 11-A.
Sec. D-6. 5 MRSA §3201, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Regional council. "Regional council" has the same meaning as in Title 30-A,
section 4301, subsection 14.
Sec. D-7. 5 MRSA §3202, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. DD, §2, is
amended to read:
The Maine Office of Community Affairs is established as an agency in the executive
branch to foster communications and partnerships across state agencies and between the
State and communities in this State. The office shall engage with municipalities, tribal
governments and regional councils to provide coordinated and efficient planning, technical
assistance and financial support to better plan for challenges, pursue solutions and create
stronger, more resilient communities.
Page 234 - 132LR2409(17)

Sec. D-8. 5 MRSA §3204, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. DD, §2, is
amended by enacting at the end a new first blocked paragraph to read:
The office may adopt rules as necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of
this chapter, pursuant to the Maine Administrative Procedure Act. Unless otherwise
specified, rules adopted pursuant to this chapter are routine technical rules as defined in
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. D-9. 5 MRSA §3205, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. DD, §2, is amended
to read:
§3205. Acceptance and administration of funds
The office may accept, administer and expend funds, including but not limited to funds
from the Federal Government or from private sources, for purposes consistent with this
chapter. The director shall provide a report of the amount of any outside funding received
from private sources and its designated purpose to the Governor, the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over housing matters and the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over municipal matters on an
annual basis.
1. Rules. The office may adopt rules to administer grants and other fund
disbursements. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as
defined in chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
2. Exemption. To maximize the availability of technical and financial assistance
programs to all communities, including municipalities and tribes, and to multimunicipal
regions and service providers, a financial assistance program administered competitively
by the office is exempt from rules adopted by the Department of Administrative and
Financial Services pursuant to chapter 155 governing the purchasing of services and the
awarding of grants and contracts.
3. Program statement. The office shall publish a program statement describing its
grant programs and advertising its availability to eligible applicants.
4. Grant term; recipient duties. A grant awarded from a financial assistance program
pursuant to this section may be for a period of up to 2 years. A recipient of a grant fund
from a financial assistance program shall cooperate with the office's performance of
periodic evaluations. A recipient shall meet the office's reporting requirements.
5. Appeals. The office may adjudicate appeals of its grant disbursement decisions.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an adjudicatory hearing on an appeal
must be held in accordance with the Maine Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. D-10. 5 MRSA §3211, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 33, Pt. C, §3 and
affected by §10, is amended to read:
2. Administration of certain programs. The State Resilience Office shall administer
the Community Resilience Partnership Program established in section 3109 3221, the
floodplain management program established in Title 12, section 408 section 3223 and the
State Floodplain Mapping Fund established in Title 12, section 409 section 3224.
Sec. D-11. 5 MRSA c. 310-B, sub-c. 3 is enacted to read:
Page 235 - 132LR2409(17)

SUBCHAPTER 3
CLIMATE RESILIENCE
§3221. Community Resilience Partnership Program
1. Definition. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates,
"community" means a municipal government, tribal government, plantation, township or
unorganized territory.
2. Program established; administration. The Community Resilience Partnership
Program, referred to in this section as "the program," is established within the office to
provide direction, assistance and grants to communities in the State to help the communities
reduce carbon emissions, transition to clean energy and become more resilient to the effects
of climate change. The office shall administer the program to provide technical and
financial assistance for local and regional planning and implementation projects consistent
with the State's emissions reduction targets under Title 38, section 576-A and the state
climate action plan under Title 38, section 577.
3. Grants. The office shall make grants from money appropriated to the program by
the Legislature and any funds received by the office for the purposes of the program,
including federal funding or private funds.
A. The program may solicit applications for grants and make grant awards through a
competitive process to eligible communities and to service provider organizations as
determined by the office.
B. The office may establish eligibility requirements and other criteria to consider in
awarding grants, as long as the criteria support the goals to help communities reduce
carbon emissions, transition to clean energy and become more resilient to the effects
of climate change.
4. Other technical assistance. The office may provide other technical assistance and
knowledge sharing that may include, but is not limited to, assisting communities with
information about available grant opportunities, sharing best practices from jurisdictions
inside and outside the State, providing model language for local ordinances and policies
and providing information to the general public that may support local and statewide policy
changes meant to reduce emissions, encourage the transition to clean energy and increase
resiliency to the effects of climate change.
§3222. Coastal zone management program
1. Implement and manage coastal zone management program. The office, under
direction of the director, shall manage and coordinate implementation and ongoing
development and improvement of a state coastal zone management program in accordance
with and in furtherance of the requirements of the federal Coastal Zone Management Act
of 1972, 16 United States Code, Sections 1451 to 1466 (2012) and the State's coastal
management policies established in Title 38, section 1801. The office may:
A. Implement aspects of the state coastal zone management program and be the lead
state agency for purposes of federal consistency review under the federal Coastal Zone
Management Act of 1972, 16 United States Code, Section 1456 (2012);
Page 236 - 132LR2409(17)

B. Receive and administer funds from public or private sources for implementation of
the state coastal zone management program; and
C. Act as the coordinating agency among the several officers, authorities, boards,
commissions, departments and political subdivisions of the State on matters relative to
management of coastal resources and related human uses in the coastal area.
§3223. Floodplain management
The floodplain management program is established within the office. The office shall
serve as the state coordinating agency for the National Flood Insurance Program pursuant
to 44 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 60 and in that capacity shall oversee delivery of
technical assistance and resources to municipalities for the purpose of floodplain
management activities and shall administer the State Floodplain Mapping Fund under
section 3224.
§3224. State Floodplain Mapping Fund
1. Fund established. The State Floodplain Mapping Fund, referred to in this section
as "the fund," is established as a dedicated, nonlapsing fund administered by the office for
the purpose of providing funds for the mapping of floodplains in the State using light
detection and ranging technology.
2. Sources of funding. The fund consists of any money received from the following
sources:
A. Contributions from private sources;
B. Federal funds and awards;
C. The proceeds of any bonds issued for the purposes for which the fund is established;
and
D. Any other funds received in support of the purposes for which the fund is
established.
3. Disbursements from the fund. The office shall apply the money in the fund toward
the support of floodplain mapping in the State, including, but not limited to, the acquisition
of light detection and ranging elevation data and the processing and production of
floodplain maps.
Sec. D-12. 5 MRSA c. 310-B, sub-c. 4 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 4
MUNICIPAL PLANNING ASSISTANCE
§3231. Technical and financial assistance program established; purpose,
administration
The technical and financial assistance program for municipalities, regional councils
and multimunicipal regions, referred to in this subchapter as "the program," is established
to encourage and facilitate the adoption and implementation of local, regional and statewide
growth management programs. Under the provisions of the program, a municipality or
multimunicipal region may request financial or technical assistance from the office for the
Page 237 - 132LR2409(17)

purpose of planning and implementing a growth management program. A municipality or
multimunicipal region that requests and receives a financial assistance grant shall develop
and implement its growth management program in cooperation with the office and in a
manner consistent with the procedures, goals and guidelines established in this subchapter
and in Title 30-A, chapter 187, subchapter 2.
To accomplish the purposes of this subchapter, the office shall develop and administer
the program. The program must include direct financial assistance for planning and
implementation of growth management programs, standards governing the review of
growth management programs by the office, technical assistance to municipalities or
multimunicipal regions and a voluntary certification program for growth management
programs.
§3232. Technical and financial assistance
The office may enter into financial assistance grants under the program only to the
extent that funds are available. In making grants, the office shall consider the need for
planning in a municipality or multimunicipal region, the proximity of the municipality or
multimunicipal region to other areas that are conducting or have completed the planning
process and the economic and geographic role of the municipality or multimunicipal region
within a regional context. The office shall give priority in making grants to any
municipality or multimunicipal region that has adopted a local climate action plan and, if
the municipality or multimunicipal region has adopted a comprehensive plan or growth
management program, prepared a climate vulnerability assessment pursuant to Title 30-A,
section 4326, subsection 1, paragraph L. The office may consider other criteria in making
grants, as long as the criteria support the goal of encouraging and facilitating the adoption
and implementation of local and multimunicipal growth management programs consistent
with the procedures, goals and guidelines established in this subchapter.
1. Financial assistance grants. A contract for a financial assistance grant must:
A. Provide for the payment of a specific amount for the purposes of planning and
preparing a comprehensive plan;
B. Provide for the payment of a specific amount for the purposes of implementing a
comprehensive plan; and
C. Include specific timetables governing the preparation and submission of products
by the municipality or multimunicipal region.
The office may not require a municipality or multimunicipal region to provide matching
funds in excess of 25% of the value of that municipality's or multimunicipal region's
financial assistance contract for its first planning assistance grant and implementation
assistance grant. The office may require a higher match for other grants, including, but not
limited to, grants for the purpose of updating comprehensive plans. This match limitation
does not apply to distribution of federal funds that the office may administer.
2. Use of funds. A municipality or multimunicipal region may expend financial
assistance grants for:
A. The conduct of surveys, inventories and other data-gathering activities;
B. The hiring of planning and other technical staff;
C. The retention of planning consultants;
Page 238 - 132LR2409(17)

D. Contracts with regional councils for planning and related services;
E. Assistance in the development of ordinances;
F. Retention of technical and legal expertise;
G. The updating of growth management programs or components of a program;
H. Evaluation of growth management programs; and
I. Any other purpose agreed to by the office and the municipality or multimunicipal
region that is directly related to the preparation of a comprehensive plan or the
implementation of a comprehensive plan adopted in accordance with the procedures,
goals and guidelines established in this subchapter.
3. Program evaluation. Any recipient of a financial assistance grant shall cooperate
with the office in performing program evaluations required under Title 30-A, section 4331.
4. Encumbered balances at year-end. Notwithstanding Title 5, section 1589, at the
end of each fiscal year, all encumbered balances accounts for financial assistance and
regional planning grants may be carried forward for 2 years beyond the year in which those
balances are encumbered.
5. Technical assistance. Using its own staff, the staff of other state agencies,
contractors and the resources of the regional councils, the office shall provide technical
assistance to municipalities or multimunicipal regions in the development, administration
and enforcement of growth management programs. The technical assistance component of
the program must include a set of model land use ordinances or other implementation
strategies developed by the office that are consistent with this subchapter.
6. Regional council assistance. As part of the program, the office may develop and
administer an initiative to develop regional education and training programs, regional
policies to address state goals and regional assessments. Regional assessments may include,
but are not limited to, public infrastructure, inventories of agricultural and commercial
forest lands, housing needs, recreation and open space needs and projections of regional
growth and economic development. The initiative may include guidelines to ensure
methodological consistency among the State's regional councils. To implement this
initiative, the office may contract with regional councils to assist the office in reviewing
growth management programs, to develop necessary planning information at a regional
level or to provide support for local planning efforts.
7. Coordination. State agencies with regulatory or other authority affecting the goals
established in this subchapter shall conduct their respective activities in a manner consistent
with the goals established under this subchapter, including, but not limited to, coordinating
with municipalities, regional councils and other state agencies in meeting the state goals;
providing available information to regions and municipalities as described in Title 30-A,
section 4326, subsection 1; cooperating with efforts to integrate and provide access to
geographic information system data; making state investments and awarding grant money
as described in section 3234; and conducting reviews of growth management programs as
provided in section 3233, subsection 3, paragraph A. Without limiting the application of
this section to other state agencies, the following agencies shall comply with this
subchapter:
A. Department of Economic and Community Development;
Page 239 - 132LR2409(17)

B. Department of Environmental Protection;
C. Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry;
D. Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife;
E. Department of Marine Resources;
F. Department of Transportation;
G. Department of Health and Human Services;
H. Finance Authority of Maine; and
I. Maine State Housing Authority.
§3233. Municipal planning assistance program; review of programs
1. Comprehensive plans. A municipality or multimunicipal region that chooses to
prepare a growth management program and receives a planning grant under Title 30-A,
chapter 187, subchapter 2 shall submit its comprehensive plan to the office for review. A
municipality or multimunicipal region that chooses to prepare a growth management
program without receiving a planning grant under this subchapter may submit its
comprehensive plan to the office for review. The office shall review plans for consistency
with the procedures, goals and guidelines established in Title 30-A, chapter 187, subchapter
2. A contract for a planning assistance grant must include specific timetables governing the
review of the comprehensive plan by the office. A comprehensive plan submitted for
review more than 12 months following a contract end date may be required to contain data,
projections and other time-sensitive portions of the plan or program that are in compliance
with the office's most current review standards.
2. Growth management programs. A municipality or multimunicipal region may at
any time request a certificate of consistency for its growth management program.
A. Upon a request for review under this section, the office shall review the program
and determine whether the program is consistent with the procedures, goals and
guidelines established in Title 30-A, chapter 187, subchapter 2.
B. Certification by the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry or the
office of a municipality's or multimunicipal region's growth management program
under Title 30-A, chapter 187, subchapter 2 is valid for 10 years. To maintain
certification, a municipality or multimunicipal region shall periodically review its
growth management program and submit to the office in a timely manner any revisions
necessary to account for changes, including changes caused by growth and
development. Certification does not lapse in any year in which the Legislature does not
appropriate funds to the office for the purposes of reviewing programs for
recertification.
C. Upon a request for review under this section, the office may review rate of growth,
impact fee and zoning ordinances to determine whether the ordinances are consistent
with a comprehensive plan that has been found consistent under this section without
requiring submission of all elements of a growth management program. An affirmative
finding of consistency by the office is required for a municipality or multimunicipal
region to assert jurisdiction as provided in section 3234.
Page 240 - 132LR2409(17)

3. Review of growth management program. In reviewing a growth management
program, the office shall:
A. Solicit written comments on any proposed growth management program from
regional councils, state agencies, all municipalities contiguous to the municipality or
multimunicipal region submitting a growth management program and any interested
residents of the municipality or multimunicipal region or of contiguous municipalities.
The comment period extends for 45 days after the office receives the growth
management program.
(1) Each state agency reviewing the proposal shall designate a person or persons
responsible for coordinating the agency's review of the growth management
program.
(2) Any regional council commenting on a growth management program shall
determine whether the program is compatible with the programs of other
municipalities that may be affected by the program and with regional policies or
needs identified by the regional council;
B. Prepare all written comments from all sources in a form to be forwarded to the
municipality or multimunicipal region;
C. Within 90 days after receiving the growth management program, send all written
comments on the growth management program to the municipality or multimunicipal
region and any applicable regional council. If warranted, the office shall issue findings
specifically describing how the submitted growth management program is not
consistent with the procedures, goals and guidelines established in Title 30-A, chapter
187, subchapter 2 and the recommended measures for remedying the deficiencies.
(1) In its findings, the office shall clearly indicate its position on any point on which
there are significant conflicts among the written comments submitted to the office.
(2) If the office finds that the growth management program was adopted in
accordance with the procedures, goals and guidelines established in Title 30-A,
chapter 187, subchapter 2, the office shall issue a certificate of consistency for the
growth management program.
(3) Notwithstanding paragraph D, if a municipality or multimunicipal region
requests a certificate of consistency for its growth management program, any
unmodified component of that program that has previously been reviewed by the
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry and has received a finding
of consistency must retain that finding during program certification review by the
office as long as the finding of consistency is current as defined in rules adopted
by the office;
D. Provide ample opportunity for the municipality or multimunicipal region submitting
a growth management program to respond to and correct any identified deficiencies in
the program. A finding of inconsistency for a growth management program may be
addressed within 24 months of the date of the finding without addressing any new
review standards that are created during that time interval. After 24 months, the
program must be resubmitted in its entirety for state review under the office's most
current review standards; and
Page 241 - 132LR2409(17)

E. Provide an expedited review and certification procedure for those submissions that
represent minor amendments to certified growth management programs.
The office's decision on consistency of a growth management program constitutes final
agency action.
4. Review of comprehensive plan. In reviewing a comprehensive plan, the office
shall:
A. Solicit written comments on any proposed comprehensive plan from regional
councils, state agencies, all municipalities contiguous to the municipality or
multimunicipal region submitting a comprehensive plan and any interested residents
of the municipality or multimunicipal region or of contiguous municipalities. The
comment period extends for 25 business days after the office receives the
comprehensive plan. Each state agency reviewing the proposal shall designate a person
or persons responsible for coordinating the agency's review of the comprehensive plan;
B. Prepare all written comments from all sources in a form to be forwarded to the
municipality or multimunicipal region;
C. Within 35 business days after receiving the comprehensive plan, notify the
municipality or multimunicipal region if the plan is complete for purposes of review.
If the office notifies the municipality or multimunicipal region that the plan is not
complete for purposes of review, the office shall indicate in its notice necessary
additional data or information;
D. Within 10 business days of issuing notification that a comprehensive plan is
complete for purposes of review, issue findings specifically describing whether the
submitted plan is consistent with the procedures, goals and guidelines established in
Title 30-A, chapter 187, subchapter 2 and identify which inconsistencies in the plan, if
any, may directly affect rate of growth, zoning or impact fee ordinances.
(1) In its findings, the office shall clearly indicate its position on any point on which
there are significant conflicts among the written comments submitted to the office.
(2) If the office finds that the comprehensive plan was developed in accordance
with the procedures, goals and guidelines established in Title 30-A, chapter 187,
subchapter 2, the office shall issue a finding of consistency for the comprehensive
plan.
(3) A finding of inconsistency must identify the goals under Title 30-A, chapter
187, subchapter 2 not adequately addressed, specific sections of the rules relating
to comprehensive plan review adopted by the office not adequately addressed and
recommendations for resolving the inconsistency;
E. Send all written findings and comments on the comprehensive plan to the
municipality or multimunicipal region and any applicable regional council; and
F. Provide ample opportunity for the municipality or multimunicipal region submitting
a comprehensive plan to respond to and correct any identified deficiencies in the plan.
A finding of inconsistency for a comprehensive plan may be addressed within 24
months of the date of the finding without addressing any new review standards that are
created during that time interval. After 24 months, the plan must be resubmitted in its
entirety for state review under the office's most current review standards.
Page 242 - 132LR2409(17)

If the office finds that a plan is not consistent with the procedures, goals and guidelines
established in Title 30-A, chapter 187, subchapter 2, the municipality or multimunicipal
region that submitted the plan may appeal that finding to the office within 20 business days
of receipt of the finding in accordance with rules adopted by the office, which are routine
technical rules pursuant to chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
The office's decision on consistency of a comprehensive plan constitutes final agency
action.
A finding by the office pursuant to paragraph D that a comprehensive plan is consistent
with the procedures, goals and guidelines established in Title 30-A, chapter 187, subchapter
2 is valid for 12 years from the date of its issuance. For purposes of Title 30-A, section
4314, subsection 3 and Title 30-A, section 4352, subsection 2, expiration of a finding of
consistency pursuant to this subsection does not itself make a comprehensive plan
inconsistent with the procedures, goals and guidelines established in Title 30-A, chapter
187, subchapter 2.
5. Updates and amendments. A municipality or multimunicipal region may submit
proposed amendments to a comprehensive plan or growth management program to the
office for review in the same manner as provided for the review of new plans and programs.
Subsequent to voluntary certification under Title 30-A, chapter 187, subchapter 2, the
municipality or multimunicipal region shall file a copy of an amendment to a growth
management program with the office within 30 days after adopting the amendment and at
least 60 days prior to applying for any state grant program that offers a preference for
consistency or certification.
6. Regional councils. Subject to the availability of funding and pursuant to the
conditions of a contract, each regional council shall review and submit written comments
on the comprehensive plan or growth management program of any municipality or
multimunicipal region within its planning region. The comments must be submitted to the
office and contain an analysis of:
A. Whether the comprehensive plan or growth management program is compatible
with identified regional policies and needs; and
B. Whether the comprehensive plan or growth management program is compatible
with plans or programs of municipalities or multimunicipal regions that may be
affected by the proposal.
§3234. Municipal planning assistance program; state capital investments
1. Growth-related capital investments. The State may make growth-related capital
investments only in:
A. A locally designated growth area, as identified in a comprehensive plan adopted
pursuant to and consistent with the procedures, goals and guidelines of Title 30-A,
chapter 187, subchapter 2 or as identified in a growth management program certified
under section 3233.
B. In the absence of a consistent comprehensive plan, an area served by a public sewer
system that has the capacity for the growth-related project, an area identified in the
latest Federal Decennial Census as a census-designated place or a compact area of an
urban compact municipality as defined by Title 23, section 754; or
Page 243 - 132LR2409(17)

C. Areas other than those described in paragraph A or B for the following projects:
(1) A project related to a commercial or industrial activity that, due to its
operational or physical characteristics, typically is located away from other
development, such as an activity that relies on a particular natural resource for its
operation;
(2) An airport, port or railroad or industry that must be proximate to an airport, a
port or a railroad line or terminal;
(3) A pollution control facility;
(4) A project that maintains, expands or promotes a tourist or cultural facility that
is required to be proximate to a specific historic, natural or cultural resource or a
building or improvement that is related to and required to be proximate to land
acquired for a park, conservation, open space or public access or to an agricultural,
conservation or historic easement;
(5) A project located in a municipality that has none of the geographic areas
described in paragraph A or B and that prior to January 1, 2000 formally requested
but had not received from the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and
Forestry funds to assist with the preparation of a comprehensive plan or that
received funds from the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry to
assist with the preparation of a comprehensive plan within the previous 2 years.
This exception expires for a municipality 2 years after such funds are received; or
(6) A housing project serving the following: individuals with mental illness,
developmental disabilities, physical disabilities, brain injuries, substance use
disorder or a human immunodeficiency virus; homeless individuals; victims of
domestic violence; foster children; children or adults in the custody of the State; or
individuals with a household income of no more than 80% of the area median
income if the project has 18 or fewer units and receives funding through a program
administered by the Maine State Housing Authority. A nursing home is not
considered a housing project under this paragraph.
2. State facilities. The Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau
of General Services shall develop site selection criteria for state office buildings, state
courts, hospitals and other quasi-public facilities and other civic buildings that serve public
clients and customers, whether owned or leased by the State, that give preference to the
priority locations identified in this subsection while ensuring safe, healthy, appropriate
work space for employees and clients and accounting for agency requirements. On-site
parking may only be required if it is necessary to meet critical program needs and to ensure
reasonable access for agency clients and persons with disabilities. Employee parking that
is within reasonable walking distance may be located off site. If there is a change in
employee parking from on-site parking to off-site parking, the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services must consult with the duly authorized bargaining
agent or agents of the employees. Preference must be given to priority locations in the
following order: service center downtowns, service center growth areas and downtowns
and growth areas in other than service center communities. If no suitable priority location
exists or if the priority location would impose an undue financial hardship on the occupant
or is not within a reasonable distance of the clients and customers served, the facility must
be located in accordance with subsection 1. The following state facilities are exempt from
Page 244 - 132LR2409(17)

this subsection: a lease of less than 500 square feet; and a lease with a tenure of less than
one year, including renewals.
3. State's role in implementation of growth management programs. All state
agencies, as partners in local and regional growth management efforts, shall contribute to
the successful implementation of comprehensive plans and growth management programs
adopted under this subchapter by making investments, delivering programs and awarding
grants in a manner that reinforces the policies and strategies within the plans or programs.
Assistance must be provided within the confines of agency policies, available resources
and considerations related to overriding state interest.
4. Preference for other state grants and investments. Preference for other state
grants and investments is governed by this subsection.
A. When awarding a grant or making a discretionary investment under any of the
programs under paragraph B, subparagraphs (1) and (2) or when undertaking its own
capital investment programs other than for projects identified in Title 30-A, section
4301, subsection 5-B, a state agency shall respect the primary purpose of its grant or
investment program and, to the extent feasible, give preference:
(1) First, to a municipality that has received a certificate of consistency for its
growth management program under section 3233;
(2) Second, to a municipality that has adopted a comprehensive plan that the former
State Planning Office, the municipal planning assistance unit within the
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry or the office has determined
is consistent with the procedures, goals and guidelines of Title 30-A, chapter 187,
subchapter 2 and has adopted zoning ordinances that the former State Planning
Office, the municipal planning assistance unit within the Department of
Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry or the office has determined are consistent
with the comprehensive plan; and
(3) Third, to a municipality that has adopted a comprehensive plan that the former
State Planning Office, the municipal planning assistance unit within the
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry or the office has determined
is consistent with the procedures, goals and guidelines in Title 30-A, chapter 187,
subchapter 2.
If a municipality has submitted a comprehensive plan, zoning ordinance or growth
management program to the former State Planning Office, the municipal planning
assistance unit within the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry or the
office for review, the time for response as established in section 3233 has expired and
comments or findings have not been provided to the municipality, a state agency when
awarding a grant or making a discretionary investment under this subsection may not
give preference over the municipality to another municipality.
B. This subsection applies to:
(1) Programs that assist in the acquisition of land for conservation, natural resource
protection, open space or recreational facilities under chapter 353; and
(2) Programs intended to:
(a) Accommodate or encourage additional growth and development;
Page 245 - 132LR2409(17)

(b) Improve, expand or construct public facilities; or
(c) Acquire land for conservation or management of specific economic and
natural resource concerns.
C. This subsection does not apply to state grants or other assistance for sewage
treatment facilities, public health programs or education.
D. The office shall work with state agencies to prepare mechanisms for establishing
preferences in specific investment and grant programs as described in paragraph B.
5. Application. Subsections 1 and 2 apply to a state capital investment for which an
application is accepted as complete by the state agency funding the project after January 1,
2001 or which is initiated with the Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Bureau of General Services by a state agency after January 1, 2001.
§3235. Development Ready Advisory Committee
The Development Ready Advisory Committee, referred to in this section as "the
committee," is established pursuant to section 12004-I, subsection 6-J to develop and
maintain best practices for municipalities in infrastructure, land use, housing, economic
development, conservation and historic preservation policy. The committee shall provide
coordination and subject matter expertise to municipalities to advance the likelihood of
success across the community development life cycle.
1. Membership. The members of the committee are as follows:
A. The director;
B. The executive director of the Maine Redevelopment Land Bank Authority under
Title 30-A, chapter 204, or the executive director's designee;
C. The Commissioner of Economic and Community Development, or the
commissioner's designee;
D. The Commissioner of Transportation, or the commissioner's designee;
E. The Commissioner of Environmental Protection, or the commissioner's designee;
F. The Commissioner of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, or the commissioner's
designee;
G. The Director of the Maine Historic Preservation Commission, or the director's
designee;
H. The Director of the Maine State Housing Authority, or the director's designee;
I. The Commissioner of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife, or the commissioner's designee;
and
J. The following members, selected by and serving at the pleasure of the director:
(1) Three representatives of municipalities in this State;
(2) Five representatives from the regional councils selected for geographic
diversity and subject matter expertise;
(3) A representative of an organization that develops or funds affordable housing
projects;
Page 246 - 132LR2409(17)

(4) A representative of a local or statewide organization promoting civil rights that
has racial justice or racial equity as its primary mission;
(5) A representative of an organization that advocates for conservation of the
natural resources of this State; and
(6) A representative of a regional or statewide economic development
organization.
2. Duties. The committee shall develop best practices for community development
intended to support the following goals:
A. Assisting communities in preparing for sustainable growth and in a way that
maximizes financial return for state and local economies, improving quality of life for
local residents, addressing housing needs for households of all income levels and
advancing environmental protection and transportation goals and specific locally
identified priority needs;
B. Providing technical assistance and coordination to communities to facilitate the
adoption of best practices for growth across the following sectors:
(1) Transportation and infrastructure;
(2) Housing creation and preservation;
(3) Economic development;
(4) Conservation; and
(5) Historic preservation.
C. Assisting communities in designating priority investment areas in consultation with
regional planning organizations, including but not limited to village centers,
downtowns and adjacent neighborhoods, rural crossroads, high-impact corridors,
working waterfronts and rural farmsteads;
D. Ensuring that development efforts are achievable by communities and based on the
appropriateness of the location for development and the overall merit of the
development project and the community's commitment to the development project
based on the community's stated goals; and
E. Providing resources and education for municipalities to improve capacity to access
funding sources for community development project implementation.
3. Chair and officers. The director shall serve as chair of the committee. The members
of the committee shall annually elect one of its members as vice-chair and one of its
members as secretary to set the agenda and schedule meetings. The committee may elect
other officers, create subcommittees and designate their duties.
4. Voting rights. Each member of the committee has a vote.
5. Meetings. The committee shall meet at least twice a year.
6. Quorum. A majority of the members of the committee constitutes a quorum.
7. Staff support. The office shall provide staff support to the committee to carry out
the purposes of this section.
Sec. D-13. 5 MRSA c. 310-B, sub-c. 5 is enacted to read:
Page 247 - 132LR2409(17)

SUBCHAPTER 5
HOUSING PLANNING
§3241. Housing Opportunity Program
1. Program established; administration. The Housing Opportunity Program,
referred to in this section as "the program," is established within the Maine Office of
Community Affairs, established in section 3202 and referred to in this section as "the
office." The program must encourage and support the development of additional housing
units in the State, including housing units that are affordable for low-income and moderate-
income individuals and housing units targeted to community workforce housing needs. The
office shall administer the program and provide technical and financial assistance to
support communities implementing zoning and land use-related policies necessary to
support increased housing development. The program must support regional approaches
and municipal model ordinance development and encourage policies that support increased
housing density, where feasible, to protect working lands and natural lands.
2. Housing Opportunity Fund. The Housing Opportunity Fund, referred to in this
section as "the fund," is established as a fund within the office for the purpose of providing
funds for the program. The fund consists of money appropriated to the fund by the
Legislature and any funds received by the office for the purposes of the program.
A. The office shall solicit applications for grants from the fund through a competitive
application process. Grants may be awarded to experienced service providers and
municipalities to:
(1) Support municipal ordinance development, provide technical assistance and
encourage public participation and community engagement in the process of
increasing housing opportunities;
(2) Provide community housing planning services to municipalities to support the
creation of housing development plans, including municipal ordinances, and policy
amendments to support those plans; and
(3) Provide community housing implementation services.
Programs receiving grants under subparagraph (1) may encourage regional
coordination between municipalities.
Grants awarded must be for a period of up to 3 years, with required progress reports
each year.
B. The office shall provide technical assistance, housing policy development and
guidance directly to regional groups, municipalities and other housing stakeholders, to
the extent feasible with available resources. This may include, but is not limited to,
assisting municipalities with information about available grant opportunities, sharing
best practices from jurisdictions inside and outside of the State, providing model
language for municipal ordinances and policies and providing information to the
general public, which may support local and statewide policy changes meant to
increase the supply of housing.
Page 248 - 132LR2409(17)

3. Program evaluation. A recipient of grant funds through the program shall
cooperate with the office in performing evaluations and specific reporting requirements.
4. Rulemaking. The office may establish by rule the criteria for eligibility for grants
from the program and the process for applying to the program. Rules adopted pursuant to
this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. D-14. 5 MRSA c. 310-B, sub-c. 6 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 6
MAINE COMMISSION FOR COMMUNITY SERVICE
§3251. Commission established
There is established the Maine Commission for Community Service, referred to in this
subchapter as "the commission," to foster the State's ethic of community service; encourage
community service and volunteerism as a means of meeting critical human, environmental,
educational and public safety needs throughout the State; address climate challenges
through community service and volunteerism; serve as the State's liaison regarding national
and community service and volunteer activities; foster collaboration among service
agencies; and receive gifts and grants, implement statewide service programs and make
subgrants to state and local entities in accordance with the National and Community
Service Trust Act of 1993, 42 United States Code, Sections 12501 to 12682 (1994).
§3252. Membership; terms
1. Membership; qualifications. The commission consists of no fewer than 15 and no
more than 25 voting members appointed by the Governor and subject to review by the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over state and local government
matters. The commission must include the following:
A. A representative of a community-based agency or organization;
B. The Commissioner of Education or the commissioner's designee;
C. A representative of local government;
D. A representative of a local labor organization;
E. A representative of business;
F. An individual who is at least 16 years of age but no more than 25 years of age and
who is a participant in or supervisor of a service program for youth or a campus-based
or national service program;
G. A representative of a national service program;
H. An individual with expertise in the education, training and development needs of
youth, particularly disadvantaged youth;
I. An individual with experience in promoting the involvement of adults 55 years of
age or older in national service and volunteerism; and
J. A representative of the State's volunteer community.
Page 249 - 132LR2409(17)

A member may fulfill the representation requirement for more than one category in this
subsection.
The appointments may also include educators, including representatives from institutions
of higher education and local education agencies; experts in the delivery of human,
educational, environmental or public safety services to communities and persons;
representatives of Native American tribes and nations; out-of-school or at-risk youth; and
representatives of programs that are administered or receive assistance under the federal
Domestic Volunteer Service Act of 1973, 42 United States Code, Section 4951, et seq.
(1973). The commission also must include a nonvoting liaison designated by the federal
Corporation for National and Community Service. The appointments must reflect diversity
with respect to geography, race, ethnicity, age, gender, disability characteristics and
political affiliation. Not more than 50% plus one member may be from the same political
party. The number of voting members who are officers or employees of the State may not
exceed 25% of the total membership.
The chair must be an appointed voting member of the commission, selected by the voting
members. Members may not vote on issues affecting organizations they have served in a
staff or volunteer capacity at any time during the preceding 12 months.
2. Terms of office. The appointed members serve 3-year staggered terms. Terms
expire on September 1st. The Governor shall appoint members to vacancies on the
commission as they occur or upon expiration of terms. Any vacancy must be filled for the
unexpired portion of the term in which the vacancy occurs.
3. Reimbursement. Members are entitled to compensation for expenses incurred in
the performance of their duties on the commission in the same manner as state employees.
§3253. Duties
The commission shall:
1. Vision. Develop a state vision statement for national, state and community service;
2. Ethic of service. Demonstrate an ethic of service through its activities, policies and
procedures and annually evaluate how effectively these are fostering the state vision and
service ethic;
3. National and community service plan. Develop a 3-year comprehensive national
and community service plan and update the plan annually. The commission shall ensure
an open and inclusive process for maximum participation in development of the plan and
determination of state priorities;
4. Preselect programs and prepare applications. Preselect national service
programs as defined in the National and Community Service Trust Act of 1993, 42 United
States Code, Section 12501, et seq. and prepare a grant application to the Corporation for
National and Community Service;
5. Assist state education agencies. Assist the Department of Education and
institutions of higher education in the preparation of applications for national and
community service grants;
6. Administer grant programs. Evaluate, monitor and administer grant programs;
Page 250 - 132LR2409(17)

7. Provide technical assistance. Serve as a clearinghouse for information on national
and community service and provide technical assistance to local nonprofit organizations
and other entities in planning, applying for funds and implementing national service
programs;
8. Provide program development assistance and training. Provide program
development assistance and training to national service programs in the State;
9. Recruitment and placement. Serve as a clearinghouse for people interested in
national and community service placements and agencies recruiting volunteers;
10. State priorities. Make recommendations to the Corporation for National and
Community Service with respect to priorities within the State for programs receiving
assistance under the federal Domestic Volunteer Service Act of 1973, 42 United States
Code, Section 4951, et seq. (1973);
11. Coordination. Coordinate and foster collaboration among state agencies, colleges,
universities, municipalities, federal agencies and volunteer service programs, including,
but not limited to, coordination of and collaboration regarding the activities of the Maine
Climate Corps Program established pursuant to section 3257 and related national and other
climate-related service programs;
12. Advisory committees. Establish advisory committees as needed, with
membership not limited to commission members;
13. Fundraising. Carry out fundraising efforts to supplement federal funding and to
meet all federal matching requirements;
14. Maine Service Fellows Program. Develop and administer the Maine Service
Fellows Program under section 3256; and
15. Annual report. Submit an annual report to the Governor, the Legislature and the
joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over state and local
government matters by January 31st of each year.
§3254. Staff and administrative services
The office shall provide staff and administrative services as follows.
1. Executive director. The director, in consultation with the commission, shall hire
an executive director as a member of the office staff. The executive director oversees day-
to-day operations of the commission, hires staff members with the approval of the
commission and the director and carries out other responsibilities as directed by the
commission.
2. Administrative services. The director shall provide the executive director and the
commission with continuing administrative support as appropriate. The office may
establish a dedicated account on behalf of the commission to receive funds contributed by
private and public agencies for use solely for commission purposes.
§3255. Private support organization
1. Designation of private support organization. The executive director of the
commission, with the consent of the voting members of the commission, shall designate a
nonprofit corporation as the private support organization for the commission. The
nonprofit corporation must be incorporated under the laws of this State and for purposes
Page 251 - 132LR2409(17)

that are consistent with the goals, objectives, programs, responsibilities and functions of
the commission.
The commission's private support organization must be organized and operated exclusively
to receive, hold, invest and administer property and funds and to make expenditures to and
for the benefit of the commission.
2. Board of directors. A member of the private support organization's board of
directors may not also be a member of the commission. The executive director of the
commission, or the executive director's designee, shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio
member of the private support organization's board of directors.
3. Scope of work. The private support organization shall operate under a memorandum
of understanding negotiated annually by the commission that outlines a plan of work
consistent with the purposes and goals of the commission and shall submit an annual budget
for review and approval by the commission by June 1st.
The memorandum of understanding must further stipulate the reversion to the commission,
or to the State if the commission ceases to exist, of money and property held in trust by the
private support organization if the private support organization is no longer designated by
the commission pursuant to subsection 1.
4. Use of property. The commission may authorize the private support organization
to use the commission's facilities, equipment and other property, except money, in keeping
with the purposes of the private support organization.
§3256. Maine Service Fellows Program
The Maine Service Fellows Program, referred to in this section as "the program," is
established within the commission. Individuals who participate in the program are referred
to in this section as "program fellows." The commission shall administer the program in
accordance with this section.
1. Program purposes. The commission shall establish the program to:
A. Increase the opportunities for individuals to devote a year of service to communities
in the State;
B. Attract to and retain in the State motivated adults who have completed a college
degree within the prior 5 years to serve in positions where they can apply skills and
abilities to projects for the benefit of citizens of the State;
C. Provide rural and underserved communities in the State a resource to address critical
health and human, public safety, education and environmental needs; and
D. Strengthen civic engagement of both the program fellows and community residents
through solutions based in whole or in part in volunteer service.
2. Program design. The program must be designed to coordinate with appropriate
organizations in the served communities. Program fellows must be required to commit up
to 20% of their time in the program to developing regional networks of volunteer programs
whose common goals can result in mutual benefits. An entity may submit a proposal to
sponsor a program fellow based on guidelines established under this subsection. Services
provided by a program fellow may include but are not limited to services to address home
evictions, to support workforce development, to mitigate and prevent substance use
Page 252 - 132LR2409(17)

disorder and to promote mental health. The commission may identify other priority needs
of communities to be addressed by the program and may make those services available to
eligible communities. The commission shall establish guidelines for the program that
include but are not limited to:
A. Limiting the eligibility of entities that may sponsor program fellows to local or
county government, school districts, nonprofit organizations, faith-based organizations
and similar entities;
B. Establishing standards for local sponsors regarding supervision and support of
program fellows during their service;
C. Ensuring that projects and project proposals are well-designed and measure their
impact and do not include partisan or political activity;
D. Ensuring that program fellows are not used to replace positions eliminated or
position hours reduced as a result of budget cuts by the sponsor;
E. Requiring criminal background checks or other safeguards if projects involve
working with vulnerable populations such as schoolchildren or if otherwise required to
receive federal funds;
F. Focusing the program on rural communities as defined by the United States
Department of Agriculture, Economic Research Service's rural-urban continuum
codes, except that the commission shall use criteria other than the codes for defining
rural communities in Penobscot County;
G. Authorizing private sector and local partner contributions to program operations
for travel reimbursements or training costs; and
H. Any other guideline that the commission believes will benefit the program.
3. Compensation. To the extent funds are available, the commission shall ensure that
program fellows receive the following compensation for service:
A. A stipend set by the commission to achieve an annual income of up to 212% of the
nonfarm income official federal poverty level. To the extent the stipend is paid from
the General Fund or any other account of the commission, personal liability insurance
and workers' compensation insurance, paid for from the same source of funds, must
also be provided. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, program fellows are not
employees of the State for the purposes of Title 5, Part 20;
B. A program completion bonus that includes, to the extent established by the
commission by rule, an educational loan payment in an amount up to 20% of the
stipend value paid on behalf of the program fellow to the holder of the loan; and
C. An allowance to pay for individual health insurance not to exceed 2% of the stipend
amount.
4. Funding. The commission may seek and receive both private and federal funds,
grants and gifts in support of the program. The commission may accept funding from other
state agencies to support program fellows whose work will support and promote goals of
programs administered by those agencies.
Page 253 - 132LR2409(17)

5. Rules. The commission may adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this
section. Rules adopted under this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in
chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
§3257. Maine Climate Corps Program
The Maine Climate Corps Program, referred to in this section as “the program,” is
established within the commission to provide grants, technical assistance and training to
community service corps programs with the mission of responding to the impacts of climate
change. Eligible community service corps programs under the program must be designed
to:
1. Direct service projects. Conduct evidence-based direct service projects developed
through community collaboration, including collaboration with indigenous communities,
that address principles of equity, justice and accessibility;
2. Climate impacts. Address through measurable performance one or more of the
following areas: transportation, energy, housing, the State’s coastal zone as defined under
the United States Department of Commerce, National Oceanic and Atmospheric
Administration’s coastal zone management program, public health, land and fresh water
preservation, community resilience and climate-related education;
3. Disproportionately affected communities; representation. Prioritize assistance
to disproportionately affected communities and ensure that individuals in service positions
represent the economic and demographic diversity of communities, including persons who
are historically marginalized; and
4. Additional standards. Meet additional program standards, including, but not
limited to, requirements to:
A. Enroll individuals for set terms in service positions;
B. Provide individuals in full-time service positions with stipends, health insurance,
liability insurance and accidental death or dismemberment insurance;
C. Provide individuals in service positions with training, education and service
experiences that further employability or career preparation; and
D. Meet any other standards set by the commission or nationally for similar programs.
Sec. D-15. 5 MRSA Pt. 17-B, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. D-16. 5 MRSA §12004-I, sub-§6-J, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 664, §2, is
amended to read:
6-J.
Economic Development Ready Advisory Expenses Only 30‑A 5
Development Committee MRSA §5161
3235
Sec. D-17. 5 MRSA §13056-E, sub-§2, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 414, Pt. G,
§2 and affected by §5, is amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) A municipality is eligible to receive a grant if that municipality has adopted a
growth management program certified under Title 30‑A, section 4347‑A 3233 that
includes a capital improvement program composed of:
Page 254 - 132LR2409(17)

(a) An assessment of all public facilities and services, including, but not
limited to, roads and other transportation facilities, sewers, schools, parks and
open space, fire departments and police departments;
(b) An annually reviewed 5-year plan for the replacement and expansion of
existing public facilities or the construction of such new facilities as are
required to meet expected growth and economic development. The plan must
include projections of when and where those facilities will be required; and
(c) An assessment of the anticipated costs for replacement, expansion or
construction of public facilities, an identification of revenue sources available
to meet these costs and recommendations for meeting costs required to
implement the plan.
Sec. D-18. 5 MRSA §13056-J, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 635, Pt. U, §1, is repealed.
Sec. D-19. 10 MRSA §9722, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2011, c. 633, §5, is further
amended to read:
1. Establishment. The Technical Building Codes and Standards Board, established
in Title 5, section 12004‑G, subsection 5‑A and located within the Department of Public
Safety, Office of the State Fire Marshal Maine Office of Community Affairs, is established
to adopt, amend and maintain the Maine Uniform Building and Energy Code, to resolve
conflicts between the Maine Uniform Building and Energy Code and the fire and life safety
codes in Title 25, sections 2452 and 2465 and to provide for training for municipal building
officials, local code enforcement officers and 3rd-party inspectors.
Sec. D-20. 10 MRSA §9722, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 699, §6, is amended
to read:
3. Ex officio member; chair. The Commissioner of Public Safety Director of the
Maine Office of Community Affairs, or the commissioner's director's designee, serves as
an ex officio member and as the chair of the board. The chair is a nonvoting member,
except in the case of a tie of the board. The chair is responsible for ensuring that the board
maintains the purpose of its charge when executing its assigned duties, that any adoption
and amendment requirements for the Maine Uniform Building and Energy Code are met
and that training and technical assistance is provided to municipal building officials.
Sec. D-21. 10 MRSA §9723, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2019, c. 517, §1, is further
amended to read:
2. Training program standards; implementation. The committee shall direct the
training coordinator of the Division of Building Codes and Standards, established in Title
25, section 2372, to develop a training program for municipal building officials, local code
enforcement officers and 3rd-party inspectors. The Department of Public Safety, Office of
the State Fire Marshal Maine Office of Community Affairs, pursuant to Title 30‑A, section
4451, subsection 3‑A, shall implement the training and certification program established
under this chapter.
Sec. D-22. 12 MRSA §408, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt. HH, §1 and affected
by §7 and amended by c. 657, Pt. W, §5 and PL 2025, c. 33, Pt. C, §4 and affected by §10,
is repealed.
Page 255 - 132LR2409(17)

Sec. D-23. 12 MRSA §409, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt. HH, §2 and affected
by §7 and amended by c. 657, Pt. W, §5 and PL 2025, c. 33, Pt. C, §5 and affected by §10,
is repealed.
Sec. D-24. 12 MRSA §6052, sub-§4, ¶D, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. QQ,
§3, is further amended to read:
D. Establishing a marine research revolving fund for soliciting and receiving funds for
conducting marine research. A marine research fund established under this paragraph
may be used only for research purposes set forth under paragraphs A and B and may
not be used for research specific to any one company; and
Sec. D-25. 12 MRSA §6052, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. QQ, §4,
is further amended to read:
5. Safety and security services. Provide safety and security services in the coastal
waters of the State. The department shall coordinate with other local, state and federal
agencies when the department provides such safety and security services; and.
Sec. D-26. 12 MRSA §6052, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. QQ, §5,
is repealed.
Sec. D-27. 25 MRSA §2371, sub-§5-B is enacted to read:
5-B. Director. "Director" means the Director of the Maine Office of Community
Affairs established in Title 5, chapter 310-B.
Sec. D-28. 25 MRSA §2371, sub-§5-C is enacted to read:
5-C. Office. "Office" means the Maine Office of Community Affairs established in
Title 5, chapter 310-B.
Sec. D-29. 25 MRSA §2372, as amended by PL 2019, c. 517, §2, is further amended
to read:
§2372. Division of Building Codes and Standards
1. Established. The Division of Building Codes and Standards is established within
the Department of Public Safety, Office of the State Fire Marshal office to provide
administrative support and technical assistance to the board in executing its duties pursuant
to Title 10, section 9722, subsection 6.
2. Staff. The commissioner director may appoint and may remove for cause staff of
the division, including:
A. A technical codes coordinator certified in building standards pursuant to Title 30‑A,
section 4451, subsection 2-A, paragraph E, who serves as the division director and
principal administrative and supervisory employee of the board. The technical codes
coordinator shall attend meetings of the board, keep records of the proceedings of the
board and direct and supervise the personnel employed to carry out the duties of the
board, including but not limited to providing technical support and public outreach for
the adoption of the code, amendments, conflict resolutions and interpretations.
Technical support and public outreach must include, but may not be limited to:
(1) Providing nonbinding interpretation of the code for professionals and the
general public; and
Page 256 - 132LR2409(17)

(2) Establishing and maintaining a publicly accessible website to publish general
technical assistance, code updates and interpretations and post-training course
schedules; and
B. An office specialist to provide administrative support to the division and the board.
Sec. D-30. 25 MRSA §2374, as amended by PL 2019, c. 517, §3, is further amended
to read:
§2374. Uniform Building Codes and Standards Fund
The Uniform Building Codes and Standards Fund, referred to in this section as "the
fund," is established within the Department of Public Safety office to fund the activities of
the division under this chapter and the activities of the board under Title 10, chapter 1103
and Title 30‑A, section 4451, subsection 3‑A. Revenue for this fund is provided by the
surcharge established by section 2450‑A. The Department of Public Safety office shall
determine an amount to be transferred annually from the fund for training and certification
under Title 30‑A, section 4451, subsection 3‑A to the Maine Code Enforcement Training
and Certification Fund established in Title 30‑A, section 4451, subsection 3‑B. Any
balance of the fund may not lapse, but must be carried forward as a continuing account to
be expended for the same purpose in the following fiscal year.
Sec. D-31. 25 MRSA §2450-A, as repealed and replaced by PL 2013, c. 424, Pt.
A, §13, is amended to read:
§2450-A. Surcharge on plan review fee for Uniform Building Codes and Standards
Fund
In addition to the fees established in section 2450, a surcharge of 4¢ per square foot of
occupied space must be levied on the existing fee schedule for new construction,
reconstruction, repairs, renovations or new use for the sole purpose of funding the activities
of the Technical Building Codes and Standards Board with respect to the Maine Uniform
Building and Energy Code, established pursuant to Title 10, chapter 1103, the activities of
the Division of Building Codes and Standards under chapter 314 and the activities of the
Department of Economic and Community Development, Office of Community
Development Maine Office of Community Affairs under Title 30‑A, section 4451,
subsection 3‑A, except that the fee for review of a plan for the renovation of a public school,
including the fee established under section 2450, may not exceed $450. Revenue collected
from this surcharge must be deposited into the Uniform Building Codes and Standards
Fund established by section 2374.
Sec. D-32. 26 MRSA §1043, sub-§11, ¶F, as corrected by RR 2023, c. 2, Pt. E,
§79, is amended by amending subparagraph (31) to read:
(31) Service performed by participants enrolled in programs or projects under the
Maine Climate Corps Program established pursuant to Title 5, section 7507 3257
or under national service laws including the federal National and Community
Service Act of 1990, as amended, 42 United States Code, Section 12501 et seq.
and the federal Domestic Volunteer Service Act, as amended, 42 United States
Code, Section 4950 et seq.;
Sec. D-33. 30-A MRSA §4314, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt. JJ,
§16 and affected by §41, is further amended to read:
Page 257 - 132LR2409(17)

3. Rate of growth, zoning and impact fee ordinances. After January 1, 2003, any
portion of a municipality's or multimunicipal region's rate of growth, zoning or impact fee
ordinance must be consistent with a comprehensive plan adopted in accordance with the
procedures, goals and guidelines established in this subchapter. The portion of a rate of
growth, zoning or impact fee ordinance not directly related to an inconsistency identified
by a court or during a comprehensive plan review by the department in accordance with
Title 5, section 4347‑A 3233, subsection 3‑A 4 remains in effect. For purposes of this
subsection, "zoning ordinance" does not include an ordinance that applies townwide that is
a cluster development ordinance or a design ordinance prescribing the color, shape, height,
landscaping, amount of open space or other comparable physical characteristics of
development. The portion of a rate of growth, zoning or impact fee ordinance that is not
consistent with a comprehensive plan is no longer in effect unless:
C. The ordinance or portion of the ordinance is exempted under subsection 2;
D. The municipality or multimunicipal region is under contract with the department to
prepare a comprehensive plan or implementation program, in which case the ordinance
or portion of the ordinance remains valid for up to 4 years after receipt of the first
installment of its first planning assistance grant or for up to 2 years after receipt of the
first installment of its first implementation assistance grant, whichever is earlier;
E. The ordinance or portion of the ordinance conflicts with a newly adopted
comprehensive plan or plan amendment adopted in accordance with the procedures,
goals and guidelines established in this subchapter, in which case the ordinance or
portion of the ordinance remains in effect for a period of up to 24 months immediately
following adoption of the comprehensive plan or plan amendment;
F. The municipality or multimunicipal region applied for and was denied financial
assistance for its first planning assistance or implementation assistance grant under this
subchapter due to lack of state funds on or before January 1, 2003. If the department
subsequently offers the municipality or multimunicipal region its first planning
assistance or implementation assistance grant, the municipality or multimunicipal
region has up to one year to contract with the department to prepare a comprehensive
plan or implementation program, in which case the municipality's or multimunicipal
region's ordinances will be subject to paragraph D; or
G. The ordinance or portion of an ordinance is an adult entertainment establishment
ordinance, as defined in section 4352, subsection 2, that has been adopted by a
municipality that has not adopted a comprehensive plan.
Sec. D-34. 30-A MRSA §4326, sub-§3-A, ¶A, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 2, Pt.
A, §109, is amended by amending subparagraph (6) to read:
(6) A municipality or multimunicipal region exercising the discretion afforded by
subparagraph (4) shall review the basis for its demonstration during the periodic
revisions undertaken pursuant to Title 5, section 4347‑A 3233;
Sec. D-35. 30-A MRSA c. 187, sub-c. 2, art. 3-A, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. D-36. 30-A MRSA §4364, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 672, §4, is
amended to read:
Page 258 - 132LR2409(17)

2. Density requirements. A municipality shall allow an affordable housing
development where multifamily dwellings are allowed to have a dwelling unit density of
at least 2 1/2 times the base density that is otherwise allowed in that location and may not
require more than 2 off-street parking spaces for every 3 units. The development must be
in a designated growth area of a municipality consistent with Title 5, section 4349‑A 3234,
subsection 1, paragraph A or B or the development must be served by a public, special
district or other centrally managed water system and a public, special district or other
comparable sewer system. The development must comply with minimum lot size
requirements in accordance with Title 12, chapter 423‑A, as applicable.
Sec. D-37. 30-A MRSA §4364-A, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 192, §6, is
further amended to read:
1. Use allowed. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, except as
provided in Title 12, chapter 423‑A, for any area in which residential uses are allowed,
including as a conditional use, a municipality shall allow structures with up to 2 dwelling
units per lot if that lot does not contain an existing dwelling unit, except that a municipality
shall allow up to 4 dwelling units per lot if that lot does not contain an existing dwelling
unit and the lot is located in a designated growth area within a municipality consistent with
Title 5, section 4349‑A 3234, subsection 1, paragraph A or B or if the lot is served by a
public, special district or other centrally managed water system and a public, special district
or other comparable sewer system in a municipality without a comprehensive plan.
A municipality shall allow on a lot with one existing dwelling unit the addition of up to 2
dwelling units: one additional dwelling unit within or attached to an existing structure or
one additional detached dwelling unit, or one of each.
A municipality may allow more units than the number required to be allowed by this
subsection.
Sec. D-38. 30-A MRSA §4451, as amended by PL 2019, c. 517, §5, is further
amended to read:
§4451. Training and certification for code enforcement officers
1. Certification required; exceptions. A municipality may not employ any
individual to perform the duties of a code enforcement officer who is not certified by the
former State Planning Office, the Department of Economic and Community Development,
Office of Community Development or, the Department of Public Safety, Office of the State
Fire Marshal or the Maine Office of Community Affairs, except that:
A. An individual other than an individual appointed as a plumbing inspector has 12
months after beginning employment to be trained and certified as provided in this
section;
B. Whether or not any extension is available under paragraph A, the Department of
Public Safety, Office of the State Fire Marshal Maine Office of Community Affairs
may waive this requirement for up to one year if the certification requirements cannot
be met without imposing a hardship on the municipality employing the individual;
C. An individual may be temporarily authorized in writing by the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Engineering to be employed as a
plumbing inspector for a period not to exceed 12 months; and
Page 259 - 132LR2409(17)

D. An individual whose certification has expired or is about to expire may be
temporarily authorized in writing by the Department of Public Safety, Office of the
State Fire Marshal Maine Office of Community Affairs to extend that individual's
certification for a period not to exceed 12 months in cases where the necessary training
or examination is suspended under subsection 3‑B, paragraph E.
2. Penalty. Any municipality that violates this section commits a civil violation for
which a fine of not more than $100 may be adjudged. Each day in violation constitutes a
separate offense.
2-A. Code enforcement officer; definition and duties. As used in this subchapter,
"code enforcement officer" means a person certified under this section and employed by a
municipality to enforce all applicable laws and ordinances in the following areas:
A. Shoreland zoning under Title 38, chapter 3, subchapter 1, article 2‑B;
B. Comprehensive planning and land use under Part 2, Subpart 6‑A;
C. Internal plumbing under chapter 185, subchapter 3;
D. Subsurface wastewater disposal under chapter 185, subchapter 3; and
E. Building standards under chapter 141; chapter 185, subchapter 1; Title 5, sections
4582‑B, 4582‑C and 4594‑F; Title 10, chapter 1103; and Title 25, chapter 313.
3. Training and certification of code enforcement officers. In cooperation with
code enforcement officer professional associations, the Maine Community College System,
the Department of Environmental Protection and the Department of Health and Human
Services, except as otherwise provided in paragraph H, the Department of Public Safety,
Office of the State Fire Marshal Maine Office of Community Affairs shall establish a
continuing education program for individuals engaged in code enforcement. This program
must provide training in the technical and legal aspects of code enforcement necessary for
certification. The training program must include training to provide familiarity with the
laws and ordinances related to the structure and practice of the municipal code enforcement
office, municipal planning board and appeals board procedures, application review and
permitting procedures, inspection procedures and enforcement techniques.
H. If funding is not available to support the training and certification program
authorized under this subsection, the Department of Public Safety, Office of the State
Fire Marshal Maine Office of Community Affairs shall discontinue training and
certification activities related to laws and ordinances referenced in subsection 2‑A,
paragraphs A and B and shall adopt by routine technical rules under Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2‑A a program to register code enforcement officers that meet training
and education qualifications. The Department of Public Safety, Office of the State Fire
Marshal Maine Office of Community Affairs shall publish the list of persons registered
for code enforcement who have submitted evidence of required qualifications. Persons
registered under this paragraph must meet the requirements for training and
certification under this subchapter. The Department of Public Safety, Office of the
State Fire Marshal Maine Office of Community Affairs shall consult with the
Department of Health and Human Services for the purposes of carrying out training
and certification activities related to laws and ordinances referenced in subsection 2‑A,
paragraphs C and D. Within one month of discontinuation of training and certification
under this paragraph, the Department of Public Safety, Office of the State Fire Marshal
Page 260 - 132LR2409(17)

Maine Office of Community Affairs shall report to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over appropriations and financial affairs and the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over state and local
government matters a recommendation for funding the training and certification
program or for further changes in program requirements.
3-A. Training and certification of inspectors in the Maine Uniform Building and
Energy Code. In accordance with the training and certification requirements developed
pursuant to Title 10, section 9723, the Department of Public Safety, Office of the State Fire
Marshal Maine Office of Community Affairs shall provide the training necessary to certify
municipal building officials, local code enforcement officers and 3rd-party inspectors.
3-B. Maine Code Enforcement Training and Certification Fund. The Maine Code
Enforcement Training and Certification Fund, referred to in this section as "the fund," is
established as a nonlapsing fund to support training and certification programs
administered by the Department of Public Safety, Office of the State Fire Marshal Maine
Office of Community Affairs for code enforcement officers, local plumbing inspectors,
municipal building officials and 3rd-party inspectors in accordance with this subchapter.
A. On July 1st of each year, the funds identified in section 4215, subsection 4 for
training and certifying local plumbing inspectors must be transferred to the fund.
B. On July 1st of each year, the funds identified in Title 25, section 2374 for training
and certifying municipal building officials, local code enforcement officers and 3rd-
party inspectors must be transferred to the fund.
C. The Department of Public Safety, Office of the State Fire Marshal Maine Office of
Community Affairs shall place in the fund any money it receives from grants to support
the requirements of this subchapter.
D. Funds related to code enforcement training and certification may be expended only
in accordance with allocations approved by the Legislature and solely for the
administration of this subchapter. Any balance remaining in the fund at the end of any
fiscal year may not lapse but must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
E. If the fund does not contain sufficient money to support the costs of the training and
certification provided for in this subchapter, the Department of Public Safety, Office
of the State Fire Marshal Maine Office of Community Affairs may suspend all or
reduce the level of training and certification activities.
4. Examination. The Department of Public Safety, Office of the State Fire Marshal
Maine Office of Community Affairs shall conduct at least one examination each year to
examine candidates for certification at a time and place designated by it. The Department
of Public Safety, Office of the State Fire Marshal Maine Office of Community Affairs may
conduct additional examinations to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.
5. Certification standards. The Department of Public Safety, Office of the State Fire
Marshal Maine Office of Community Affairs shall adopt routine technical rules under Title
5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A to establish the qualifications, conditions and licensing
standards and procedures for the certification and recertification of individuals as code
enforcement officers. A code enforcement officer need only be certified in the areas of
actual job responsibilities. The rules established under this subsection must identify
Page 261 - 132LR2409(17)

standards for each of the areas of training under subsection 2‑A, in addition to general
standards that apply to all code enforcement officers.
6. Certification; terms; revocation. The Department of Public Safety, Office of the
State Fire Marshal Maine Office of Community Affairs shall certify individuals as to their
competency to successfully enforce ordinances and other land use regulations and permits
granted under those ordinances and regulations and shall issue certificates attesting to the
competency of those individuals to act as code enforcement officers. Certificates issued
by the former State Planning Office, the Department of Economic and Community
Development, Office of Community Development or the Department of Public Safety,
Office of the State Fire Marshal Maine Office of Community Affairs are valid for 6 years
unless revoked by the District Court. An examination is not required for recertification of
code enforcement officers. The Department Public Safety, Office of the State Fire Marshal
Maine Office of Community Affairs shall recertify a code enforcement officer if the code
enforcement officer successfully completes at least 12 hours of approved training in each
area of job responsibility during the 6-year certification period.
A. The District Court may revoke the certificate of a code enforcement officer, in
accordance with Title 4, chapter 5, when it finds that:
(1) The code enforcement officer has practiced fraud or deception;
(2) Reasonable care, judgment or the application of a duly trained and
knowledgeable code enforcement officer's ability was not used in the performance
of the duties of the office; or
(3) The code enforcement officer is incompetent or unable to perform properly the
duties of the office.
B. Code enforcement officers whose certificates are invalidated under this subsection
may be issued new certificates provided that they are newly certified as provided in
this section.
7. Other professions unaffected. This subchapter may not be construed to affect or
prevent the practice of any other profession.
Sec. D-39. 30-A MRSA §5161, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 664, §3, is repealed.
Sec. D-40. 30-A MRSA §5248, sub-§2, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 426, §1, is
amended to read:
F. An assurance that the program complies with Title 5, section 4349‑A 3234;
Sec. D-41. 30-A MRSA §5953-D, sub-§3, ¶D, as amended by PL 2011, c. 655,
Pt. JJ, §27 and affected by §41 and amended by c. 657, Pt. W, §5, is further amended by
amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) A municipality is eligible to receive a grant or a loan, or a combination of both,
if that municipality has adopted a growth management program certified under
Title 5, section 4347‑A 3233 that includes a capital improvement program
composed of the following elements:
(a) An assessment of all public facilities and services, such as, but not limited
to, roads and other transportation facilities, sewers, schools, parks and open
space, fire and police;
Page 262 - 132LR2409(17)

(b) An annually reviewed 5-year plan for the replacement and expansion of
existing public facilities or the construction of such new facilities as are
required to meet expected growth and economic development. The plan must
include projections of when and where those facilities will be required; and
(c) An assessment of the anticipated costs for replacement, expansion or
construction of public facilities, an identification of revenue sources available
to meet these costs and recommendations for meeting costs required to
implement the plan.
Sec. D-42. 38 MRSA §488, sub-§14, ¶A, as amended by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt. JJ,
§32 and affected by §41 and amended by c. 657, Pt. W, §5, is further amended by amending
subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) A municipality that has adopted a local growth management program that has
been certified under Title 30‑A 5, section 4347‑A 3233; and
Sec. D-43. Transition provisions; Community Resilience Partnership
Program. The following provisions govern the transition of the Community Resilience
Partnership Program from the Office of Policy Innovation and the Future to the Maine
Office of Community Affairs.
1. The Maine Office of Community Affairs is the successor in every way to the powers,
duties and functions of the Community Resilience Partnership Program.
2. All existing rules, regulations and procedures in effect, in operation or adopted in or
by the Community Resilience Partnership Program or any of its administrative units or
officers are hereby declared in effect and continue in effect until rescinded, revised or
amended by the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
3. All existing contracts, agreements and compacts currently in effect in the
Community Resilience Partnership Program continue in effect.
4. All records, property and equipment previously belonging to or allocated for the use
of the Community Resilience Partnership Program become, on the effective date of this
Part, part of the property of the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
5. All existing forms, licenses, letterheads and similar items bearing the name of or
referring to the Community Resilience Partnership Program may be used by the Maine
Office of Community Affairs until existing supplies of those items are exhausted.
6. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall
transfer any unobligated balances remaining in the Community Resilience Partnership
Program, Other Special Revenue Funds and federal funds to the Maine Office of
Community Affairs no later than the effective date of this Part.
Sec. D-44. Transition provisions; coastal zone management program. The
following provisions govern the transition of the coastal zone management program from
the Bureau of Policy and Management program, Department of Marine Resources to the
Maine Coastal Program, Maine Office of Community Affairs.
1. The Maine Office of Community Affairs is the successor in every way to the powers,
duties and functions of the coastal zone management program.
Page 263 - 132LR2409(17)

2. All existing rules, regulations and procedures in effect, in operation or adopted in or
by the coastal zone management program or any of its administrative units or officers are
hereby declared in effect and continue in effect until rescinded, revised or amended by the
Maine Office of Community Affairs.
3. All existing contracts, agreements and compacts currently in effect in the coastal
zone management program continue in effect.
4. All records, property and equipment previously belonging to or allocated for the use
of the coastal zone management program become, on the effective date of this Part, part of
the property of the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
5. All existing forms, licenses, letterheads and similar items bearing the name of or
referring to the coastal zone management program may be used by the Maine Office of
Community Affairs until existing supplies of those items are exhausted.
6. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall
transfer any unobligated balances related to the coastal zone management program
remaining in the Bureau of Policy and Management program, Department of Marine
Resources, Other Special Revenue Funds and federal funds to the Maine Office of
Community Affairs no later than the effective date of this Part.
Sec. D-45. Transition provisions; municipal planning assistance program.
The following provisions govern the transition of the municipal planning assistance
program from the Geology and Resource Information program, Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry to the Municipal Planning Assistance program, Maine Office of
Community Affairs.
1. The Maine Office of Community Affairs is the successor in every way to the powers,
duties and functions of the municipal planning assistance program.
2. All existing rules, regulations and procedures in effect, in operation or adopted in or
by the municipal planning assistance program or any of its administrative units or officers
are hereby declared in effect and continue in effect until rescinded, revised or amended by
the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
3. All existing contracts, agreements and compacts currently in effect in the municipal
planning assistance program continue in effect.
4. All records, property and equipment previously belonging to or allocated for the use
of the municipal planning assistance program become, on the effective date of this Part,
part of the property of the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
5. All existing forms, licenses, letterheads and similar items bearing the name of or
referring to the municipal planning assistance program may be used by the Maine Office
of Community Affairs until existing supplies of those items are exhausted.
6. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall
transfer any unobligated balances related to the municipal planning assistance program
remaining in the Geology and Resource Information program, Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry, federal funds to the Maine Office of Community Affairs no
later than the effective date of this Part.
Sec. D-46. Transition provisions; Maine Commission for Community
Service, the Maine Service Fellows Program and the Maine Climate Corps
Page 264 - 132LR2409(17)

Program. The following provisions govern the transition of the Maine Commission for
Community Service, the Maine Service Fellows Program and the Maine Climate Corps
Program from the Department of Education to the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
1. The Maine Office of Community Affairs is the successor in every way to the powers,
duties and functions of the Maine Commission for Community Service, the Maine Service
Fellows Program and the Maine Climate Corps Program.
2. All existing rules, regulations and procedures in effect, in operation or adopted in or
by the Maine Commission for Community Service, the Maine Service Fellows Program
and the Maine Climate Corps Program or any of its administrative units or officers are
hereby declared in effect and continue in effect until rescinded, revised or amended by the
Maine Office of Community Affairs.
3. All existing contracts, agreements and compacts currently in effect in the Maine
Commission for Community Service, the Maine Service Fellows Program and the Maine
Climate Corps Program continue in effect.
4. All records, property and equipment previously belonging to or allocated for the use
of the Maine Commission for Community Service, the Maine Service Fellows Program
and the Maine Climate Corps Program become, on the effective date of this Part, part of
the property of the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
5. All existing forms, licenses, letterheads and similar items bearing the name of or
referring to the Maine Commission for Community Service, the Maine Service Fellows
Program and the Maine Climate Corps Program may be used by the Maine Office of
Community Affairs until existing supplies of those items are exhausted.
6. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall
transfer any unobligated balances related to the Maine Commission for Community
Service, the Maine Service Fellows Program and the Maine Climate Corps Program
remaining in the Department of Education, Other Special Revenue Funds and federal funds
to the Maine Office of Community Affairs no later than the effective date of this Part.
Sec. D-47. Transition provisions; Housing Opportunity Program. The
following provisions govern the transition of the Housing Opportunity Program from the
Department of Economic and Community Development to the Maine Office of Community
Affairs.
1. The Maine Office of Community Affairs is the successor in every way to the powers,
duties and functions of the Housing Opportunity Program.
2. All existing rules, regulations and procedures in effect, in operation or adopted in or
by the Housing Opportunity Program or any of its administrative units or officers are
hereby declared in effect and continue in effect until rescinded, revised or amended by the
Maine Office of Community Affairs.
3. All existing contracts, agreements and compacts currently in effect in the Housing
Opportunity Program continue in effect.
4. All records, property and equipment previously belonging to or allocated for the use
of the Housing Opportunity Program become, on the effective date of this Part, part of the
property of the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
Page 265 - 132LR2409(17)

5. All existing forms, licenses, letterheads and similar items bearing the name of or
referring to the Housing Opportunity Program may be used by the Maine Office of
Community Affairs until existing supplies of those items are exhausted.
Sec. D-48. Transition provisions; Division of Building Codes and
Standards program. The following provisions govern the transition of the Division of
Building Codes and Standards program from the Department of Public Safety to the Maine
Office of Community Affairs.
1. The Maine Office of Community Affairs is the successor in every way to the powers,
duties and functions of the Division of Building Codes and Standards program.
2. All existing rules, regulations and procedures in effect, in operation or adopted in or
by the Division of Building Codes and Standards program or any of its administrative units
or officers are hereby declared in effect and continue in effect until rescinded, revised or
amended by the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
3. All existing contracts, agreements and compacts currently in effect in the Division
of Building Codes and Standards program continue in effect.
4. All records, property and equipment previously belonging to or allocated for the use
of the Division of Building Codes and Standards program become, on the effective date of
this Part, part of the property of the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
5. All existing forms, licenses, letterheads and similar items bearing the name of or
referring to the Division of Building Codes and Standards program may be used by the
Maine Office of Community Affairs until existing supplies of those items are exhausted.
6. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall
transfer any unobligated balances related to the Division of Building Codes and Standards
program remaining in the Department of Public Safety, Other Special Revenue Funds to
the Maine Office of Community Affairs no later than the effective date of this Part.
Sec. D-49. Transition provisions; floodplain management program. The
following provisions govern the transition of the floodplain management program from the
Geology and Resource Information program, Department of Agriculture, Conservation and
Forestry to the Maine Floodplain Program, Maine Office of Community Affairs.
1. The Maine Office of Community Affairs is the successor in every way to the powers,
duties and functions of the floodplain management program.
2. All existing rules, regulations and procedures in effect, in operation or adopted in or
by the floodplain management program or any of its administrative units or officers are
hereby declared in effect and continue in effect until rescinded, revised or amended by the
Maine Office of Community Affairs.
3. All existing contracts, agreements and compacts currently in effect in the floodplain
management program continue in effect.
4. All records, property and equipment previously belonging to or allocated for the use
of the floodplain management program become, on the effective date of this Part, part of
the property of the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
Page 266 - 132LR2409(17)

5. All existing forms, licenses, letterheads and similar items bearing the name of or
referring to the floodplain management program may be used by the Maine Office of
Community Affairs until existing supplies of those items are exhausted.
6. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall
transfer any unobligated balances related to the floodplain management program remaining
in the Geology and Resource Information program, Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry, Other Special Revenue Funds and federal funds to the Maine
Office of Community Affairs no later than the effective date of this Part.
Sec. D-50. Transition provisions; Development Ready Advisory
Committee. The following provisions govern the transition of the Development Ready
Advisory Committee from the Maine Redevelopment Land Bank Authority to the Maine
Office of Community Affairs.
1. The Maine Office of Community Affairs is the successor in every way to the powers,
duties and functions of the Development Ready Advisory Committee.
2. All existing rules, regulations and procedures in effect, in operation or adopted in or
by the Development Ready Advisory Committee or any of its administrative units or
officers are hereby declared in effect and continue in effect until rescinded, revised or
amended by the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
3. All existing contracts, agreements and compacts currently in effect in the
Development Ready Advisory Committee continue in effect.
4. All records, property and equipment previously belonging to or allocated for the use
of the Development Ready Advisory Committee become, on the effective date of this Part,
part of the property of the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
5. All existing forms, licenses, letterheads and similar items bearing the name of or
referring to the Development Ready Advisory Committee may be used by the Maine Office
of Community Affairs until existing supplies of those items are exhausted.
Sec. D-51. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding for the municipal planning assistance program from
the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry to the Maine Office of
Community Affairs to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding
in partnership with communities across the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($7,509) ($7,509)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($7,509) ($7,509)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,681) ($1,681)
__________ __________
Page 267 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($1,681) ($1,681)
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding for the floodplain management program from the
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry to the Maine Office of Community
Affairs to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding in partnership
with communities across the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($5,857) ($5,857)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($5,857) ($5,857)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($910) ($910)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($910) ($910)
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Transfers position-related All Other funding from the Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry to the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($6,706) ($6,706)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($6,706) ($6,706)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,392) ($1,392)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($1,392) ($1,392)
Geology and Resource Information Z237
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding for the municipal planning assistance program from
the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry to the Maine Office of
Community Affairs to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding
in partnership with communities across the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($170,049) ($170,049)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($170,049) ($170,049)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($577,978) ($577,978)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($577,978) ($577,978)
Page 268 - 132LR2409(17)

Geology and Resource Information Z237
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding for the floodplain management program from the
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry to the Maine Office of Community
Affairs to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding in partnership
with communities across the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($7,423) ($7,423)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($7,423) ($7,423)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($49,909) ($49,909)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($49,909) ($49,909)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($500) ($500)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($500) ($500)
Geology and Resource Information Z237
Initiative: Transfers one Senior Planner position and one Public Service Manager I position
and transfers and reallocates the cost of one Senior Planner position from the Geology and
Resource Information program within the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and
Forestry to the Municipal Planning Assistance program within the Maine Office of
Community Affairs, within the same funds and from Other Special Revenue Funds to the
General Fund, respectively. Three authorized positions and any incumbent personnel as of
July 1, 2025 in the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry are transferred
to the Maine Office of Community Affairs. All transferred positions are classified positions
at the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The designation of positions as either
confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Each employee
retains the employee's accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($148,625) ($158,183)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($148,625) ($158,183)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($105,933) ($114,192)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($105,933) ($114,192)
Page 269 - 132LR2409(17)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($119,781) ($124,686)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($119,781) ($124,686)
Geology and Resource Information Z237
Initiative: Transfers one Senior Planner position and one Planner II position from the
Geology and Resource Information program within the Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry to the Maine Floodplain Program within the Maine Office of
Community Affairs within the same respective funds to provide coordinated and efficient
technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities across the State. Two
authorized positions and any incumbent personnel as of July 1, 2025 in the Department of
Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry are transferred to the Maine Office of Community
Affairs. All transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are classified
positions at the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The designation of each position as
either confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Those
employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($101,924) ($106,067)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($101,924) ($106,067)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($126,728) ($134,712)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($126,728) ($134,712)
Geology and Resource Information Z237
Initiative: Transfers one Senior Planner position and one Planner II position from the
Geology and Resource Information program within the Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry to the Municipal Planning Assistance program within the Maine
Office of Community Affairs within the same fund to provide coordinated and efficient
technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities across the State. Two
authorized positions and any incumbent personnel as of July 1, 2025 in the Department of
Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry are transferred to the Maine Office of Community
Affairs. All transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are classified
positions at the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The designation of each position as
either confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Those
employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (2.000) (2.000)
Personal Services ($216,371) ($232,966)
__________ __________
Page 270 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($216,371) ($232,966)
Geology and Resource Information Z237
Initiative: Transfers position-related All Other funding from the Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry to the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($7,000) ($7,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($7,000) ($7,000)
AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND
FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND ($671,464) ($701,760)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ($860,548) ($876,791)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($124,264) ($129,169)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($1,656,276) ($1,707,720)
ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
Housing Opportunity Program Z336
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the Housing Opportunity Program within the
Department of Economic and Community Development to the Housing Opportunity
Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs within the same fund to provide
coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities
across the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($2,060,118) ($2,046,660)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($2,060,118) ($2,046,660)
Housing Opportunity Program Z336
Initiative: Transfers 2 Public Service Coordinator II positions from the Housing
Opportunity Program within the Department of Economic and Community Development
to the Housing Opportunity Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs within
the same fund to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding in
partnership with communities across the State. Two authorized positions and any
incumbent personnel as of July 1, 2025 in the Department of Economic and Community
Development are transferred to the Maine Office of Community Affairs. All transferred
positions, including those currently unclassified, are classified positions at the Maine
Office of Community Affairs. The designation of each position as either confidential or
bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Those employees retain their
accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (2.000) (2.000)
Page 271 - 132LR2409(17)

Personal Services ($327,236) ($340,694)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($327,236) ($340,694)
ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND ($2,387,354) ($2,387,354)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($2,387,354) ($2,387,354)
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Maine Climate Corps Prog - ME Commission for Comm Svc Z350
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the Maine Commission for Community
Service program, the Maine Climate Corps Prog - ME Commission for Comm Svc program
and the Maine Service Fellows Program within the Department of Education to the Maine
Commission for Community Service program, the Maine Climate Corps Program and the
Maine Service Fellows Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs,
respectively, and within the same respective funds, to provide coordinated and efficient
technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities across the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($9,328) ($9,328)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($9,328) ($9,328)
Maine Climate Corps Prog - ME Commission for Comm Svc Z350
Initiative: Transfers one Senior Planner position from the Maine Climate Corps Prog - ME
Commission for Comm Svc program within the Department of Education to the Maine
Climate Corps Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs within the same
fund to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding in partnership
with communities across the State. One authorized position and any incumbent personnel
as of July 1, 2025 in the Department of Education are transferred to the Maine Office of
Community Affairs. All transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are
classified positions at the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The designation of each
position as either confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the
position. Those employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($105,595) ($113,841)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($105,595) ($113,841)
Maine Commission for Community Service Z134
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the Maine Commission for Community
Service program, the Maine Climate Corps Prog - ME Commission for Comm Svc program
Page 272 - 132LR2409(17)

and the Maine Service Fellows Program within the Department of Education to the Maine
Commission for Community Service program, the Maine Climate Corps Program and the
Maine Service Fellows Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs,
respectively, and within the same respective funds, to provide coordinated and efficient
technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities across the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($53,276) ($53,276)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($53,276) ($53,276)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($2,269,136) ($2,269,136)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($2,269,136) ($2,269,136)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($194,282) ($194,282)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($194,282) ($194,282)
Maine Commission for Community Service Z134
Initiative: Transfers one Public Service Manager I position and 3 Senior Planner positions
from the Maine Commission for Community Service program within the Department of
Education to the Maine Commission for Community Service program within the Maine
Office of Community Affairs, within the same respective funds, and transfers and
reallocates the cost of one Senior Planner position from 60% Federal Expenditures Fund
and 40% General Fund in the Maine Commission for Community Service program within
the Department of Education to 75% General Fund and 25% Federal Expenditures Fund in
the Maine Commission for Community Service program within the Maine Office of
Community Affairs. Five authorized positions and any incumbent personnel as of July 1,
2025 in the Department of Education are transferred to the Maine Office of Community
Affairs. All transferred positions are classified positions at the Maine Office of Community
Affairs. The designation of positions as either confidential or bargaining unit is based on
the classification of the position. Each employee retains the employee's accrued vacation
and sick leave balances.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($42,239) ($45,535)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($42,239) ($45,535)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (5.000) (5.000)
Personal Services ($531,169) ($561,217)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($531,169) ($561,217)
Page 273 - 132LR2409(17)

Maine Commission for Community Service Z134
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Secretary Specialist position from 75%
Federal Expenditures Fund and 25% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Maine
Commission for Community Service program within the Department of Education to 70%
General Fund and 30% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Maine Commission for
Community Service program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs to provide
coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities
across the State. One authorized position and any incumbent personnel as of July 1, 2025
in the Department of Education are transferred to the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
All transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are classified positions at
the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The designation of each position as either
confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Those
employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($67,522) ($72,852)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($67,522) ($72,852)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($22,506) ($24,281)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($22,506) ($24,281)
Maine Service Fellows Program Z311
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the Maine Commission for Community
Service program, the Maine Climate Corps Prog - ME Commission for Comm Svc program
and the Maine Service Fellows Program within the Department of Education to the Maine
Commission for Community Service program, the Maine Climate Corps Program and the
Maine Service Fellows Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs,
respectively, and within the same respective funds, to provide coordinated and efficient
technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities across the State.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($500) ($500)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($500) ($500)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($500) ($500)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($500) ($500)
Maine Service Fellows Program Z311
Initiative: Transfers one limited-period Volunteer Services Coordinator position from the
Maine Service Fellows Program within the Department of Education to the Maine Service
Page 274 - 132LR2409(17)

Fellows Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs, within the same fund, to
provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding in partnership with
communities across the State. One authorized position and any incumbent personnel as of
July 1, 2025 in the Department of Education are transferred to the Maine Office of
Community Affairs. All transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are
classified positions at the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The designation of each
position as either confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the
position. Those employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($98,611) ($106,558)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($98,611) ($106,558)
Maine Service Fellows Program Z311
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the Maine Service Fellows Program within the
Department of Education to the Maine Service Fellows Program within the Maine Office
of Community Affairs within the same fund to provide coordinated and efficient technical
assistance and funding in partnership with communities across the State.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($12,433) ($12,072)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($12,433) ($12,072)
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND ($210,438) ($221,980)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ($2,979,371) ($3,022,335)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($217,288) ($219,063)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($3,407,097) ($3,463,378)
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
GOPIF - Community Resilience Partnership Z376
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding for the community resilience partnership program
from the GOPIF - Community Resilience Partnership program within the Executive
Department to the Community Resilience Partnership program within the Maine Office of
Community Affairs to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding
in partnership with communities across the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($3,003,660) ($3,003,660)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($3,003,660) ($3,003,660)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 275 - 132LR2409(17)

All Other ($500) ($500)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($500) ($500)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($5,000,500) ($5,000,500)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($5,000,500) ($5,000,500)
GOPIF - Community Resilience Partnership Z376
Initiative: Transfers one Public Service Coordinator II position from the GOPIF -
Community Resilience Partnership program within the Executive Department to the
Community Resilience Partnership program within the Maine Office of Community
Affairs within the same fund to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and
funding in partnership with communities across the State. One authorized position and any
incumbent personnel as of July 1, 2025 in the Executive Department are transferred to the
Maine Office of Community Affairs. All transferred positions, including those currently
unclassified, are classified positions at the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The
designation of each position as either confidential or bargaining unit is based on the
classification of the position. Those employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave
balances.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($155,944) ($167,760)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($155,944) ($167,760)
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND ($3,159,604) ($3,171,420)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ($500) ($500)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($5,000,500) ($5,000,500)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($8,160,604) ($8,172,420)
MAINE OFFICE OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS
Community Resilience Partnership Z412
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding for the community resilience partnership program
from the GOPIF - Community Resilience Partnership program within the Executive
Department to the Community Resilience Partnership program within the Maine Office of
Community Affairs to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding
in partnership with communities across the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,003,660 $3,003,660
Page 276 - 132LR2409(17)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,003,660 $3,003,660
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000,500 $5,000,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,000,500 $5,000,500
Community Resilience Partnership Z412
Initiative: Transfers one Public Service Coordinator II position from the GOPIF -
Community Resilience Partnership program within the Executive Department to the
Community Resilience Partnership program within the Maine Office of Community
Affairs within the same fund to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and
funding in partnership with communities across the State. One authorized position and any
incumbent personnel as of July 1, 2025 in the Executive Department are transferred to the
Maine Office of Community Affairs. All transferred positions, including those currently
unclassified, are classified positions at the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The
designation of each position as either confidential or bargaining unit is based on the
classification of the position. Those employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave
balances.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $150,690 $162,304
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $150,690 $162,304
Division of Building Codes and Standards Z419
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding for the code enforcement program from the Division
of Building Codes and Standards program within the Department of Public Safety to the
Division of Building Codes and Standards program within the Maine Office of Community
Affairs within the same fund to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and
funding and partnership with communities across the State.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $60,109 $60,109
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $60,109 $60,109
Division of Building Codes and Standards Z419
Initiative: Transfers one Public Safety Inspector III position and one Office Associate II
position from the Division of Building Codes and Standards program within the
Department of Public Safety to the Division of Building Codes and Standards program
Page 277 - 132LR2409(17)

within the Maine Office of Community Affairs within the same fund to provide coordinated
and efficient technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities across the
State. Two authorized positions and any incumbent personnel as of July 1, 2025 in the
Department of Public Safety are transferred to the Maine Office of Community Affairs. All
transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are classified positions at the
Maine Office of Community Affairs. The designation of each position as either confidential
or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Those employees retain
their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $179,050 $192,497
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $179,050 $192,497
Housing Opportunity Program Z418
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the Housing Opportunity Program within the
Department of Economic and Community Development to the Housing Opportunity
Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs within the same fund to provide
coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities
across the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,060,174 $2,046,718
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,060,174 $2,046,718
Housing Opportunity Program Z418
Initiative: Transfers 2 Public Service Coordinator II positions from the Housing
Opportunity Program within the Department of Economic and Community Development
to the Housing Opportunity Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs within
the same fund to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding in
partnership with communities across the State. Two authorized positions and any
incumbent personnel as of July 1, 2025 in the Department of Economic and Community
Development are transferred to the Maine Office of Community Affairs. All transferred
positions, including those currently unclassified, are classified positions at the Maine
Office of Community Affairs. The designation of each position as either confidential or
bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Those employees retain their
accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $327,180 $340,636
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $327,180 $340,636
Maine Climate Corps Program Z416
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the Maine Commission for Community
Service program, the Maine Climate Corps Prog - ME Commission for Comm Svc program
and the Maine Service Fellows Program within the Department of Education to the Maine
Page 278 - 132LR2409(17)

Commission for Community Service program, the Maine Climate Corps Program and the
Maine Service Fellows Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs,
respectively, and within the same respective funds, to provide coordinated and efficient
technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities across the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,328 $9,328
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,328 $9,328
Maine Climate Corps Program Z416
Initiative: Transfers one Senior Planner position from the Maine Climate Corps Prog - ME
Commission for Comm Svc program within the Department of Education to the Maine
Climate Corps Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs within the same
fund to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding in partnership
with communities across the State. One authorized position and any incumbent personnel
as of July 1, 2025 in the Department of Education are transferred to the Maine Office of
Community Affairs. All transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are
classified positions at the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The designation of each
position as either confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the
position. Those employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $105,489 $113,731
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $105,489 $113,731
Maine Coastal Program Z413
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding for the coastal zone management program from the
Bureau of Policy and Management program within the Department of Marine Resources
to the Maine Coastal Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs within the
same respective funds to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding
in partnership with communities across the State.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,097,473 $1,097,508
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,097,473 $1,097,508
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $150,500 $150,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $150,500 $150,500
Maine Coastal Program Z413
Initiative: Transfers one Senior Planner position, one Public Service Coordinator I position,
one Public Service Manager II position and 2 Marine Resource Management Coordinator
positions from the Bureau of Policy and Management program within the Department of
Page 279 - 132LR2409(17)

Marine Resources to the Maine Coastal Program within the Maine Office of Community
Affairs within the same fund to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and
funding in partnership with communities across the State. Five authorized positions and
any incumbent personnel as of July 1, 2025 in the Department of Marine Resources are
transferred to the Maine Office of Community Affairs. All transferred positions, including
those currently unclassified, are classified positions at the Maine Office of Community
Affairs. The designation of each position as either confidential or bargaining unit is based
on the classification of the position. Those employees retain their accrued vacation and sick
leave balances.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $658,826 $699,834
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $658,826 $699,834
Maine Coastal Program Z413
Initiative: Transfers one Marine Resource Management Coordinator position from the
Bureau of Policy and Management program within the Department of Marine Resources
to the Maine Coastal Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs within the
same fund to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding in
partnership with communities across the State. One authorized position and any incumbent
personnel as of July 1, 2025 in the Department of Marine Resources are transferred to the
Maine Office of Community Affairs. All transferred positions, including those currently
unclassified, are classified positions at the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The
designation of each position as either confidential or bargaining unit is based on the
classification of the position. Those employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave
balances.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $146,891 $152,992
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $146,891 $152,992
Maine Coastal Program Z413
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the Bureau of Policy and Management
program within the Department of Marine Resources to the Maine Coastal Program within
the Maine Office of Community Affairs within the same fund to provide coordinated and
efficient technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities across the State.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,787 $13,052
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $12,787 $13,052
Maine Coastal Program Z413
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service Manager
II position from range 30 to range 33.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 280 - 132LR2409(17)

Personal Services $12,065 $18,781
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $12,065 $18,781
Maine Commission for Community Service Z415
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the Maine Commission for Community
Service program, the Maine Climate Corps Prog - ME Commission for Comm Svc program
and the Maine Service Fellows Program within the Department of Education to the Maine
Commission for Community Service program, the Maine Climate Corps Program and the
Maine Service Fellows Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs,
respectively, and within the same respective funds, to provide coordinated and efficient
technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities across the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $53,276 $53,276
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $53,276 $53,276
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,269,136 $2,269,136
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,269,136 $2,269,136
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $194,282 $194,282
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $194,282 $194,282
Maine Commission for Community Service Z415
Initiative: Transfers one Public Service Manager I position and 3 Senior Planner positions
from the Maine Commission for Community Service program within the Department of
Education to the Maine Commission for Community Service program within the Maine
Office of Community Affairs, within the same respective funds, and transfers and
reallocates the cost of one Senior Planner position from 60% Federal Expenditures Fund
and 40% General Fund in the Maine Commission for Community Service program within
the Department of Education to 75% General Fund and 25% Federal Expenditures Fund in
the Maine Commission for Community Service program within the Maine Office of
Community Affairs. Five authorized positions and any incumbent personnel as of July 1,
2025 in the Department of Education are transferred to the Maine Office of Community
Affairs. All transferred positions are classified positions at the Maine Office of Community
Affairs. The designation of positions as either confidential or bargaining unit is based on
the classification of the position. Each employee retains the employee's accrued vacation
and sick leave balances.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $79,117 $85,301
__________ __________
Page 281 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $79,117 $85,301
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $515,761 $543,772
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $515,761 $543,772
Maine Commission for Community Service Z415
Initiative: Transfers and reallocates the cost of one Secretary Specialist position from 75%
Federal Expenditures Fund and 25% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Maine
Commission for Community Service program within the Department of Education to 70%
General Fund and 30% Federal Expenditures Fund in the Maine Commission for
Community Service program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs to provide
coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities
across the State. One authorized position and any incumbent personnel as of July 1, 2025
in the Department of Education are transferred to the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
All transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are classified positions at
the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The designation of each position as either
confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Those
employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $62,947 $67,917
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $62,947 $67,917
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $26,975 $29,106
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $26,975 $29,106
Maine Commission for Community Service Z415
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Secretary Specialist
position to a Management Analyst I position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,158 $1,333
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,158 $1,333
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $496 $571
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $496 $571
Page 282 - 132LR2409(17)

Maine Floodplain Program Z420
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding for the floodplain management program from the
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry to the Maine Office of Community
Affairs to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding in partnership
with communities across the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $14,190 $14,190
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $14,190 $14,190
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $49,909 $49,909
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $49,909 $49,909
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Maine Floodplain Program Z420
Initiative: Transfers one Senior Planner position and one Planner II position from the
Geology and Resource Information program within the Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry to the Maine Floodplain Program within the Maine Office of
Community Affairs within the same respective funds to provide coordinated and efficient
technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities across the State. Two
authorized positions and any incumbent personnel as of July 1, 2025 in the Department of
Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry are transferred to the Maine Office of Community
Affairs. All transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are classified
positions at the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The designation of each position as
either confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Those
employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $101,480 $105,606
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $101,480 $105,606
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $126,284 $134,251
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $126,284 $134,251
Maine Office of Community Affairs Z396
Page 283 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Establishes one Secretary Specialist position and one Public Service Coordinator
I position to provide administrative support for the Maine Office of Community Affairs
and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $214,376 $231,076
All Other $17,826 $17,826
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $232,202 $248,902
Maine Office of Community Affairs Z396
Initiative: Continues 3 limited-period Public Service Manager II positions and one limited-
period Public Service Executive II position, previously established by financial order,
through January 1, 2030 to support activities under the National Oceanic and Atmospheric
Administration climate resilience regional challenge grant and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $552,805 $598,336
All Other $35,652 $35,652
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $588,457 $633,988
Maine Office of Community Affairs Z396
Initiative: Provides funding for DICAP costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Maine Office of Community Affairs Z396
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $20,000 $20,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,000 $20,000
Maine Service Fellows Program Z417
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the Maine Commission for Community
Service program, the Maine Climate Corps Prog - ME Commission for Comm Svc program
and the Maine Service Fellows Program within the Department of Education to the Maine
Commission for Community Service program, the Maine Climate Corps Program and the
Maine Service Fellows Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs,
respectively, and within the same respective funds, to provide coordinated and efficient
technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities across the State.
Page 284 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Maine Service Fellows Program Z417
Initiative: Transfers one limited-period Volunteer Services Coordinator position from the
Maine Service Fellows Program within the Department of Education to the Maine Service
Fellows Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs, within the same fund, to
provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding in partnership with
communities across the State. One authorized position and any incumbent personnel as of
July 1, 2025 in the Department of Education are transferred to the Maine Office of
Community Affairs. All transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are
classified positions at the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The designation of each
position as either confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the
position. Those employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $98,505 $106,448
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $98,505 $106,448
Maine Service Fellows Program Z417
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the Maine Service Fellows Program within the
Department of Education to the Maine Service Fellows Program within the Maine Office
of Community Affairs within the same fund to provide coordinated and efficient technical
assistance and funding in partnership with communities across the State.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,433 $12,072
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $12,433 $12,072
Municipal Planning Assistance Z414
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding for the municipal planning assistance program from
the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry to the Maine Office of
Community Affairs to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding
in partnership with communities across the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $179,789 $179,789
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $179,789 $179,789
Page 285 - 132LR2409(17)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $577,978 $577,978
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $577,978 $577,978
Municipal Planning Assistance Z414
Initiative: Transfers one Senior Planner position and one Public Service Manager I position
and transfers and reallocates the cost of one Senior Planner position from the Geology and
Resource Information program within the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and
Forestry to the Municipal Planning Assistance program within the Maine Office of
Community Affairs, within the same funds and from Other Special Revenue Funds to the
General Fund, respectively. Three authorized positions and any incumbent personnel as of
July 1, 2025 in the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry are transferred
to the Maine Office of Community Affairs. All transferred positions are classified positions
at the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The designation of positions as either
confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Each employee
retains the employee's accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $267,518 $281,947
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $267,518 $281,947
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $105,489 $113,731
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $105,489 $113,731
Municipal Planning Assistance Z414
Initiative: Transfers one Senior Planner position and one Planner II position from the
Geology and Resource Information program within the Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry to the Municipal Planning Assistance program within the Maine
Office of Community Affairs within the same fund to provide coordinated and efficient
technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities across the State. Two
authorized positions and any incumbent personnel as of July 1, 2025 in the Department of
Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry are transferred to the Maine Office of Community
Affairs. All transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are classified
positions at the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The designation of each position as
either confidential or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Those
employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $214,475 $230,828
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $214,475 $230,828
Page 286 - 132LR2409(17)

Municipal Planning Assistance Z414
Initiative: Transfers position-related All Other funding from the Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry to the Maine Office of Community Affairs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $14,888 $14,888
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $14,888 $14,888
MAINE OFFICE OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $6,897,561 $6,980,354
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $6,300,465 $6,454,129
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $5,585,941 $5,599,388
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $18,783,967 $19,033,871
MARINE RESOURCES, DEPARTMENT OF
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding for the coastal zone management program from the
Bureau of Policy and Management program within the Department of Marine Resources
to the Maine Coastal Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs within the
same respective funds to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding
in partnership with communities across the State.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,097,473) ($1,097,508)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($1,097,473) ($1,097,508)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($150,500) ($150,500)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($150,500) ($150,500)
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Transfers one Senior Planner position, one Public Service Coordinator I position,
one Public Service Manager II position and 2 Marine Resource Management Coordinator
positions from the Bureau of Policy and Management program within the Department of
Marine Resources to the Maine Coastal Program within the Maine Office of Community
Affairs within the same fund to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and
funding in partnership with communities across the State. Five authorized positions and
any incumbent personnel as of July 1, 2025 in the Department of Marine Resources are
transferred to the Maine Office of Community Affairs. All transferred positions, including
those currently unclassified, are classified positions at the Maine Office of Community
Affairs. The designation of each position as either confidential or bargaining unit is based
Page 287 - 132LR2409(17)

on the classification of the position. Those employees retain their accrued vacation and sick
leave balances.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (5.000) (5.000)
Personal Services ($661,863) ($703,013)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($661,863) ($703,013)
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Transfers one Marine Resource Management Coordinator position from the
Bureau of Policy and Management program within the Department of Marine Resources
to the Maine Coastal Program within the Maine Office of Community Affairs within the
same fund to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and funding in
partnership with communities across the State. One authorized position and any incumbent
personnel as of July 1, 2025 in the Department of Marine Resources are transferred to the
Maine Office of Community Affairs. All transferred positions, including those currently
unclassified, are classified positions at the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The
designation of each position as either confidential or bargaining unit is based on the
classification of the position. Those employees retain their accrued vacation and sick leave
balances.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($147,506) ($153,631)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($147,506) ($153,631)
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Transfers All Other funding from the Bureau of Policy and Management
program within the Department of Marine Resources to the Maine Coastal Program within
the Maine Office of Community Affairs within the same fund to provide coordinated and
efficient technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities across the State.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($12,787) ($13,052)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($12,787) ($13,052)
MARINE RESOURCES, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ($1,919,629) ($1,967,204)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($150,500) ($150,500)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($2,070,129) ($2,117,704)
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
Division of Building Codes and Standards Z073
Page 288 - 132LR2409(17)

Initiative: Transfers All Other funding for the code enforcement program from the Division
of Building Codes and Standards program within the Department of Public Safety to the
Division of Building Codes and Standards program within the Maine Office of Community
Affairs within the same fund to provide coordinated and efficient technical assistance and
funding and partnership with communities across the State.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($60,109) ($60,109)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($60,109) ($60,109)
Division of Building Codes and Standards Z073
Initiative: Transfers one Public Safety Inspector III position and one Office Associate II
position from the Division of Building Codes and Standards program within the
Department of Public Safety to the Division of Building Codes and Standards program
within the Maine Office of Community Affairs within the same fund to provide coordinated
and efficient technical assistance and funding in partnership with communities across the
State. Two authorized positions and any incumbent personnel as of July 1, 2025 in the
Department of Public Safety are transferred to the Maine Office of Community Affairs. All
transferred positions, including those currently unclassified, are classified positions at the
Maine Office of Community Affairs. The designation of each position as either confidential
or bargaining unit is based on the classification of the position. Those employees retain
their accrued vacation and sick leave balances.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (2.000) (2.000)
Personal Services ($184,724) ($198,460)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($184,724) ($198,460)
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($244,833) ($258,569)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($244,833) ($258,569)
SECTION TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $468,701 $497,840
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $540,417 $587,299
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($151,444) ($158,413)
__________ __________
SECTION TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $857,674 $926,726
PART E
Page 289 - 132LR2409(17)

Sec. E-1. 36 MRSA §4365, as amended by PL 2005, c. 218, §44 and c. 457, Pt.
AA, §1 and affected by §8, is further amended to read:
§4365. Rate of tax
A Before January 5, 2026, a tax is imposed on all cigarettes imported into this State or
held in this State by any person for sale at the rate of 100 mills for each cigarette. Beginning
January 5, 2026, a tax is imposed on all cigarettes imported into this State or held in this
State by any person for sale at the rate of 175 mills for each cigarette. Payment of the tax
is evidenced by the affixing of stamps to the packages containing the cigarettes.
Sec. E-2. 36 MRSA §4365-F, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 457, Pt. AA, §3 and
affected by §8, is repealed.
Sec. E-3. 36 MRSA §4365-G is enacted to read:
§4365-G. Application of cigarette tax rate increase effective January 5, 2026
The following provisions apply to cigarettes held for resale on January 5, 2026.
1. Stamped rate. Cigarettes stamped at the rate of 100 mills per cigarette and held for
resale on or after January 5, 2026 are subject to tax at the rate of 175 mills per cigarette.
2. Liability. A person possessing cigarettes for resale is liable for the difference
between the tax rate of 175 mills per cigarette and the tax rate of 100 mills per cigarette in
effect before January 5, 2026. Stamps indicating payment of the tax imposed by this section
must be affixed to all packages of cigarettes held for resale as of January 5, 2026, except
that cigarettes held in vending machines as of that date do not require that stamp.
3. Vending machines. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it is
presumed that all cigarette vending machines are filled to capacity on January 5, 2026 and
that the tax imposed by this section must be reported on that basis. A credit against this
inventory tax must be allowed for cigarettes stamped at the rate of 175 mills per cigarette
placed in vending machines before January 5, 2026.
4. Payment. Payment of the tax imposed by this section must be made to the assessor
by April 1, 2026, accompanied by forms prescribed by the assessor.
Sec. E-4. 36 MRSA §4366-A, sub-§2, ¶D, as amended by PL 2007, c. 438, §93,
is further amended to read:
D. For stamps at the face value of 100 175 mills, the discount rate is 1.15% 0.66%.
Sec. E-5. 36 MRSA §4403, as amended by PL 2023, c. 441, Pt. E, §§16 to 19 and
affected by §28, is further amended to read:
§4403. Tax on tobacco products
1. Smokeless tobacco before January 5, 2026. A Before January 5, 2026, a tax is
imposed on smokeless tobacco, including chewing tobacco and snuff, at the rate of:
A. On amounts of smokeless tobacco packaged for sale to the consumer in a package
that contains one ounce or more of smokeless tobacco, $2.02 per ounce and prorated;
and
B. On smokeless tobacco packaged for sale to the consumer in a package that contains
less than one ounce of smokeless tobacco, $2.02 per package.
Page 290 - 132LR2409(17)

Beginning January 2, 2020, the tax rates in this subsection are subject to adjustment
pursuant to subsection 5.
1-A. Smokeless tobacco on or after January 5, 2026. Beginning January 5, 2026, a
tax is imposed on smokeless tobacco, including chewing tobacco and snuff, at the rate of:
A. On amounts of smokeless tobacco packaged for sale to the consumer in a package
that contains one ounce or more of smokeless tobacco, $3.54 per ounce and prorated;
and
B. On smokeless tobacco packaged for sale to the consumer in a package that contains
less than one ounce of smokeless tobacco, $3.54 per package.
The tax rates in this subsection are subject to adjustment pursuant to subsection 5.
2. Other tobacco. Beginning January 2, 2020, and before January 1, 2024, a tax is
imposed on all tobacco products, other than those subject to tax under subsection 1, at the
rate of 43% of the wholesale sales price. Beginning January 1, 2024, and before January 5,
2026, a tax is imposed on all tobacco products, other than those subject to tax under
subsection 1, at the rate of 43% of the cost price. Beginning January 5, 2026, a tax is
imposed on all tobacco products, other than those subject to tax under subsection 1-A, at
the rate of 75% of the cost price. Beginning January 2, 2020, the tax rate imposed pursuant
to this subsection is subject to adjustment pursuant to subsection 5.
3. Imposition. The tax is imposed at the time the distributor or remote retail seller
brings or causes to be brought into this State tobacco products that are for sale or for use or
at the time tobacco products are manufactured or fabricated in this State for sale in this
State.
5. Equivalence. If the tax on cigarettes under chapter 703 is increased after January
2, 2020 5, 2026, the assessor shall calculate a rate of tax on other tobacco products under
subsections 1, 1-A and 2 that is equivalent to the same percentage change in the tax rate for
one cigarette. The adjusted rates calculated by the assessor take effect at the same time as
the increase in the tax on cigarettes.
A tobacco product may be taxed only once by the State in accordance with this section.
Sec. E-6. Effective date. This Part takes effect January 5, 2026.
PART F
Sec. F-1. 36 MRSA §1811, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2025, c. 87, §7, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (5) to read:
(5) Ten percent Before January 1, 2026, 10% on the value of adult use cannabis,
adult use cannabis products and, if sold by a person to an individual who is not a
qualifying patient, cannabis and cannabis products beginning on the first day of the
calendar month in which adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products may
be sold in the State by a cannabis establishment licensed to conduct retail sales
pursuant to Title 28‑B, chapter 1. For sales occurring on or after January 1, 2026,
the applicable rate of tax under this subparagraph is 14%.
Sec. F-2. 36 MRSA §1818, as amended by PL 2021, c. 645, §5 and c. 669, §5, is
further amended to read:
§1818. Tax on adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products
Page 291 - 132LR2409(17)

All Before January 1, 2026, all sales tax revenue collected pursuant to section 1811 on
the sale of adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products must be deposited into the
General Fund, except that, before January 1, 2026, on or before the last day of each month,
the State Controller shall transfer 12% of the sales tax revenue received by the assessor
during the preceding month pursuant to section 1811 to the Adult Use Cannabis Public
Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in Fund established under Title 28‑B, section 1101.
Beginning January 1, 2026, on or before the last day of each month, the State Controller
shall transfer 9% of the sales tax revenue received by the assessor on the sale of adult use
cannabis and adult use cannabis products during the preceding month pursuant to section
1811 to the Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in Fund
established under Title 28‑B, section 1101.
Sec. F-3. 36 MRSA §4923, as amended by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. C, §13, is further
amended to read:
§4923. Excise tax imposed
Beginning on the first day of the calendar month in which adult use cannabis may be
sold in the State by a cultivation facility under Title 28‑B, chapter 1, an excise tax on adult
use cannabis is imposed in accordance with this chapter.
1. Excise tax on cannabis flower. A Before January 1, 2026, a cultivation facility
licensee shall pay an excise tax of $335 per pound or fraction thereof of cannabis flower
sold to other licensees in the State. Beginning January 1, 2026, a cultivation facility
licensee shall pay an excise tax of $223 per pound or fraction thereof of cannabis flower
sold to other licensees in the State.
2. Excise tax on cannabis trim. A Before January 1, 2026, a cultivation facility
licensee shall pay an excise tax of $94 per pound or fraction thereof of cannabis trim sold
to other licensees in the State. Beginning January 1, 2026, a cultivation facility licensee
shall pay an excise tax of $63 per pound or fraction thereof of cannabis trim sold to other
licensees in the State.
3. Excise tax on immature cannabis plants and seedlings. A Before January 1,
2026, a cultivation facility licensee shall pay an excise tax of $1.50 per immature cannabis
plant or seedling sold to other licensees in the State. Beginning January 1, 2026, a
cultivation facility licensee shall pay an excise tax of $1 per immature cannabis plant or
seedling sold to other licensees in the State.
3-A. Excise tax on mature cannabis plants. Beginning July 1, 2021, and before
January 1, 2026, a cultivation facility licensee shall pay an excise tax of $35 per mature
cannabis plant sold to other licensees in the State. Beginning January 1, 2026, a cultivation
facility licensee shall pay an excise tax of $23 per mature cannabis plant sold to other
licensees in the State.
4. Excise tax on cannabis seeds. A Before January 1, 2026, a cultivation facility
licensee shall pay an excise tax of 30¢ per cannabis seed sold to other licensees in the State.
Beginning January 1, 2026, a cultivation facility licensee shall pay an excise tax of 20¢ per
cannabis seed sold to other licensees in the State.
5. Excise tax on purchases from registered caregivers and registered dispensaries.
A cultivation facility licensee authorized pursuant to Title 28‑B to purchase cannabis plants
and cannabis seeds from registered caregivers and registered dispensaries that transacts
Page 292 - 132LR2409(17)

such a purchase shall pay to the assessor the excise taxes that would have been imposed
under subsections 1 to 4 on the sale of the cannabis plants and cannabis seeds if the cannabis
plants and cannabis seeds had been sold by a cultivation facility licensee to another
licensee.
6. Multiple licenses. When a cultivation facility licensee also holds a license to
operate another cannabis establishment, the taxes imposed by subsections 1 to 4 apply to
any transfer of cannabis from the cultivation facility to the other cannabis establishment or,
if no such transfer is made, to any activity undertaken pursuant to Title 28‑B, section 501,
subsection 2 or 4 with regard to cannabis cultivated by the cultivation facility.
7. Sales and transfers between licensed cultivation facilities. An excise tax is not
imposed on a sale of adult use cannabis to a cultivation facility or on a transfer of adult use
cannabis to a cultivation facility.
Sec. F-4. 36 MRSA §4925, as amended by PL 2021, c. 645, §6 and c. 669, §5, is
further amended to read:
§4925. Application of excise tax revenue
All Before January 1, 2026, all excise tax revenue collected by the assessor pursuant
to this chapter on the sale of adult use cannabis must be deposited into the General Fund,
except that, before January 1, 2026, on or before the last day of each month, the assessor
shall transfer 12% of the excise tax revenue received during the preceding month pursuant
to this chapter to the Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in
Fund established in Title 28‑B, section 1101. Beginning January 1, 2026, on or before the
last day of each month, the assessor shall transfer 9% of the excise tax revenue received
during the preceding month pursuant to this chapter to the Adult Use Cannabis Public
Health and Safety and Municipal Opt-in Fund established in Title 28-B, section 1101.
Sec. F-5. Effective date. This Part takes effect January 1, 2026.
PART G
Sec. G-1. 30-A MRSA §5681, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. XXX,
§1 and affected by §15, is further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to
read:
Beginning January 1, 2025, no later than the 10th day of each month, the State Controller
shall transfer to the Local Government Fund 5% of the receipts during the previous month
from the taxes imposed under Title 36, Parts 3 and 8 and Title 36, former section 2552,
subsection 1‑A, and credited to the General Fund without any reduction, except that the
postage, state cost allocation program and programming costs of administering state-
municipal revenue sharing may be paid by the Local Government Fund. Twenty percent of
the amounts transferred to the Local Government Fund each month must be transferred to
the Disproportionate Tax Burden Fund and distributed pursuant to subsection 4‑B.
Sec. G-2. 36 MRSA §182, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2007, c. 437, §2, is further
amended to read:
1. Generally. The State Tax Assessor may, through the Attorney General, file an
action in Superior Court applying for an order to enjoin from doing business any person
who has:
Page 293 - 132LR2409(17)

A. Failed to register with the assessor when the person is required to register by any
provision of Part 3, chapter 358 or Part 5 or by any rule adopted pursuant to this Title,
as long as the assessor has provided written notice and the person continues to fail to
register 15 days after receiving notice from the assessor of such failure;
B. Failed to file with the assessor any overdue return required by Part 3, chapter 358
or Part 5 within 15 days after receiving notice from the assessor of such failure;
C. Failed to pay any tax required by Part 3, chapter 358 or Part 5 when the tax is shown
to be due on a return filed by that person, or that is otherwise conceded by that person
to be due, or has been determined by the assessor to be due and that determination has
become final;
D. Knowingly filed a false return required by Part 3, chapter 358 or Part 5; or
E. Failed to deduct and withhold, or truthfully account for or pay over or make returns
of, income taxes in violation of the provisions of chapter 827.
Sec. G-3. 36 MRSA §191, sub-§2, ¶EE, as amended by PL 2023, c. 360, Pt. C,
§3, is further amended to read:
EE. The disclosure by the State Tax Assessor of the fact that a person has or has not
been issued a certificate of exemption pursuant to section 1760, 2013 or 2557 or 2013
or a resale certificate pursuant to section 1754‑B, subsection 2‑B or 2‑C. The
exemption under this paragraph is limited to the disclosure of information applicable
to the previous 6 years;
Sec. G-4. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§1-K is enacted to read:
1-K. Ancillary service. "Ancillary service" means a service that is associated with or
incidental to the provision of telecommunications services, including, but not limited to,
detailed telecommunications billing service, directory assistance, vertical service and voice
mail service.
Sec. G-5. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§1-L is enacted to read:
1-L. Breast pump. "Breast pump" means an electronically or manually controlled
pump device used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, including any
external power supply unit packaged and sold with the pump device at the time of sale to
power the pump device. "Breast pump" includes breast pump replacement parts, breast
pump collection and storage supplies and breast pump kits. For the purposes of this
subsection, "breast pump collection and storage supplies" means tangible personal property
to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect milk expressed from a human breast
and to store collected milk until it is ready for consumption.
Sec. G-6. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§1-M is enacted to read:
1-M. Cable and satellite television or radio services. "Cable and satellite television
or radio services" means all cable and satellite television or radio services, including the
installation or use of associated equipment, for which a charge is made.
Sec. G-7. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§1-N is enacted to read:
1-N. Conference bridging service. "Conference bridging service" means an ancillary
service that links 2 or more participants in an audio or video conference call and may
Page 294 - 132LR2409(17)

include the provision of a telephone number. "Conference bridging service" does not
include the telecommunications services used to reach the conference bridge.
Sec. G-8. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§1-O is enacted to read:
1-O. Detailed telecommunications billing service. "Detailed telecommunications
billing service" means an ancillary service of separately stating information pertaining to
individual calls on a customer's billing statement.
Sec. G-9. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§1-P is enacted to read:
1-P. Digital audiovisual and digital audio services. "Digital audiovisual and digital
audio services" means the electronic transfer of digital audiovisual works and digital audio
works to an end user with the right of less than permanent use granted by the seller,
including when conditioned upon continued payment from the purchaser or a subscription.
For purposes of this subsection:
A. "End user" means a person other than a person who receives by contract a product
transferred electronically for further commercial broadcast, rebroadcast, transmission,
retransmission, licensing, relicensing, distribution, redistribution or exhibition of the
product, in whole or in part, to another person;
B. "Permanent" means perpetual or for an indefinite or unspecified length of time;
C. "Subscription" means an agreement with a seller that grants a purchaser the right to
obtain products transferred electronically, in a fixed quantity or for a fixed period of
time, or both; and
D. "Transfer electronically" or "electronic transfer" means obtainment by the
purchaser by means other than tangible storage media.
Sec. G-10. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§1-Q is enacted to read:
1-Q. Digital audiovisual works. "Digital audiovisual works" means a series of related
images that, when shown in succession, impart an impression of motion, together with
accompanying sounds, if any.
Sec. G-11. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§1-R is enacted to read:
1-R. Digital audio works. "Digital audio works" means works that result from the
fixation of a series of musical, spoken or other sounds, including ringtones. For purposes
of this subsection, "ringtones" means digitized sound files that are downloaded onto a
device and that may be used to alert the purchaser with respect to a communication.
Sec. G-12. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§2-F is enacted to read:
2-F. Directory assistance. "Directory assistance" means an ancillary service of
providing telephone number information or address information or both.
Sec. G-13. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§2-G is enacted to read:
2-G. Durable medical equipment. "Durable medical equipment" means equipment,
including repair and replacement parts for such equipment, that:
A. Can withstand repeated use;
B. Is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose;
Page 295 - 132LR2409(17)

C. Generally is not useful to a person in the absence of illness or injury; and
D. Is not worn in or on the body.
"Durable medical equipment" does not include mobility-enhancing equipment.
Sec. G-14. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§2-H is enacted to read:
2-H. Fabrication services. "Fabrication services" means the production of tangible
personal property for a consideration for a person who furnishes, either directly or
indirectly, the materials used in that production.
Sec. G-15. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§3-E, as repealed by PL 2003, c. 673, Pt. V, §10
and affected by §29, is reenacted to read:
3-E. Home service provider. "Home service provider" means the facilities-based
carrier or reseller with which a customer contracts for the provision of mobile
telecommunications services.
Sec. G-16. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. International telecommunications service. "International telecommunications
service" means a telecommunications service that originates or terminates in the United
States and terminates or originates outside the United States, respectively. For purposes of
this subsection, "United States" includes a territory or possession of the United States.
Sec. G-17. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§4-B is enacted to read:
4-B. Interstate telecommunications service. "Interstate telecommunications
service" means a telecommunications service that originates in one state, territory or
possession of the United States and terminates in a different state, territory or possession
of the United States. For purposes of this subsection, "state" includes the District of
Columbia.
Sec. G-18. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§5-D, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. H,
§2 and affected by §29 and enacted by c. 673, §2 and affected by §28, is amended to read:
B. A transfer of possession or control of property under a security agreement or
deferred payment plan that requires the transfer of title upon completion of the required
payments; or
Sec. G-19. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§5-D, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. H,
§2 and affected by §29 and enacted by c. 673, §2 and affected by §28, is amended to read:
C. Providing tangible personal property along with a person to operate that property,
for a fixed or indeterminate period of time, when that person is necessary for the
tangible personal property to perform as designed and the person does more than
maintain, inspect or set up the tangible personal property; or.
Sec. G-20. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§5-D, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. H,
§2 and affected by §29 and enacted by c. 673, §2 and affected by §28, is repealed.
Sec. G-21. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§6-J is enacted to read:
6-J. Mobile telecommunications services. "Mobile telecommunications services"
means commercial mobile radio service as defined in 47 Code of Federal Regulations,
Section 20.3 as in effect October 1, 2015. For purposes of sourcing, "mobile
Page 296 - 132LR2409(17)

telecommunications services" does not include air-ground radiotelephone service as
defined in 47 Code of Federal Regulations, Section 22.99 as in effect October 1, 2015.
Sec. G-22. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§6-K is enacted to read:
6-K. Mobility-enhancing equipment. "Mobility-enhancing equipment" means
equipment, including repair and replacement parts for such equipment, that:
A. Is primarily and customarily used to provide or increase the ability to move from
one place to another and that is appropriate for use either in a home or a motor vehicle;
B. Is not generally used by persons with normal mobility; and
C. Does not include any motor vehicle or equipment on a motor vehicle normally
provided by a motor vehicle manufacturer.
"Mobility-enhancing equipment" does not include durable medical equipment.
Sec. G-23. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§7-E, as repealed by PL 2003, c. 673, Pt. V, §13
and affected by §29, is reenacted to read:
7-E. Place of primary use. "Place of primary use" means the street address
representative of where a customer's use of mobile telecommunications services primarily
occurs, which must be either the residential street address or the primary business street
address of the customer and must also be located within the licensed service area of the
home service provider. For purposes of determining the place of primary use, "customer"
means the person or entity that contracts with the home service provider for mobile
telecommunications services, or, if the end user of such services is not the contracting party,
the person that is the end user of such services. The term "customer" does not include a
reseller of mobile telecommunications services, or a serving carrier under an agreement to
serve the customer outside the home service provider's licensed service area.
Sec. G-24. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§7-F, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 401, Pt. B, §2,
is repealed.
Sec. G-25. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§8-C, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt. PP, §1
and affected by §4, is repealed.
Sec. G-26. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§9-D, as repealed by PL 2003, c. 673, Pt. V, §15
and affected by §29, is reenacted to read:
9-D. Reseller. "Reseller," when used in relation to mobile telecommunications
services, means a provider that purchases telecommunications services from another
telecommunications service provider and then resells, uses as a component part of or
integrates the purchased services into mobile telecommunications services. "Reseller" does
not include a serving carrier with which a home service provider arranges for services to
its customers outside the home service provider's licensed service area.
Sec. G-27. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§11, ¶B, as amended by PL 2025, c. 113, Pt. B,
§1, is further amended by repealing subparagraph (4).
Sec. G-28. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§11, ¶B, as amended by PL 2025, c. 113, Pt. B,
§1, is further amended by repealing subparagraph (7).
Sec. G-29. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§11, ¶B, as amended by PL 2025, c. 113, Pt. B,
§1, is further amended by amending subparagraph (14) to read:
Page 297 - 132LR2409(17)

(14) The sale of repair parts used in the performance of repair services on
telecommunications equipment as defined in section 2551, subsection 19 pursuant
to an extended service contract that entitles the purchaser to specific benefits in the
service of the telecommunications equipment for a specific duration;
Sec. G-30. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§11, ¶B, as amended by PL 2025, c. 113, Pt. B,
§1, is further amended by repealing subparagraph (15).
Sec. G-31. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§14, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. H,
§§14 to 18 and affected by §29 and amended by c. 673, §§14 to 18 and affected by §28, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) The price received for labor or services used in installing or applying or
repairing the property sold or fabricated, if separately charged or stated;
Sec. G-32. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§14-D, as repealed by PL 2003, c. 673, Pt. V,
§17 and affected by §29, is reenacted to read:
14-D. Serving carrier. "Serving carrier," when used in relation to mobile
telecommunications services, means a facilities-based carrier providing mobile
telecommunications services to a customer outside a home service provider's licensed
service area.
Sec. G-33. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§17-B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. H,
§19 and affected by §29 and amended by c. 673, §19 and affected by §28, is repealed and
the following enacted in its place:
17-B. Taxable service. "Taxable service" means:
A. The rental of living quarters in a hotel, rooming house or tourist or trailer camp;
B. The transmission and distribution of electricity;
C. The sale of an extended service contract on an automobile or truck that entitles the
purchaser to specific benefits in the service of the automobile or truck for a specific
duration;
D. The sale of prepaid calling service;
E. Cable and satellite television or radio services;
F. Fabrication services;
G. Telecommunications services;
H. The installation, maintenance or repair of telecommunications equipment;
I. Ancillary services; and
J. Digital audiovisual and digital audio services.
Sec. G-34. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§17-C is enacted to read:
17-C. Telecommunications equipment. "Telecommunications equipment" means
any 2-way interactive communications device, system or process for transmitting or
receiving signals and capable of exchanging audio, video, data or textual information.
"Telecommunications equipment" includes all transmission media that are used or capable
of being used in the provision of 2-way interactive communications, including, without
limitation, copper wire, coaxial cable and optical fiber, except those transmission media
Page 298 - 132LR2409(17)

designed and primarily used to transmit electricity. "Telecommunications equipment" does
not include computers, except those components of a computer used primarily and directly
as a 2-way interactive communications device capable of exchanging audio, video, data or
textual information.
Sec. G-35. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§17-D is enacted to read:
17-D. Telecommunications services. "Telecommunications services" means the
electronic transmission, conveyance or routing of voice, data, audio, video or any other
information or signals to a point or between or among points. "Telecommunications
services" includes transmission, conveyance or routing in which computer processing
applications are used to act on the form, code or protocol of the content for purposes of
transmission, conveyance or routing without regard to whether the service is referred to as
"Voice over Internet Protocol" services or is classified by the Federal Communications
Commission as enhanced or value added. "Telecommunications services" does not
include:
A. Data processing and information services that allow data to be generated, acquired,
stored, processed or retrieved and delivered by an electronic transmission to a
purchaser when the purchaser's primary purpose for the underlying transaction is to
obtain the processed data or information;
B. Installation or maintenance of wiring or equipment on a customer's premises;
C. Tangible personal property;
D. Advertising, including, but not limited to, directory advertising;
E. Billing and collection services provided to 3rd parties;
F. Internet access service;
G. Radio and television audio and video programming services, regardless of the
medium, including the furnishing of transmission, conveyance and routing of those
services by the programming service provider. Radio and television audio and video
programming services include, but are not limited to, cable service as defined in 47
United States Code, Section 522(6) and audio and video programming services
delivered by commercial mobile radio service providers as defined in 47 Code of
Federal Regulations, Section 20.3;
H. Ancillary services; or
I. Digital products delivered electronically, including, but not limited to, software,
music, video, reading materials or ringtones.
Sec. G-36. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§22-A is enacted to read:
22-A. Vertical service. "Vertical service" means an ancillary service that is offered
in connection with one or more telecommunications services and offers advanced calling
features that allow customers to identify callers and to manage multiple calls and call
connections. "Vertical service" includes conference bridging service.
Sec. G-37. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§23-A is enacted to read:
23-A. Voice mail service. "Voice mail service" means an ancillary service that
enables the customer to store, send or receive recorded messages. "Voice mail service"
Page 299 - 132LR2409(17)

does not include a vertical service that the customer may be required to have in order to
use the voice mail service.
Sec. G-38. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§9-I is enacted to read:
9-I. Fuel used at manufacturing facility. Ninety-five percent of the sale price of
fabrication services for the production of fuel for use at a manufacturing facility.
Sec. G-39. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§94, as amended by PL 2019, c. 401, Pt. B, §15,
is repealed.
Sec. G-40. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§116 is enacted to read:
116. Durable medical equipment; breast pumps. Beginning January 1, 2026, sales
of:
A. Durable medical equipment for home use; and
B. Breast pumps for home use.
Sec. G-41. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§117 is enacted to read:
117. Mobility-enhancing equipment. Beginning January 1, 2026, sales of mobility-
enhancing equipment for home use or use in a motor vehicle.
Sec. G-42. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§118 is enacted to read:
118. Fabrication services for resale. Beginning January 1, 2026, the production of
tangible personal property through fabrication services if a sale to the consumer of that
tangible personal property would be exempt or otherwise not subject to tax under this Part.
Sec. G-43. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§119 is enacted to read:
119. International telecommunications service. Beginning January 1, 2026, sales
of international telecommunications service to a business for use directly in that business.
Sec. G-44. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§120 is enacted to read:
120. Interstate telecommunications service. Beginning January 1, 2026, sales of
interstate telecommunications service to a business for use directly in that business.
Sec. G-45. 36 MRSA §1819, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. H, §24
and affected by §29 and amended by c. 673, §23 and affected by §28, is further amended
to read:
2. Sourcing for sales of tangible personal property and taxable services; generally.
The sale of tangible personal property or a taxable service is sourced in this State pursuant
to this subsection, except the sale of mobile telecommunications services, which is sourced
under subsection 6. Except as provided in subsections 3 to 5, the provisions of this
subsection do not apply to the lease or rental of tangible personal property.
A. When the tangible personal property or taxable service is received by the purchaser
at a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to that business location.
B. When the tangible personal property or taxable service is not received by the
purchaser at a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to the location where
receipt by the purchaser or the purchaser's donee occurs, including the location
indicated by instructions for delivery to the purchaser or donee known to the seller.
Page 300 - 132LR2409(17)

C. For a sale when paragraphs A and B do not apply, the sale is sourced to the location
indicated by an address for the purchaser that is available from the business records of
the seller that are maintained in the ordinary course of the seller's business when use of
this address does not constitute bad faith.
D. For a sale when paragraphs A to C do not apply, the sale is sourced to the location
indicated by an address for the purchaser obtained during the consummation of the
sale, including the address of a purchaser's payment instrument, if no other address is
available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith.
E. When paragraphs A to D do not apply, including the circumstance in which the
seller is without sufficient information to apply paragraphs A to D, the location is
determined by the address from which tangible personal property was shipped, from
which the tangible personal property or taxable service transferred electronically was
first available for transmission by the seller or from which the service was provided,
disregarding for these purposes any location that merely provided the digital transfer
of the tangible personal property or taxable service sold.
Sec. G-46. 36 MRSA §1819, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Sourcing for mobile telecommunications services. The sale of mobile
telecommunications services is sourced in this State pursuant to this subsection.
A. Mobile telecommunications services provided to a customer whose place of
primary use is located in this State, the charges for which are billed by or for the
customer's home service provider, are deemed to be provided at the customer's place
of primary use. A home service provider is responsible for obtaining and maintaining
a record of a customer's place of primary use. Subject to paragraph B and if the home
service provider's reliance on the information provided by its customer is in good faith,
the home service provider:
(1) May rely on the applicable residential or business street address supplied by
the home service provider's customer; and
(2) May not be held liable for any additional taxes under this Part based on a
different determination of the place of primary use.
B. If the assessor determines that the address used by a home service provider as a
customer's place of primary use does not meet the definition provided by section 1752,
subsection 7-E, the assessor shall notify the customer in writing of that determination
and provide the customer an opportunity to demonstrate that that address is the
customer's place of primary use. If the customer fails to demonstrate to the assessor's
satisfaction within 30 days from the time the customer receives notice from the
assessor, or within another time period as the assessor may allow, that the address in
question is the customer's place of primary use, the assessor shall provide the home
service provider with the proper address to be used as the customer's place of primary
use. The home service provider shall begin using the address provided by the assessor
as the customer's place of primary use within 30 days from the date the home service
provider receives notice of the assessor's determination.
C. A home service provider is entitled to the hold harmless protections provided by
Section 1 of the federal Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, Public Law
106-252, 114 Stat. 626 (2000).
Page 301 - 132LR2409(17)

D. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Part, otherwise nontaxable charges that
are aggregated with and not separately stated from taxable mobile telecommunications
charges are subject to taxation unless the home service provider can, to the satisfaction
of the assessor, reasonably identify such charges from the home service provider's
books and records kept in the regular course of its business. A customer may not rely
upon the nontaxability of bundled services unless the customer's home service provider
separately states the otherwise nontaxable services or the home service provider elects,
after receiving written notice from the customer in the form required by the provider,
to provide verifiable data based upon the home service provider's books and records
that are kept in the regular course of its business and that reasonably identify the
nontaxable charges.
Sec. G-47. 36 MRSA c. 358, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. G-48. Application. This Part applies to sales of tangible personal property and
taxable services on or after January 1, 2026.
PART H
Sec. H-1. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§2, ¶M-3 is enacted to read:
M-3. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the amount in paragraph
M-2, subparagraph (1), division (a) must be reduced by an amount equal to the total
amount in paragraph M-2, subparagraph (1), division (a) multiplied by a fraction, the
numerator of which is the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income less the applicable
amount, except that the numerator may not be less than zero, and the denominator of
which is $50,000 in the case of a married individual filing a separate return and
$100,000 in all other filing cases. The fraction contained in this paragraph may not
produce a result that is more than one. The applicable amount must be adjusted for
inflation in accordance with section 5403, subsection 10.
For purposes of this paragraph, "applicable amount" means:
(1) For individuals filing as single individuals, $125,000;
(2) For individuals filing as heads of households, $187,500;
(3) For individuals filing married joint returns or as surviving spouses, $250,000;
or
(4) For married individuals filing separate returns, 1/2 of the applicable amount
under subparagraph (3);
Sec. H-2. 36 MRSA §5403, sub-§8, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. ZZZ, §9,
is further amended to read:
8. Personal exemption phase-out. Beginning in 2018 and each year thereafter, by
the dollar amount of the applicable amounts specified in section 5126‑A, subsection 2,
paragraphs A, B and C, except that for the purposes of this subsection, notwithstanding
section 5402, subsection 1‑B, the "cost-of-living adjustment" is the Chained Consumer
Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30th of the preceding calendar year
divided by the Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30,
2017; and
Page 302 - 132LR2409(17)

Sec. H-3. 36 MRSA §5403, sub-§9, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. ZZZ, §10,
is amended to read:
9. Dependent exemption tax credit amount. Beginning in 2024 and each year
thereafter, by the dollar amount of the dependent exemption tax credit under section
5219‑SS, except that for the purposes of this subsection, notwithstanding section 5402,
subsection 1‑B, the "cost-of-living adjustment" is the Chained Consumer Price Index for
the 12-month period ending June 30th of the preceding calendar year divided by the
Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30, 2023. If the credit
amount, adjusted by application of the cost-of-living adjustment, is not a multiple of $5,
any increase must be rounded to the next lowest multiple of $5.; and
Sec. H-4. 36 MRSA §5403, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Income deduction for retirement plan benefits; applicable amount. Beginning
in 2025 and each year thereafter, by the dollar amount of the applicable amounts specified
in section 5122, subsection 2, paragraph M-3, except that for the purposes of this
subsection, notwithstanding section 5402, subsection 1‑B, the "cost-of-living adjustment"
is the Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30th of the
preceding calendar year divided by the Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month
period ending June 30, 2024.
PART I
Sec. I-1. 5 MRSA §1742, sub-§20-B is enacted to read:
20-B. Renewable energy credits; purchase, retirement and sale. To purchase,
retire and sell renewable energy credits. Net proceeds from the purchase, retirement or sale
of renewable energy credits must first be applied to achieve the State's obligation under
section 1766-A to supply electricity used in state-owned buildings with 100% renewable
resources. If the State generates more renewable energy credits than needed to fulfill the
obligation under section 1766-A, the credits may be sold and the proceeds placed in a Lead
by Example Program Other Special Revenue Funds account established pursuant to section
1742-H. For purposes of this subsection, "renewable energy credit" has the same meaning
as in Title 35-A, section 3210, subsection 2, paragraph B-2.
The Bureau of General Services shall adopt rules for the sale and purchase of renewable
energy credits under this subsection; the administration of sale proceeds; the allocation and
distribution of renewable energy credit proceeds; the reimbursement of renewable energy
credits, including federal Internal Revenue Service elective pay reimbursements; and the
administration of the Lead by Example Program established in section 1742-H. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A;
Sec. I-2. 5 MRSA §1742-H is enacted to read:
§1742-H. Bureau of General Services; Lead by Example Program
1. Program established. The Lead by Example Program, referred to in this section
as "the program," is established within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services, Bureau of General Services to consolidate responsibilities regarding statewide
energy data, strategic energy purchases and the development of renewable energy projects
and serve as a competitive, revolving grant program for state agency renewable energy and
Page 303 - 132LR2409(17)

building efficiency projects, the purchase of electric vehicles, the construction of electric
vehicle charging stations and initiatives that support maintenance, upgrades and upkeep of
renewable energy systems.
2. Assistance and funding. The program may receive federal clean energy direct
reimbursements, including under the federal Internal Revenue Service elective pay
reimbursement program established under the federal Inflation Reduction Act of 2022,
Public Law 117-169. All funds received must be placed in the same Other Special Revenue
Funds account.
PART J
Sec. J-1. 4 MRSA §1610-R is enacted to read:
§1610-R. Additional securities for capital construction, repairs and improvements
and hazardous waste cleanup
Notwithstanding any limitation on the amount of securities that may be issued pursuant
to section 1606, subsection 2, the authority may issue additional securities in an amount
not to exceed $28,000,000 outstanding at any one time for capital repairs and improvements
to and construction of state-owned facilities and hazardous waste cleanup on state-owned
properties.
Sec. J-2. 4 MRSA §1610-S is enacted to read:
§1610-S. Additional securities for correctional facilities
Notwithstanding any limitation on the amount of securities that may be issued pursuant
to section 1606, subsection 2, the authority may issue additional securities in an amount
not to exceed $25,000,000 outstanding at any one time for capital repairs and improvements
to and construction of correctional facilities.
Sec. J-3. Maine Governmental Facilities Authority; issuance of securities;
state-owned facilities and hazardous waste cleanup. Pursuant to the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 4, section 1606, subsection 2 and Title 4, section 1610-R, and
notwithstanding the limitation contained in Title 4, section 1606, subsection 2 regarding
the amount of securities that may be issued, the Maine Governmental Facilities Authority
is authorized to issue securities in its own name in an amount up to $28,000,000. Proceeds
must be used for the purpose of paying the costs associated with capital repairs and
improvements to and construction of state-owned facilities and hazardous waste cleanup
on state-owned properties as designated by the Commissioner of Administrative and
Financial Services.
Sec. J-4. Maine Governmental Facilities Authority; issuance of securities;
correctional facilities. Pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 4, section 1606,
subsection 2 and Title 4, section 1610-S, and notwithstanding the limitation contained in
Title 4, section 1606, subsection 2 regarding the amount of securities that may be issued,
the Maine Governmental Facilities Authority is authorized to issue securities in its own
name in an amount up to $25,000,000. Proceeds must be used for the purpose of paying the
costs associated with capital repairs and improvements to and construction of correctional
facilities as designated by the Commissioner of Administrative and Financial Services.
PART K
Page 304 - 132LR2409(17)

Sec. K-1. Department of Administrative and Financial Services; lease-
purchase authorization. Pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 1587,
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, in cooperation with the Treasurer
of State, may enter into financing agreements in fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27 for the
acquisition of motor vehicles for the Central Fleet Management Division. The financing
agreements entered into in each fiscal year may not exceed $13,500,000 in principal costs,
and a financing agreement may not exceed 6 years in duration. The interest rate may not
exceed 7%. The annual principal and interest costs must be paid from the appropriate line
category allocations in the Central Fleet Management Division account.
PART L
Sec. L-1. Department of Administrative and Financial Services; Statewide
Radio Network System Reserve Fund; lease-purchase authorization. Pursuant
to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 1587, the Department of Administrative and
Financial Services, in cooperation with the Treasurer of State, may enter into financing
agreements in fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27 for the acquisition of hardware, software
and systems to support the operations of the Statewide Radio Network System Reserve
Fund, established in Title 5, section 1520, specifically for purchasing portables, ongoing
upgrades of tower hardware and the purchase of equipment in support of tower
maintenance. The financing agreements entered into in each fiscal year may not exceed
$3,000,000 in fiscal year 2025-26 and $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-27 in principal costs,
and a financing agreement may not exceed 7 years in duration. The interest rate on each
financing agreement may not exceed 7%. The annual principal and interest costs must be
paid from the appropriate line category appropriations in the Department of Administrative
and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology accounts.
PART M
Sec. M-1. Department of Administrative and Financial Services; lease-
purchase authorization. Pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 1587,
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, in cooperation with the Treasurer
of State, may enter into financing agreements in fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27 for
improvements to the State's technology infrastructure and data centers; purchase of
enterprise software; modernization of databases, storage and other components; and
improved security of personally identifiable information and other confidential data. The
financing agreements entered into in each fiscal year may not exceed $8,000,000 in fiscal
year 2025-26 and $8,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-27 in principal costs, and a financing
agreement may not exceed 7 years in duration. The interest rate on each financing
agreement may not exceed 7%. The annual principal and interest costs must be paid from
the appropriate line category appropriations in the Department of Administrative and
Financial Services, Office of Information Technology accounts.
PART N
Sec. N-1. 5 MRSA §1591, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 12, Pt. GGGG, §2, is
amended to read:
1. Department of Administrative and Financial Services. The Department of
Administrative and Financial Services must apply:
Page 305 - 132LR2409(17)

A. Any balance remaining in the Salary Plan program in the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services at the end of any fiscal year to be carried forward
for the next fiscal year; and
B. Any balance remaining in the General Fund Capital, Construction, Repairs,
Improvements - Administrative program in the Department of Administrative and
Financial Services at the end of any fiscal year to be carried forward for the next fiscal
year.;
C. Any balance remaining in the Debt Service - Government Facilities Authority
program, General Fund account in the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services at the end of any fiscal year to be carried forward for the next fiscal year; and
D. Any balance remaining in the Central Administrative Applications program,
General Fund account in the Department of Administrative and Financial Services at
the end of any fiscal year to be carried forward for the next fiscal year.
PART O
Sec. O-1. State Controller; post-closing. The State Controller is authorized to
keep open the official system of general accounts of State Government for fiscal year 2024-
25 in order to make post-closing entries and adjustments to carry out the provisions of this
Act.
Sec. O-2. Retroactivity. This Part applies retroactively to June 30, 2025.
PART P
Sec. P-1. 22 MRSA §1728, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 276, §1, is repealed.
Sec. P-2. 22 MRSA §1728, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Hospital" means:
(1) An acute care institution licensed and operating in this State as a hospital under
section 1811 or the parent of such an institution; or
(2) A hospital subsidiary or hospital affiliate in the State that provides medical
services or medically related diagnostic and laboratory services or engages in
ancillary activities supporting those services.
B. "340B contract pharmacy" has the same meaning as in Title 24-A, section 7752,
subsection 5.
C. "340B drug" has the same meaning as in Title 24-A, section 7752, subsection 6.
D. "340B entity" has the same meaning as in Title 24-A, section 7752, subsection 7.
Sec. P-3. 22 MRSA §1728, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Additional reporting by hospitals on participation in federal 340B drug
program. In addition to any report required pursuant to subsection 2, beginning July 1,
2026, each hospital participating in the 340B program shall provide an annual report to the
Maine Health Data Organization. The Maine Health Data Organization shall post the report
on its publicly accessible website. Each hospital shall report in a standardized format, as
Page 306 - 132LR2409(17)

agreed upon by the Maine Health Data Organization and the hospital, and include, at a
minimum, the following information in the report:
A. The hospital's national provider identification number;
B. The name of the hospital;
C. The address of the hospital for the purpose of accepting service of process;
D. The classification of the hospital;
E. The aggregated acquisition cost for the prescription drugs obtained under the 340B
program;
F. The aggregated payment amount received for the prescription drugs obtained under
the 340B program and dispensed to patients;
G. The number of pricing units dispensed or administered for prescription drugs
described in paragraph F;
H. The aggregated payments made:
(1) To 340B contract pharmacies to dispense 340B drugs;
(2) To any other entity that is not the 340B entity and is not a 340B contract
pharmacy for managing any aspect of the hospital's 340B program; and
(3) For all other expenses related to administering the 340B program; and
I. The number of claims for prescription drugs described in paragraph H.
The information required under this subsection must be reported by payor type, including
commercial insurance, medical assistance, the MaineCare program and Medicare as
required by the Maine Health Data Organization. The information for paragraphs E to G
must also be reported at the National Drug Code level for the 50 most frequently dispensed
prescription drugs by the hospital under the 340B program. The information must include
all physician-administered and physician-dispensed prescription drugs.
Data submitted must also include prescription drugs dispensed by outpatient facilities that
are identified as child facilities under the 340B program based on their inclusion on a
hospital's Medicare cost report.
Sec. P-4. 22 MRSA §1728, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 276, §1, is amended
to read:
3. Reporting. The Maine Health Data Organization shall produce and post on its
publicly accessible website a report that includes a summary of the aggregate information
received from hospitals required to report under subsection 2 and subsection 2-A. The
Maine Health Data Organization shall submit the report required by this subsection to the
Office of Affordable Health Care, as established in Title 5, section 3122, the Maine
Prescription Drug Affordability Board, as established in Title 5, section 12004‑G,
subsection 14‑I, and the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over health data reporting and prescription drug matters.
Sec. P-5. 24-A MRSA c. 103 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 103
Page 307 - 132LR2409(17)

PROTECT HEALTH CARE FOR RURAL AND UNDERSERVED
COMMUNITIES ACT
§7751. Short title
This chapter may be known and cited as "the Protect Health Care for Rural and
Underserved Communities Act."
§7752. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Health insurance issuer. "Health insurance issuer" has the same meaning as
"carrier" as defined in section 4301-A, subsection 3.
2. Manufacturer. "Manufacturer" has the same meaning as in Title 32, section
13702-A, subsection 19.
3. Pharmacy. "Pharmacy" has the same meaning as in Title 32, section 13702-A,
subsection 24.
4. Pharmacy benefits manager. "Pharmacy benefits manager" has the same meaning
as in section 4347, subsection 17.
5. 340B contract pharmacy. "340B contract pharmacy" means a pharmacy that has a
contract with a 340B entity to receive and dispense 340B drugs to the 340B entity's patients
on behalf of the 340B entity. For the purposes of this chapter, a record of a current 340B
contract pharmacy relationship between the 340B entity and the 340B contract pharmacy
that is on the 340B United States Department of Health and Human Services, Health
Resources and Services Administration, Office of Pharmacy Affairs 340B Information
System website, or such publicly accessible successor website maintained by the United
States Department of Health and Human Services, is prima facie evidence of such a
contract.
6. 340B drug. "340B drug" means a drug that is purchased or eligible for purchase
under Section 340B of the federal Public Health Service Act, 42 United States Code,
Section 256b(a)(3).
7. 340B entity. "340B entity" means an entity participating or authorized to participate
in the federal 340B drug discount program, as described in 42 United States Code, Section
256b, including its pharmacy, or any pharmacy contracted with the participating entity to
dispense drugs purchased through the federal 340B drug discount program.
§7753. Prohibition of certain discriminatory actions by manufacturer or agent related
to 340B entities
1. Interference with acquisition or delivery of 340B drugs prohibited. A
manufacturer or its agent may not deny, restrict, prohibit or otherwise interfere with, either
directly or indirectly, the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or delivery of a 340B drug to, a
340B contract pharmacy on behalf of a 340B entity unless receipt of that 340B drug is
prohibited by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.
2. Submission of claims or utilization data prohibited. A manufacturer or its agent
may not, either directly or indirectly, require a 340B entity to submit any claims or
Page 308 - 132LR2409(17)

utilization data as a condition for allowing the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or delivery
of a 340B drug to, a 340B entity unless the claims or utilization data sharing is required by
the United States Department of Health and Human Services.
3. Other interference prohibited. A manufacturer may not otherwise interfere
directly or indirectly with a 340B entity unless expressly authorized by the United States
Department of Health and Human Services.
§7754. Prohibition of certain discriminatory actions with respect to reimbursement
of 340B entities
With respect to reimbursement of a 340B entity for 340B drugs, a health insurance
issuer, pharmacy benefits manager or other 3rd-party payor or agent may not:
1. Reimbursement at lower rate prohibited. Reimburse a 340B entity for 340B drugs
at a rate lower than that paid for the same drug to entities that are not 340B entities or lower
the reimbursement amount for a claim on the basis that the claim is for a 340B drug;
2. Imposition of different terms and conditions prohibited. Impose any terms or
conditions on any 340B entity that differ from such terms or conditions applied to entities
that are not 340B entities or pharmacies that are not 340B contract pharmacies because it
is a 340B entity including, without limitation:
A. Fees, charges, clawbacks or other adjustments or assessments. For purposes of this
paragraph, "other adjustment or assessment" includes, without limitation, placing any
additional requirements, restrictions or burdens upon the 340B entity that result in
administrative costs or fees to the 340B entity that are not placed upon entities that are
not 340B entities, including affiliate pharmacies of the health insurance issuer,
pharmacy benefits manager or other 3rd-party payor;
B. Dispensing fees that are less than the dispensing fees for entities that are not 340B
entities or pharmacies that are not 340B contract pharmacies;
C. Restrictions or requirements regarding participation in standard or preferred
pharmacy networks;
D. Requirements relating to inventory management systems or to the frequency or
scope of audits;
E. Requirements that a claim for a drug dispensed by a pharmacy include any
identification, billing modifier, attestation or other indication that a drug is a 340B drug
in order to be processed or submitted or reimbursed unless it is required by the United
States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services or the Department of Health and Human Services for the administration of the
MaineCare program; or
F. Any other restrictions, conditions, practices or policies that are not imposed on
entities that are not 340B entities;
3. Reversal, resubmission or clarification of claims prohibited. Require a 340B
entity to reverse, resubmit or clarify a claim after the initial adjudication unless these
actions are in the normal course of pharmacy business and are not related to 340B drug
pricing;
Page 309 - 132LR2409(17)

4. Discrimination against 340B entity that interferes with patient choice.
Discriminate against a 340B entity in a manner that prevents or interferes with a patient's
choice to receive 340B drugs from the 340B entity, including the administration of the
drugs. For purposes of this subsection, it is considered a discriminatory practice that
prevents or interferes with a patient's choice to receive drugs at a 340B entity if a health
insurance issuer, pharmacy benefits manager or other 3rd-party payor places any additional
requirements, restrictions or burdens upon the 340B entity that differ from the terms and
conditions applied to entities that are not 340B entities that result in administrative costs or
fees to the 340B entity, including, but not limited to, requiring a claim for a drug dispensed
by a pharmacy to include any identification, billing modifier, attestation or other indication
that a drug is a 340B drug in order to be processed or resubmitted unless it is required by
the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services or the Department of Health and Human Services for the administration
of the MaineCare program;
5. Discrimination against 340B entity that interferes with patient choice of
delivery method. Include any other provision in a contract between a health insurance
issuer, pharmacy benefits manager or other 3rd-party payor and a 340B entity that differs
from the terms and conditions applied to entities that are not 340B entities that
discriminates against the 340B entity that participates in the 340B program or prevents or
interferes with a patient's choice to receive a 340B drug from a 340B entity, whether by
direct administration, in-person dispensing, direct delivery, mail or other form of shipment;
6. Restrictions or additional charges prohibited. Place a restriction or additional
charge on a patient who chooses to receive 340B drugs from a 340B entity if the restriction
or additional charge differs from the terms and conditions applied when patients choose to
receive drugs that are not 340B drugs from an entity that is not a 340B entity or from a
pharmacy that is not a 340B contract pharmacy;
7. Submission of data pertaining to ingredient costs or pricing of 340B drugs
prohibited. Require or compel the submission of ingredient costs or pricing data pertaining
to 340B drugs from a 340B entity to any health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefits
manager or other 3rd-party payor; or
8. Exclusion from pharmacy network prohibited. Exclude any 340B entity from the
health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefits manager or other 3rd-party payor network on
the basis that the 340B entity dispenses 340B drugs or refuse to contract with a 340B entity
for reasons other than those that apply equally to entities that are not 340B entities.
This section may not be construed to limit a health insurance issuer's ability to use
certain preferred pharmacies or develop networks of preferred pharmacies as long as a
health insurance issuer's decision is not based on an entity's status as a 340B entity.
§7755. MaineCare program not affected
This chapter does not apply to the MaineCare program as a payor when the MaineCare
program provides reimbursement for covered outpatient drugs as defined in 42 United
States Code, Section 1396r-8(k)(2).
§7756. Contracting under 340B program
As permitted under federal law and regulation, a 340B entity shall, to the extent
possible, contract with a 340B contract pharmacy that is located in this State.
Page 310 - 132LR2409(17)

§7757. Enforcement
1. Enforcement; violation. Notwithstanding section 12-A, a violation of this chapter
is subject to enforcement under the Maine Unfair Trade Practices Act, including any of the
remedies provided for in that Act. A violation is committed each time a prohibited act
under this chapter occurs. An investigation of a violation by a manufacturer may include a
wholesaler or 3rd party that may possess evidence supporting that investigation.
2. Exemption from enforcement. The limited distribution of a drug required under 21
United States Code, Section 355-1 is not a violation of this chapter.
§7758. Federal preemption; statutory construction
1. No less restrictive than federal law. This chapter may not be construed or applied
to be less restrictive than federal law for a person or entity regulated by this chapter.
2. No conflict with federal law and regulation or other laws of this State. This
chapter may not be construed or applied in any manner that conflicts with:
A. Applicable federal law and related regulations; or
B. Other laws of this State if the law is compatible with applicable federal law.
PART Q
Sec. Q-1. 36 MRSA §5219-SS, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. ZZZ,
§6, is further amended to read:
4. Refundability; phase-out. For tax years beginning before January 1, 2024, the
credit allowed by this section may not reduce the tax otherwise due under this Part to less
than zero. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the credit allowed under
subsections 1, 1‑A, 3 and 3‑A, as increased by subsection 5 for tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2025, is refundable. The amount of the credit allowed by this section must
be reduced, but not below zero, by $7.50 for each $1,000 or fraction thereof by which the
taxpayer's Maine adjusted gross income exceeds $400,000 in the case of a joint return and
$200,000 in any other case.
For tax years beginning before January 1, 2025, the amount of the credit allowed by this
section must be reduced, but not below zero, by $7.50 for each $1,000 or fraction thereof
by which the taxpayer's Maine adjusted gross income exceeds $400,000 in the case of a
joint return and $200,000 in any other case.
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the amount of the credit allowed by
this section, as increased by subsection 5, must be reduced, but not below zero, by $20 for
each $500 or fraction thereof by which the taxpayer's Maine adjusted gross income
exceeds:
A. For a single individual, $100,000;
B. For an individual filing as a head of household, $125,000;
C. For individuals filing married joint returns or surviving spouses, $150,000; and
D. For a married individual filing a separate return, 1/2 of the applicable amount under
paragraph C.
Sec. Q-2. 36 MRSA §5219-SS, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
Page 311 - 132LR2409(17)

5. Increased credit for qualifying children and dependents under 6 years of age.
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the credit amount allowed in
subsections 1, 1-A, 2, 2-A, 3 and 3-A for each qualifying child and dependent who has not
attained 6 years of age before the end of the taxable year is multiplied by 2.
Sec. Q-3. 36 MRSA §5403, sub-§8, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. ZZZ, §9,
is further amended to read:
8. Personal exemption phase-out. Beginning in 2018 and each year thereafter, by
the dollar amount of the applicable amounts specified in section 5126‑A, subsection 2,
paragraphs A, B and C, except that for the purposes of this subsection, notwithstanding
section 5402, subsection 1‑B, the "cost-of-living adjustment" is the Chained Consumer
Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30th of the preceding calendar year
divided by the Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30,
2017; and
Sec. Q-4. 36 MRSA §5403, sub-§9, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. ZZZ, §10,
is amended to read:
9. Dependent exemption tax credit amount. Beginning in 2024 and each year
thereafter, by the dollar amount of the dependent exemption tax credit under section
5219‑SS, except that for the purposes of this subsection, notwithstanding section 5402,
subsection 1‑B, the "cost-of-living adjustment" is the Chained Consumer Price Index for
the 12-month period ending June 30th of the preceding calendar year divided by the
Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30, 2023. If the credit
amount, adjusted by application of the cost-of-living adjustment, is not a multiple of $5,
any increase must be rounded to the next lowest multiple of $5.; and
Sec. Q-5. 36 MRSA §5403, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Dependent exemption phase-out. Beginning in 2025 and each year thereafter,
by the dollar amount of the applicable amounts specified in section 5219-SS, subsection 4,
paragraphs A, B and C, except that, for the purposes of this subsection, notwithstanding
section 5402, subsection 1‑B, the "cost-of-living adjustment" is the Chained Consumer
Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30th of the preceding calendar year
divided by the Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30,
2024.
PART R
Sec. R-1. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§1, ¶P, as amended by PL 2021, c. 474, §4, is
further amended to read:
P. Detectives in the employment of the Office of the Attorney General on July 1, 2020
who elect to participate in the 1998 Special Plan or hired thereafter; and
Sec. R-2. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§1, ¶Q, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt.
IIII, §1, is further amended to read:
Q. Until July 31, 2024, civilian employees whose job responsibilities include the
handling, examination or analysis of digital or physical evidence in the employment of
the Department of Public Safety, Maine State Police Crime Laboratory or computer
crimes unit on October 1, 2021 or hired thereafter.; and
Page 312 - 132LR2409(17)

Sec. R-3. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§1, ¶R is enacted to read:
R. Persons in the employment of the Department of Health and Human Services on
October 1, 2025 or hired thereafter who have the job classification of Mental Health
Worker I, Mental Health Worker II, Mental Health Worker III or Mental Health
Worker IV.
Sec. R-4. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 474, §6, is
further amended to read:
2. Qualification for benefits. A member employed in any one or a combination of
the capacities specified in subsection 1 after June 30, 1998 and before September 1, 2002
for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; any employee identified in
subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs N to P; after September 30, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraph Q; after September 30, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
R; and any employee identified in subsection 1, paragraph L, qualifies for a service
retirement benefit if that member either:
A. Is at least 55 years of age and has completed at least 10 years of creditable service
under the 1998 Special Plan in any one or a combination of the capacities; or
B. Has completed at least 25 years of creditable service in any one or a combination
of the capacities specified in subsection 1, whether or not the creditable service
included in determining that the 25-year requirement has been met was earned under
the 1998 Special Plan or prior to its establishment.
Sec. R-5. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 474, §7, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) Service credit purchased by repayment of an earlier refund of accumulated
contributions following termination of service is included only to the extent that
time to which the refund relates was served after June 30, 1998 and before
September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B;
after June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H;
after December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to
K; after June 30, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P;
and after September 30, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
Q in any one or a combination of the capacities specified in subsection 1. Service
credit may be purchased for service by an employee identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs L and, M and R regardless of when performed; and
Sec. R-6. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§4, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 474, §8, is
further amended to read:
A. If all of the member's creditable service in any one or a combination of the
capacities specified in subsection 1 was earned after June 30, 1998 and before
September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after
June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after
December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after
December 31, 2001 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph L; after June
Page 313 - 132LR2409(17)

30, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020
for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and after September 30,
2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; and after September 30,
2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R; if service credit was
purchased by repayment of an earlier refund of accumulated contributions for service
in any one or a combination of the capacities specified in subsection 1 after June 30,
1998 and before September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs I to K; after December 31, 2001 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraph L; after June 30, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
M; after June 30, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and
after September 30, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; and
after September 30, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R; or if
service credit was purchased by other than the repayment of an earlier refund and
eligibility to make the purchase of the service credit, including, but not limited to,
service credit for military service, was achieved after June 30, 1998 and before
September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after
June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after
December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after
December 31, 2001 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph L; after June
30, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020
for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and after September 30,
2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; and after September 30,
2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R, the benefit must be
computed as provided in section 17852, subsection 1, paragraph A.
(1) If the member had 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993, the benefit
under subsection 2, paragraph B must be reduced as provided in section 17852,
subsection 3, paragraphs A and B.
(2) If the member had fewer than 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993,
the benefit under subsection 2, paragraph B must be reduced by 6% for each year
that the member's age precedes 55 years of age.
Sec. R-7. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§4, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 474, §9, is
further amended to read:
B. Except as provided in paragraphs D, E and, F and G, if some part of the member's
creditable service in any one or a combination of the capacities specified in subsection
1 was earned before July 1, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs
A to H; before January 1, 2000 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I
to K; before January 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph L;
before July 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; before July
1, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and before October
1, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; and before October 1,
2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R and some part of the
member's creditable service in any one or a combination of the capacities specified in
subsection 1 was earned after June 30, 1998 and before September 1, 2002 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for
Page 314 - 132LR2409(17)

employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after December 31, 2001 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph L; after June 30, 2002 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020 for employees identified
in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and after September 30, 2021 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; and after September 30, 2025 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraph R, then the member's service retirement benefit
must be computed in segments and the amount of the member's service retirement
benefit is the sum of the segments. The segments must be computed as follows:
(1) The segment or, if the member served in more than one of the capacities
specified in subsection 1 and the benefits related to the capacities are not
interchangeable under section 17856, segments that reflect creditable service
earned before July 1, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A
to H; before January 1, 2000 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs
I to K; before January 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
L; before July 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M;
before July 1, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P;
and before October 1, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q;
and before October 1, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R
or purchased by repayment of an earlier refund of accumulated contributions for
service before July 1, 1998, for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs
A to H; before January 1, 2000 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs
I to K; before January 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
L; before July 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M;
before July 1, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P;
and before October 1, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q;
and before October 1, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R
in a capacity or capacities specified in subsection 1 or purchased by other than the
repayment of a refund and eligibility to make the purchase of the service credit,
including, but not limited to, service credit for military service, was achieved
before July 1, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A to H;
before January 1, 2000 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K;
before January 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph L;
before July 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; before
July 1, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and before
October 1, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; and before
October 1, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R, must be
computed under section 17852, subsection 1, paragraph A. If the member is
qualified under subsection 2, paragraph B and:
(a) Had 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993, the amount of the
segment or segments must be reduced as provided in section 17852, subsection
3, paragraphs A and B; or
(b) Had fewer than 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993, the amount
of the segment or segments must be reduced as provided in section 17852,
subsection 3‑A; and
Page 315 - 132LR2409(17)

(2) The segment that reflects creditable service earned after June 30, 1998 and
before September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A
and B; after June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C
to H; after December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs
I to K; after December 31, 2001 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
L; after June 30, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; after
June 30, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and
after September 30, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q;
and after September 30, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
R or purchased by repayment of an earlier refund of accumulated contributions for
service after June 30, 1998 and before September 1, 2002 for employees identified
in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for employees identified
in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after December 31, 2001 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph L; after June 30, 2002 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and after September 30,
2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; and after September
30, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R in any one or a
combination of the capacities specified in subsection 1, or purchased by other than
the repayment of a refund and eligibility to make the purchase of the service credit,
including, but not limited to, service credit for military service, was achieved after
June 30, 1998 and before September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection
1, paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection
1, paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after December 31, 2001 for employees identified
in subsection 1, paragraph L; after June 30, 2002 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and after September 30, 2021 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; and after September 30, 2025 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R must be computed under section
17852, subsection 1, paragraph A. If the member is qualified under subsection 2,
paragraph B and:
(a) Had 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993, the segment amount
must be reduced in the manner provided in section 17852, subsection 3,
paragraphs A and B for each year that the member's age precedes 55 years of
age; or
(b) Had fewer than 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993, the segment
amount must be reduced by 6% for each year that the member's age precedes
55 years of age.
Sec. R-8. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§4, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. The service retirement benefit of a member to whom subsection 1, paragraph R
applies and who qualifies for service retirement benefits under subsection 2 must be
computed under section 17852, subsection 1, paragraph A on the basis of all of the
member's creditable service in the capacity specified in subsection 1, paragraph R,
Page 316 - 132LR2409(17)

regardless of when that creditable service was earned, except that for a member
qualifying under subsection 2, paragraph B:
(1) If the member had 10 years of service on July 1, 1993, the benefit must be
reduced as provided in section 17852, subsection 3, paragraphs A and B for each
year the member's age precedes 55 years of age; or
(2) If the member had fewer than 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993,
the benefit must be reduced by 6% for each year that the member's age precedes
55 years of age.
Sec. R-9. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2021, c. 474, §10, is
further amended to read:
5. Contributions. Notwithstanding any other provision of subchapter 3 to the
contrary, after June 30, 1998 and before September 1, 2002 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after December 31, 2001 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraph L; after June 30, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraph M; after June 30, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N
to P; and after September 30, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q;
and after September 30, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R, a
member in the capacities specified in subsection 1 must contribute to the State Employee
and Teacher Retirement Program or have pick-up contributions made at the rate of 8.65%
of earnable compensation until the member has completed 25 years of creditable service as
provided in this section and at the rate of 7.65% thereafter.
PART S
Sec. S-1. 7 MRSA §164, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Funding. A separate, nonlapsing, interest-bearing account, administered by the
department, is established in the department within the Bureau of Agriculture, Food and
Rural Resources to support public-private partnerships to carry out the purposes of the
program. The account consists of money appropriated or allocated to the account or
received from any private or public source.
PART T
Sec. T-1. 7 MRSA §2188, 2nd ¶, as enacted by PL 1999, c. 84, §3, is amended to
read:
The fee for an original or renewal annual license may not exceed $75 $180.
PART U
Sec. U-1. 12 MRSA §685, as amended by PL 2011, c. 682, §9, is further amended
by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
A dedicated account is established for the commission. This dedicated account is
authorized to accept funding for commission-related activities, including surcharges for
digital and online fee payments.
PART V
Page 317 - 132LR2409(17)

Sec. V-1. 22 MRSA §20-A, sub-§3, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAAA,
§1, is amended to read:
A. All money received by the State in accordance with Title 36, section 4641‑B,
subsection 4‑B, paragraph E‑1 and, beginning with fiscal year 2026-27, Title 36,
section 4641-B, subsection 4-B, paragraph E-2;
Sec. V-2. 30-A MRSA §4773 is enacted to read:
§4773. Housing Production Fund
The Housing Production Fund, referred to in this section as "the fund," is established
as a nonlapsing fund under the jurisdiction and control of the Maine State Housing
Authority. The fund is funded by revenue from Title 36, section 4641-A, subsection 1,
paragraph A. Funds in the fund must be used by the authority to support the federal low-
income housing tax credit as provided in Section 42 of the United States Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, and the authority's rural affordable rental housing program and
affordable homeownership program.
Sec. V-3. 36 MRSA §4641-A, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 559, Pt. I,
§3 and affected by §15, is amended to read:
A. The rate of the tax is $2.20 for each $500 or fractional part of $500 of the value of
the property transferred. When the value of the property being transferred exceeds
$1,000,000, an additional tax at the rate of $3.80 for each $500 or fractional part of
$500 of the value of the property transferred that exceeds $1,000,000 is imposed.
Sec. V-4. 36 MRSA §4641-A, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 559, Pt. I,
§3 and affected by §15, is amended to read:
A. The For property owned by the entity and located in this State, the rate of the tax is
$2.20 for each $500 or fractional part of $500 of the value of the real property owned
by the entity and located in this State transferred. When the value of the property being
transferred exceeds $1,000,000, an additional tax at the rate of $3.80 for each $500 or
fractional part of $500 of the value of the real property transferred that exceeds
$1,000,000 is imposed.
Sec. V-5. 36 MRSA §4641-B, sub-§4-B, ¶E-1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412,
Pt. AAAA, §3, is amended to read:
E-1. In fiscal year 2025-26 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Treasurer of State shall
credit the revenues derived from the tax imposed pursuant to section 4641‑A,
subsection 1 in accordance with this paragraph.
(1) At the beginning of the fiscal year, the Maine State Housing Authority shall
certify to the Treasurer of State the amount that is necessary and sufficient to meet
the authority's obligations relating to bonds issued or planned to be issued by the
authority under Title 30‑A, section 4864.
(2) On a monthly basis, the Treasurer of State shall apply 50% of the revenues in
accordance with this subparagraph. The Treasurer of State shall first pay revenues
available under this subparagraph to the Maine State Housing Authority, which
shall deposit the funds in the Maine Energy, Housing and Economic Recovery
Fund established in Title 30‑A, section 4863, until the amount paid equals the
Page 318 - 132LR2409(17)

amount certified by the Maine State Housing Authority under subparagraph (1),
after which the Treasurer of State shall credit 1/2 of any remaining revenues
available under this subparagraph to the General Fund and 1/2 of any remaining
revenues available under this subparagraph to the Housing First Fund established
in Title 22, section 20‑A, subsection 2.
(3) On a monthly basis, the Treasurer of State shall credit 50% of the revenues to
the Maine State Housing Authority. The Maine State Housing Authority shall
deposit the funds received pursuant to this subparagraph in the Housing
Opportunities for Maine Fund created in Title 30‑A, section 4853. Beginning July
1, 2025, the Maine State Housing Authority shall use 25% of funds transferred to
the Housing Opportunities for Maine Fund under this subparagraph to support the
creation of new housing units, through new construction or adaptive reuse, that are
affordable to low-income households.
Sec. V-6. 36 MRSA §4641-B, sub-§4-B, ¶E-2 is enacted to read:
E-2. In fiscal year 2026-27 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Treasurer of State shall
credit the revenues derived from the tax imposed pursuant to section 4641-A,
subsection 1 in accordance with this paragraph.
(1) At the beginning of the fiscal year, the Maine State Housing Authority shall
certify to the Treasurer of State the amount that is necessary and sufficient to meet
the authority's obligations relating to bonds issued or planned to be issued by the
authority under Title 30‑A, section 4864.
(2) After reducing the revenue amount by the amount certified pursuant to
subparagraph (1), on a monthly basis, of the remaining revenue, the Treasurer of
State shall:
(a) Pay 18% to the Department of Health and Human Services, which shall
deposit the funds in the Housing First Fund established in Title 22, section
20-A, subsection 2;
(b) Pay 32% to the Maine State Housing Authority, which shall deposit the
funds in the Housing Opportunities for Maine Fund created in Title 30-A,
section 4853;
(c) Pay 30% to the Maine State Housing Authority, which shall deposit the
funds in the Housing Production Fund established in Title 30-A, section 4773
to support the federal low-income housing tax credit as provided in Section 42
of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the
authority's rural affordable rental housing program and affordable
homeownership program; and
(d) Deposit 20% in the General Fund.
Sec. V-7. 36 MRSA §4641-C, sub-§20, as amended by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. E, §3
and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is further amended to read:
20. Controlling interests. Transfers of controlling interests in an entity with a fee
interest in real property if the transfer of the real property would qualify for exemption if
accomplished by deed of the real property between the parties to the transfer of the
controlling interest; and
Page 319 - 132LR2409(17)

Sec. V-8. 36 MRSA §4641-C, sub-§21, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. E, §4
and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
21. Transfers pursuant to transfer on death deed. Any transfer of real property
effectuated by a transfer on death deed pursuant to Title 18‑C, Article 6, Part 4.; and
Sec. V-9. 36 MRSA §4641-C, sub-§22 is enacted to read:
22. Purchases by first-time home buyers participating in certain mortgage loan
programs. Deeds to property to purchasers who receive financial assistance through the
Maine State Housing Authority's first-time home-buyer mortgage loan programs. The
exemption under this subsection applies to both the buyer and the seller.
Sec. V-10. Effective date. This Part takes effect November 1, 2025.
PART W
Sec. W-1. Transfer from General Fund unappropriated surplus;
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Community-based
Greenhouse - Bureau of Agriculture Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2026, the State
Controller shall transfer $500,000 from the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund to
the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Community-based Greenhouse
- Bureau of Agriculture Other Special Revenue Funds account for one-time funding for
grants for durable greenhouse structures, including glass and polycarbonate structures, and
associated siting and installation costs to schools, community centers and other eligible
public entities as determined by the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry
for shared and educational uses and to enhance community-based opportunities for food
production.
PART X
Sec. X-1. 22 MRSA §3024, first ¶, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. EEE, §1,
is further amended to read:
The salary of the Chief Medical Examiner of the State must be set by the Governor.
Other nonsalaried medical examiners and nonsalaried medicolegal death investigators,
upon the submission of their completed report to the Chief Medical Examiner, must be paid
a fee of up to $100 $150 for an inspection and view and are entitled to receive travel
expenses to be calculated at the mileage rate currently paid to state employees pursuant to
Title 5, section 8. An additional fee of $50 may be authorized by the Chief Medical
Examiner for payment to other nonsalaried medical examiners and nonsalaried medicolegal
death investigators for visits to death scenes other than hospitals.
Sec. X-2. 22 MRSA §3024, 3rd ¶, as amended by PL 2013, c. 113, §3, is further
amended to read:
The Chief Medical Examiner may, in an unusual circumstance as determined by the
Chief Medical Examiner, prescribe a special fee for the service of a medical examiner or
medicolegal death investigator or for any consultant service the Chief Medical Examiner
determines necessary. A special fee prescribed by the Chief Medical Examiner under this
paragraph may not include a fee for a standard blood, urine or vitreous collection.
PART Y
Page 320 - 132LR2409(17)

Sec. Y-1. Transfer to Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife, Office
of the Commissioner - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2026, the State Controller shall
transfer $1,250,000 from the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund to the Department
of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife, Office of the Commissioner - Inland Fisheries and
Wildlife, Other Special Revenue Funds account for the purpose of funding unmet capital
construction and repair needs for state dams.
PART Z
Sec. Z-1. 34-A MRSA §1403, sub-§8, ¶C, as enacted by PL 1989, c. 127, §3, is
amended to read:
C. The commissioner may contract with the Attorney General of the United States or
officer designated by the Congress for the care, custody, subsistence, education,
treatment and training of any prisoner or juvenile accepted under this section. All sums
paid pursuant to contracts authorized by this section shall accrue to the General Fund
subsection.
(1) Except as provided in subparagraph (2), all sums paid pursuant to contracts
authorized by this paragraph must accrue to the General Fund.
(2) Sums paid by the United States Department of Justice, United States Marshals
Service pursuant to a contract authorized by this paragraph must accrue to the
department for deposit into the client benefit welfare accounts at the department's
correctional facilities. Sums accrued to the department under this paragraph may
not exceed $250,000 each fiscal year. Any sums paid pursuant to contracts under
this subparagraph in excess of $250,000 each fiscal year must accrue to the General
Fund.
PART AA
Sec. AA-1. Department of Corrections; transfer of funds for overtime
expenses. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 1585 or any
provision of law to the contrary, the Department of Corrections, by financial order upon
the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor, may transfer
funds in the Personal Services, All Other or Capital Expenditures line categories between
accounts within the same fund for the purposes of paying overtime expenses in fiscal years
2025-26 and 2026-27. These transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
PART BB
Sec. BB-1. Transfers and adjustments to position count; Department of
Corrections. The Commissioner of Corrections shall review the current organizational
structure of the Department of Corrections to improve organizational efficiency and cost-
effectiveness and shall recommend to the State Budget Officer transfers of positions and
available balances. In accordance with the requirements of this section and notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, the State Budget Officer shall transfer the position
counts and available balances by financial order, in accordance with the recommendations
of the commissioner, from July 1st to December 1st of each fiscal year of the 2026-2027
biennium. Position adjustments made after December 1st and on or before June 30th of
each fiscal year may not be considered an adjustment to position count or appropriations.
Page 321 - 132LR2409(17)

The transfer and adjustment authorized by this section must comply with the requirements
of the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 1585. Any transfer or adjustment pursuant
to this section that would result in a program or mission change or facility closure must be
reported by the Bureau of the Budget to the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over criminal justice and public safety matters for review before the
associated financial order is submitted to the Governor for approval; these transfers are
considered adjustments to authorized position count, appropriations and allocations.
PART CC
Sec. CC-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Corrections. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for
fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27 only, the Department of Corrections is authorized to
transfer the available balances of appropriations and allocations in the Personal Services
line category in the Long Creek Youth Development Center program after all salary, benefit
and other obligations have been met to the All Other line category of the program in order
to fund juvenile community programs and services. These amounts may be transferred by
financial order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the
Governor. These transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
PART DD
Sec. DD-1. Transfer from General Fund unappropriated surplus;
Department of Corrections, Administration - Corrections. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2026, the State Controller shall
transfer $3,661,559 from the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund to the Department
of Corrections, Administration - Corrections, Other Special Revenue Funds account for
one-time implementation costs of the offender management system.
PART EE
Sec. EE-1. 20-A MRSA §13007, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2017, c. 235, §6
and affected by §41, is further amended to read:
C. Report and pay $75,000 in each fiscal year from fees collected pursuant to
subsection 1 to the Treasurer of State to be credited to the National Board Certification
Scholarship Fund, Other Special Revenue Funds account within the Department of
Education; and
Sec. EE-2. 20-A MRSA §13007, sub-§2, ¶D, as amended by PL 2021, c. 694, §1
and affected by §4, is further amended to read:
D. Report and pay in each fiscal year from fees collected pursuant to subsection 1 to
the Treasurer of State to be credited to the National Board Certification Salary
Supplement Fund, Other Special Revenue Funds account within the Department of
Education an amount sufficient to fund all salary supplements for national board-
certified teachers as described in section 13013‑A, subsections 1 and 2. If the fees are
insufficient to fully fund the annual national board certification salary supplements,
general purpose aid must be appropriated to fund the balance.; and
Sec. EE-3. 20-A MRSA §13007, sub-§2, ¶E is enacted to read:
Page 322 - 132LR2409(17)

E. Report and pay in each fiscal year from fees collected pursuant to subsection 1 to
the Treasurer of State to be credited to the Higher Education Administrative Fund,
Other Special Revenue Funds account within the department established under section
10017 an amount sufficient to fund annual dues of the New England Board of Higher
Education established under Title 5, section 12004-K, subsection 2.
PART FF
Sec. FF-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other; Judicial
Department, Courts - Supreme, Superior and District; fiscal year 2025-26.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2025-26 only, the
Judicial Department is authorized to transfer up to $750,000 of available balances of
appropriations in the Personal Services line category in the Courts - Supreme, Superior and
District program, after all financial commitments for salary, benefit and other obligations
have been made, to the All Other line category in order to fund temporary clerk services,
marshal services contracts, guardians ad litem, interpreters and mental health services.
These amounts may be transferred by financial order on the recommendation of the State
Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered
adjustments to appropriations.
Sec. FF-2. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other; Judicial
Department, Courts - Supreme, Superior and District; fiscal year 2026-27.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026-27 only, the
Judicial Department is authorized to transfer up to $750,000 of available balances of
appropriations in the Personal Services line category in the Courts - Supreme, Superior and
District program, after all financial commitments for salary, benefit and other obligations
have been made, to the All Other line category in order to fund temporary clerk services,
marshal services contracts, guardians ad litem, interpreters and mental health services.
These amounts may be transferred by financial order on the recommendation of the State
Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered
adjustments to appropriations.
PART GG
Sec. GG-1. Commission on Governmental Ethics and Election Practices;
Maine Clean Election Act program; General Fund transfer to Maine Clean
Election Fund. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 21-A, section 1124,
subsection 2, paragraph B, the State Controller shall transfer $3,000,000, currently
authorized to be transferred on or before January 1, 2027, from the General Fund to the
Maine Clean Election Fund on or before July 1, 2026.
PART HH
Sec. HH-1. Rename Learning Systems Team program. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the Learning Systems Team program within the
Department of Education is renamed the Federal Programs Team program.
PART II
Sec. II-1. 36 MRSA §2892, 2nd ¶, as amended by PL 2025, c. 2, Pt. II, §3, is
further amended to read:
Page 323 - 132LR2409(17)

For state fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2004, a tax is imposed annually
against each hospital in the State. The tax is equal to 2.23% of the hospital's net operating
revenue as identified in the hospital's audited financial statement for the hospital's taxable
year. Beginning January 1, 2025, the tax for acute care hospitals, psychiatric hospitals
except for the Riverview Psychiatric Center and the Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center and
rehabilitation hospitals is equal to 3.25% of the hospital's net operating revenue as
identified in the hospital's audited financial statement for the hospital's fiscal year that
ended during calendar year 2022. Beginning January 1, 2025, the tax does not apply to
critical access hospitals. For the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2004, the hospital's
taxable year is the hospital's fiscal year that ended during calendar year 2002. For the state
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, the hospital's taxable year is the hospital's fiscal year
that ended during calendar year 2003. For state fiscal years beginning on or after July 1,
2006 but before July 1, 2008, the hospital's taxable year is the hospital's fiscal year that
ended during calendar year 2004.
Sec. II-2. 36 MRSA §2893, sub-§2-A, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. JJ,
§5, is amended to read:
C. For a facility licensed as a psychiatric hospital by the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to Title 22, section 1817, except the Riverview Psychiatric
Center and the Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center, an amount equal to 2.23% 3.25% of
the hospital's net operating revenue as identified in the hospital's audited financial
statement for the hospital's fiscal year that ended during calendar year 2022 multiplied
by one-half on or before May 15, 2025.
Sec. II-3. Form and timing of payments by private psychiatric hospitals.
A psychiatric hospital subject to the tax imposed by the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 36,
chapter 377 shall submit to the assessor a return on a form prescribed and furnished by the
assessor and pay the tax by the 30th day following the effective date of this Part.
Any amounts paid to the assessor pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 36,
section 2893, subsection 2-A, paragraph C between January 1, 2025 and the effective date
of this Act must be deducted from the total amount owed by the hospital pursuant to that
paragraph.
Sec. II-4. Supplemental payments to private psychiatric hospitals. The
Department of Health and Human Services, from the amounts appropriated and allocated,
shall determine a consistent and reasonable allocation method to distribute supplemental
payments to private psychiatric hospitals. Total payment amounts may not exceed the
lower of the amount appropriated for supplemental payments to psychiatric hospitals by
this Act and the amount by which any payment would cause the department to exceed
allowable aggregate upper payment limits as determined by the United States Department
of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
These payments must be allocated based on a consistent allocation method subject to
United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services approval from total supplemental pool amounts as follows:
1. A supplemental pool amount based on the tax owed by psychiatric hospitals in fiscal
years 2025-26 and 2026-27 as the result of the incremental increase in the hospital tax rate
imposed by this Part, for twice-annual supplemental payments in those fiscal years; and
Page 324 - 132LR2409(17)

2. A supplemental pool amount based on the tax owed by psychiatric hospitals in fiscal
year 2024-25 as the result of the retroactive application of the incremental increase in the
hospital tax rate imposed by this Part, for a one-time supplemental payment in fiscal year
2025-26.
Supplemental payments must continue until implementation of reimbursement reform
for psychiatric hospitals, at which point the supplemental payments must be discontinued
and the associated spending must be invested in direct reimbursement for inpatient and
outpatient psychiatric hospital services.
Sec. II-5. Federal approval. The Department of Health and Human Services shall
submit to the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services any state plan amendments or waivers determined
necessary in order to accomplish the purposes of this Part.
Sec. II-6. Retroactivity. Those sections of this Part that amend the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 36, section 2892 and section 2893, subsection 2-A, paragraph C apply
retroactively to January 1, 2025.
PART JJ
Sec. JJ-1. Attrition savings. Notwithstanding Public Law 2025, chapter 2, Part H
or any other provision of law to the contrary, the attrition rate for the 2026-2027 biennium
is 6% for judicial branch and executive branch departments and agencies only. The attrition
rate for subsequent biennia is 1.6%.
Sec. JJ-2. Calculation and transfer; attrition savings. The State Budget Officer
shall calculate the amount of the savings in section 3 that applies against each General Fund
account for all executive branch departments and agencies statewide and shall transfer the
amounts by financial order upon the approval of the Governor. These transfers are
considered adjustments to appropriations in fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27. The State
Budget Officer shall submit to the Joint Standing Committee on Appropriations and
Financial Affairs a report of the transferred amounts no later than October 1, 2025.
Sec. JJ-3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Executive Branch Departments and Independent Agencies - Statewide 0017
Initiative: Reduces funding to reflect additional savings from an increase in the attrition
rate from 5% to 6%. This savings is in addition to the savings pursuant to Public Law 2025,
chapter 2 from recognizing an increase in attrition from 1.6% to 5%.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($5,686,312) ($5,889,423)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($5,686,312) ($5,889,423)
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL
SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 325 - 132LR2409(17)

GENERAL FUND ($5,686,312) ($5,889,423)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($5,686,312) ($5,889,423)
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Reduces funding to reflect additional savings from an increase in the attrition
rate from 5% to 6%. This savings is in addition to the savings pursuant to Public Law 2025,
chapter 2 from recognizing an increase in attrition from 1.6% to 5%.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($617,683) ($629,678)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($617,683) ($629,678)
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND ($617,683) ($629,678)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($617,683) ($629,678)
SECTION TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND ($6,303,995) ($6,519,101)
__________ __________
SECTION TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($6,303,995) ($6,519,101)
PART KK
Sec. KK-1. Transfer; Department of Education, General Purpose Aid for
Local Schools and Preschool Special Education Program Fund. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2026, the State Controller shall
transfer $21,000,000 of the unencumbered balance forward from the Department of
Education, General Purpose Aid for Local Schools program, General Fund account, All
Other line category to the Department of Education, Preschool Special Education Program
Fund, General Fund account, All Other line category.
PART LL
Sec. LL-1. Lapsed balances; Legislature; June 30, 2026. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, $1,128,587 of unencumbered balance forward from the
Legislature program, General Fund carrying account, Personal Services line category
within the Legislature lapses to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no later
than June 30, 2026.
Sec. LL-2. Lapsed balances; Legislature; June 30, 2027. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, $1,152,225 of unencumbered balance forward from the
Page 326 - 132LR2409(17)

Legislature program, General Fund carrying account, Personal Services line category
within the Legislature lapses to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no later
than June 30, 2027.
PART MM
Sec. MM-1. Fiscal year 2024-25 year-end unappropriated surplus; 5th
priority transfer. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, at the close of
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, as the next priority after the transfers authorized
pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, sections 1507 and 1511, the transfer of
$2,500,000 for the Reserve for General Fund Operating Capital pursuant to Title 5, section
1536 and the transfers to the Retiree Health Insurance Internal Service Fund pursuant to
Title 5, section 1519 and after all required deductions of appropriations, budgeted financial
commitments and adjustments considered necessary by the State Controller have been
made, the State Controller shall transfer up to $24,000,000 from the available balance of
the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund to the MaineCare Stabilization Fund
established in Title 22, section 3174-KK.
PART NN
Sec. NN-1. Transfer from General Fund unappropriated surplus;
Department of Environmental Protection, Maine Ground and Surface Waters
Clean-up and Response Fund. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
on or before June 30, 2026, the State Controller shall transfer $1,376,000 from the
unappropriated surplus of the General Fund to the Department of Environmental
Protection, Maine Ground and Surface Waters Clean-up and Response Fund, Other Special
Revenue Funds account to support Capital Expenditures.
PART OO
Sec. OO-1. Personal Services balances; Maine Health Data Organization;
transfers authorized. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal
years 2025-26 and 2026-27, the Maine Health Data Organization is authorized to transfer
up to $300,000 in each fiscal year of available balances of Personal Services allocations
after all salary, benefit and other obligations are met to the All Other line category in the
Maine Health Data Organization Other Special Revenue Funds account.
PART PP
Sec. PP-1. Transfer from General Fund unappropriated surplus; Maine
State Housing Authority, Housing Authority - State. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2026, the State Controller shall
transfer $3,000,000 from the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund to the Maine State
Housing Authority, Housing Authority - State, Other Special Revenue Funds account to
support a manufactured home and mobile home park preservation and assistance program.
Program funds must be prioritized for the purpose of maintaining housing affordability in
manufactured home and mobile home parks, including by supporting ownership by mobile
home owners' associations, resident-owned housing cooperatives or other nonprofit
organizations. Funds may also be used to prevent homelessness among those negatively
impacted by the sale or change of use of such parks. Before June 30, 2027, unobligated
Page 327 - 132LR2409(17)

amounts remaining from this transfer must be transferred to the unappropriated surplus of
the General Fund.
PART QQ
Sec. QQ-1. 36 MRSA §4641-B, sub-§4-B, ¶E-3 is enacted to read:
E-3. Notwithstanding paragraphs E-1 and E-2, the State Controller shall first credit
$4,847,891 of the revenues available to the Maine State Housing Authority for the
Housing Opportunities for Maine Fund established in Title 30-A, section 4853 in fiscal
year 2025-26 to the General Fund and $5,147,141 of the revenues available to the
Maine State Housing Authority for the Housing Opportunities for Maine Fund in fiscal
year 2026-27 to the General Fund.
PART RR
Sec. RR-1. 22 MRSA §1322-E, sub-§3, ¶F, as amended by PL 2007, c. 628, Pt.
A, §4, is further amended to read:
F. Funding for educational programs and information for owners of rental property
used for residential purposes; and
Sec. RR-2. 22 MRSA §1322-E, sub-§3, ¶G, as amended by PL 2023, c. 147, §1,
is further amended to read:
G. Implementation of the lead-safe housing registry by the department pursuant to
section 1331.; and
Sec. RR-3. 22 MRSA §1322-E, sub-§3, ¶H is enacted to read:
H. Funding for childhood lead poisoning prevention efforts, including, but not limited
to, funding for state personnel and contracted resources dedicated to reducing lead
hazard exposures and preventing harm from lead poisoning; blood lead testing and
laboratory analysis; short-term relocation of families with a lead-poisoned child to a
lead-safe residence; and other related costs.
Sec. RR-4. 22 MRSA §1322-F, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 403, §1, is
amended to read:
1. Fee imposed. Beginning July 1, 2006, a fee is imposed on manufacturers or
wholesalers of paint sold in the State to support the Lead Poisoning Prevention Fund under
section 1322‑E. The fee must be imposed at the manufacturer or wholesaler level, and until
June 30, 2026, the fee must be in the amount of 25¢ per gallon of paint estimated to have
been sold in the State during the prior year, as determined by rule adopted by the
department. Beginning July 1, 2026, the fee imposed under this subsection must be 75¢
per gallon of paint estimated to have been sold in the State during the prior year, as
determined by rule adopted by the department.
Sec. RR-5. 22 MRSA §1322-F, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 403, §1, is
amended to read:
2. Rules. By July 1, 2006, the The department shall adopt rules to implement this
section, including rules to determine which manufacturers or wholesalers of paint sold in
the State are responsible for the fees imposed under subsection 1 and rules establishing the
estimated number of gallons of paint sold in the State in the prior year for each
Page 328 - 132LR2409(17)

manufacturer and rules determining the manner of payment. The rules must provide for
waivers of payment for manufacturers and wholesalers of paint that is sold in low quantities
in the State. The costs for development of these rules and for administration of the Lead
Poisoning Prevention Fund must be reimbursed from the fees collected. The rules must
specify that the first payment of fees is due by April 1, 2007 the fees imposed beginning
July 1, 2026 is due by October 1, 2026. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are
routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
PART SS
Sec. SS-1. Transfer of interest earnings; General Fund. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2026, the State Controller shall
transfer $7,178,388 from the interest earnings on the Federal Expenditures Fund - ARP
State Fiscal Recovery fund and the Federal Expenditures Fund - ARP fund to the
unappropriated surplus of the General Fund.
PART TT
Sec. TT-1. 7 MRSA §220-A, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 729, §1, is
amended to read:
3. Farmers Drought Relief Grant Program Fund. The Farmers Drought Relief
Grant Program Fund is established as a nonlapsing fund to provide funding to achieve the
purposes of the program. The department may use funds for personnel services and to
contract for professional services to carry out the purposes of this section. The fund
consists of any funds received from private and public sources. The fund must be held
separate and apart from all other money, funds and accounts. Any balance remaining in
the fund at the end of any fiscal year must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
PART UU
Sec. UU-1. Reimbursement; Department of Administrative and Financial
Services, Bureau of General Services - Capital Construction and Improvement
Reserve Fund. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services shall seek reimbursement of costs associated with
the repair of the Mackworth Island causeway through risk management administered by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services pursuant to the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 5, section 1725-A; from the Department of Defense, Veterans and
Emergency Management, Maine Emergency Management Agency; and from the United
States Department of Homeland Security, Federal Emergency Management Agency. Any
reimbursement received must be transferred to the Department of Administrative and
Financial Services, Bureau of General Services - Capital Construction and Improvement
Reserve Fund, Other Special Revenue Funds account established for capital improvements
and repairs to state-owned facilities.
PART VV
Sec. VV-1. Carrying provision; Office of the Treasurer of State, Debt
Service - Treasury. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State
Controller shall carry forward any remaining balance in the Office of the Treasurer of State,
Debt Service - Treasury program in each year of the 2026-2027 biennium into the following
fiscal year.
Page 329 - 132LR2409(17)

PART WW
Sec. WW-1. Judges and justices salary adjustment. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, for the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2025 and July 1,
2026, the State Court Administrator shall increase the salaries of the judges and justices on
the Supreme Judicial Court and each Superior Court and District Court by 3% total in each
fiscal year.
PART XX
Sec. XX-1. 34-B MRSA §1203-B, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Licensing fees and terms. Fees and terms for licenses under this section are as
follows.
A. The application fee for a provisional license may not be less than $100 nor more
than $280. The term of a provisional license is established pursuant to subsection 5,
paragraph B.
B. The application fee for a full license may not be less than $100 nor more than $280.
The term of a full license is for 2 years.
C. The fee for the biennial renewal of a full license may not be less than $70 nor more
than $170.
D. The processing fee to add a service site to an issued license may not be less than
$35 nor more than $70.
E. The processing fee to add a service to an issued license may not be less than $70 nor
more than $140.
F. A licensee under this section shall maintain a valid license. An issued license is not
valid when the information on the license is no longer accurate. A processing fee not
to exceed $10 must be paid to the department to secure a reissued license with accurate
information. The fee applies to each license replaced. The reissued license must have
the same expiration date as the replaced license.
G. The transaction fee for the electronic renewal of a license may not be less than $25
nor more than $50. The transaction fee may not exceed the cost of providing the
electronic renewal service.
The department shall adopt rules to implement this subsection. Rules adopted pursuant to
this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter
2-A.
PART YY
Sec. YY-1. 34-B MRSA §3613, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. KKK, §1 and c.
675, §9 and amended by PL 2025, c. 2, Pt. R, §1, is repealed and the following enacted in
its place:
§3613. Crisis receiving centers
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, "crisis
receiving center" means a center that provides immediate and short‑term walk‑in access to
an array of both clinical and nonclinical mental health and substance use disorder crisis
Page 330 - 132LR2409(17)

stabilization services to all individuals seeking care regardless of acuity or insurance
coverage and within bounds of licensing.
2. Department to develop plan and serve as coordinator. The department shall
develop a plan for a network of community‑based crisis receiving centers across the State
to support both clinical and nonclinical mental health and substance use disorder crisis
stabilization services. The department shall also coordinate meetings, technical assistance
and training and provide other assistance to help create, maintain and, as necessary, expand
the network.
3. Guidelines. In carrying out its duties under subsection 2, the department shall:
A. Consult with law enforcement agencies, municipalities, public health experts,
behavioral health care providers, other states and others as appropriate;
B. Assess geographical locations for maximization of community impact;
C. Provide technical assistance to persons and entities across the State and providers
interested in joining the network;
D. Coordinate regular meetings with crisis receiving centers and provide technical
assistance to crisis receiving centers; and
E. Engage in continual process improvement and planning updates.
PART ZZ
Sec. ZZ-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other; state
psychiatric centers. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal
years 2025-26 and 2026-27 only, the Department of Health and Human Services is
authorized to transfer available balances of Personal Services appropriations and
allocations in the Disproportionate Share - Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center program, the
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center program, the Riverview Psychiatric
Center program and the Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center program after all salary, benefit
and other obligations are met to the All Other line category of those programs. These
amounts may be transferred by financial order upon the recommendation of the State
Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered
adjustments to appropriations.
PART AAA
Sec. AAA-1. Transfer of funds; Department of Health and Human
Services. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal years 2025-26
and 2026-27 only, the Department of Health and Human Services may transfer from
available balances of appropriations in the All Other line category, after the deduction of
all appropriations, financial commitments, other designated funds or any other transfer
authorized by statute, from any account within the Department of Health and Human
Services, excluding balances in the IV-E Foster Care/Adoption Assistance and State-
funded Foster Care/Adoption Assistance programs, for the purpose of the information
system modernization project in the department's office of aging and disability services,
including the modernization of and merging of information systems within the office of
aging and disability services, by financial order upon the recommendation of the State
Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered an
adjustment to appropriations.
Page 331 - 132LR2409(17)

PART BBB
Sec. BBB-1. Transfer of funds; Department of Health and Human
Services. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal years 2025-26
and 2026-27, the Department of Health and Human Services may transfer without a 30-day
wait available balances between the State-funded Foster Care/Adoption Assistance
program and the IV-E Foster Care/Adoption Assistance program in the All Other line
category. These amounts may be transferred by financial order upon the recommendation
of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers are not
considered adjustments to appropriations.
PART CCC
Sec. CCC-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Department of Health and Human Services, Office for Family Independence
and Office for Family Independence - District. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, in fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27 only, the Department of Health
and Human Services is authorized to transfer available balances of appropriations in the
Personal Services line category in the Office for Family Independence program and the
Office for Family Independence - District program after all financial commitments for
salary, benefit, other obligations and budgetary adjustments have been made to the All
Other line category in either the Office for Family Independence program or the Office for
Family Independence - District program in order to provide for administrative expenses.
These amounts may be transferred by financial order upon the recommendation of the State
Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered
adjustments to appropriations.
PART DDD
Sec. DDD-1. MaineCare reimbursement; hospital professional costs. The
Department of Health and Human Services shall implement reimbursement of hospital
professional costs at hospital-based practices related to the department's rule Chapter 101:
MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter III, Section 45, Hospital Services at 160% of
Medicare rates effective July 1, 2027.
PART EEE
Sec. EEE-1. Transfer of federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 savings.
Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 1585 or any other provision
of law to the contrary, until June 30, 2026, balances of appropriations and allocations in
various General Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds accounts in the MaineCare
programs within the Department of Health and Human Services that are available as part
of the increased 10% Federal Medical Assistance Percentage for MaineCare home and
community-based services per the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Public Law
117-2, Section 9817 may be transferred by financial order, upon recommendation of the
State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor, to the Medical Care - Payments to
Providers program, Home and Community Based Services - ARP Savings Other Special
Revenue Funds account and the Office of MaineCare Services program, Home and
Community Based Services Admin - ARP Savings Other Special Revenue Funds account
within the department to be used for federally authorized purposes.
Page 332 - 132LR2409(17)

Sec. EEE-2. Transfer between Other Special Revenue Funds accounts.
Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 1585 or any other provision
of law to the contrary, until June 30, 2026, the Department of Health and Human Services
may transfer balances of appropriations and allocations by financial order, upon
recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor, between the
Medical Care - Payments to Providers program, Home and Community Based Services -
ARP Savings Other Special Revenue Funds account and the Office of MaineCare Services
program, Home and Community Based Services Admin - ARP Savings Other Special
Revenue Funds account within the department.
PART FFF
Sec. FFF-1. Transfer of funds from unencumbered balance forward;
Department of Health and Human Services, Office of MaineCare Services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27,
the Department of Health and Human Services may transfer funds by financial order upon
the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor from the
unencumbered balance forward in the Office of MaineCare Services program, General
Fund account to the All Other line category in the Office of MaineCare Services program,
General Fund account to be used for the Medicaid Enterprise System modernization
project.
PART GGG
Sec. GGG-1. Cost-of-living adjustment for certain MaineCare
reimbursement rates. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
Department of Health and Human Services shall submit the required methodology notice
necessary to seek approval from the United States Department of Health and Human
Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to implement a cost-of-living
adjustment for reimbursement rates subject to rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits
Manual, Chapter II, Sections 23, 25 and 46 effective July 1, 2025, and Sections 60, 89 and
90 effective January 1, 2026, and rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter
III, Sections 30; 31; 40; 45; 50; 91; 93; 97, Appendices B, C, D, E and F; and 102 effective
July 1, 2025, and Sections 2, 12, 13, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 26, 28, 29, 65, 67, 92, 96 and 103
effective January 1, 2026. The cost-of-living adjustment must be determined based on
appropriations and allocations available for the purpose of making cost-of-living
adjustments.
PART HHH
Sec. HHH-1. Lapsed balances; Department of Health and Human
Services, Mental Health Services - Community. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, $1,400,000 of the unencumbered balance forward in the Department
of Health and Human Services, Mental Health Services - Community, General Fund
account, All Other line category lapses to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund
no later than June 30, 2026. These funds were authorized to carry forward in Public Law
2025, chapter 2, Part QQ.
Sec. HHH-2. Lapsed balances; Department of Health and Human
Services, Mental Health Services - Community. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, $1,500,000 of the unencumbered balance forward in the Department
Page 333 - 132LR2409(17)

of Health and Human Services, Mental Health Services - Community, General Fund
account, All Other line category lapses to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund
no later than June 30, 2026. These funds were authorized to carry forward in Public Law
2025, chapter 2, Part JJ.
Sec. HHH-3. Lapsed balances; Department of Health and Human
Services, Mental Health Services - Community. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, $900,000 of the unencumbered balance forward in the Department of
Health and Human Services, Mental Health Services - Community, General Fund account,
All Other line category lapses to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no later
than June 30, 2026. These funds were authorized to carry forward in Public Law 2025,
chapter 2, Part MM.
Sec. HHH-4. Lapsed balances; Department of Health and Human
Services, Mental Health Services - Community. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, $953,300 of the unencumbered balance forward in the Department of
Health and Human Services, Mental Health Services - Community, General Fund account,
All Other line category lapses to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no later
than June 30, 2026. These funds were authorized to carry forward in Public Law 2025,
chapter 2, Part HH.
Sec. HHH-5. Lapsed balances; Department of Health and Human
Services, Mental Health Services - Children. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, $1,000,000 of the unencumbered balance forward in the Department of
Health and Human Services, Mental Health Services - Children, General Fund account, All
Other line category lapses to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no later than
June 30, 2026. These funds were authorized to carry forward in Public Law 2025, chapter
2, Part AA.
PART III
Sec. III-1. Lapsed balances; Department of Health and Human Services,
Office of Behavioral Health. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
$550,000 of the unencumbered balance forward in the Department of Health and Human
Services, Office of Behavioral Health, General Fund carrying account, All Other line
category lapses to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no later than June 30,
2026.
PART JJJ
Sec. JJJ-1. Lapsed balances; Department of Health and Human Services,
Office of Behavioral Health. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
$4,500,000 of unencumbered balance forward from the Department of Health and Human
Services, Office of Behavioral Health, General Fund account, All Other line category
lapses to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no later than June 30, 2026.
PART KKK
Sec. KKK-1. Carrying balance in fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27; Maine
Commission on Public Defense Services. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, at the end of fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27, the State Controller shall carry
forward for the Maine Commission on Public Defense Services any remaining balance in
Page 334 - 132LR2409(17)

the Personal Services line category in the Maine Commission on Public Defense Services
program, General Fund account to the next fiscal year. The funds carried forward may be
transferred to the All Other line category to support contracted attorney costs. These
amounts may be transferred by financial order upon the recommendation of the State
Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered
adjustments to appropriations.
Sec. KKK-2. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other; Maine
Commission on Public Defense Services. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, for fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27, the Maine Commission on Public
Defense Services is authorized to transfer up to $2,500,000 of available balances of
appropriations in the Personal Services line category in the Maine Commission on Public
Defense Services program, after all financial commitments for salary, benefit and other
obligations have been met, to the All Other line category in order to fund costs associated
with assigned legal counsel. These amounts may be transferred by financial order upon the
recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers
are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
PART LLL
Sec. LLL-1. Lapsed balances; Department of Health and Human Services,
Long Term Care - Office of Aging and Disability Services. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, $5,000,000 of unencumbered balance forward from the
Department of Health and Human Services, Long Term Care - Office of Aging and
Disability Services, General Fund account, All Other line category lapses to the
unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no later than June 30, 2026.
PART MMM
Sec. MMM-1. Transfer of funds; Department of Inland Fisheries and
Wildlife carrying account. On or before August 1, 2025, the State Controller shall
transfer $100,000 from the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife, Inland Fisheries
and Wildlife Carrying Balances - General Fund account to the Enforcement Operations -
Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, General Fund account for the purchase of one
replacement aircraft engine and propeller. On or before August 1, 2026, the State Controller
shall transfer $100,000 from the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife, Inland
Fisheries and Wildlife Carrying Balances - General Fund account to the Enforcement
Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, General Fund account for the purchase
of one replacement aircraft engine and propeller.
Sec. MMM-2. Transfer of funds; Department of Inland Fisheries and
Wildlife carrying account. On or before August 1, 2025, the State Controller shall
transfer $125,000 from the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife, Inland Fisheries
and Wildlife Carrying Balances - General Fund account to the Enforcement Operations -
Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, General Fund account for the purchase of boat,
motor and trailer replacements. On or before August 1, 2026, the State Controller shall
transfer $125,000 from the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife, Inland Fisheries
and Wildlife Carrying Balances - General Fund account to the Enforcement Operations -
Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, General Fund account for the purchase of boat,
motor and trailer replacements.
Page 335 - 132LR2409(17)

Sec. MMM-3. Transfer of funds; Department of Inland Fisheries and
Wildlife carrying account. On or before August 1, 2025, the State Controller shall
transfer $250,000 from the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife, Inland Fisheries
and Wildlife Carrying Balances - General Fund account to the Administrative - Services
Inland Fisheries and Wildlife, General Fund account for the upgrade of regional offices for
compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 and energy efficiency.
On or before August 1, 2026, the State Controller shall transfer $200,000 from the
Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Wildlife Carrying
Balances - General Fund account to the Administrative Services - Inland Fisheries and
Wildlife, General Fund account for the upgrade of regional offices for compliance with the
federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 and energy efficiency.
PART NNN
Sec. NNN-1. 12 MRSA §11109, sub-§3, ¶D, as repealed and replaced by PL
2015, c. 494, Pt. D, §2, is amended to read:
D. A resident combination hunting and fishing license is $43 $48 and permits hunting
of all legal species, subject to the permit requirements in subchapter 3.
Sec. NNN-2. 12 MRSA §11109, sub-§3, ¶E, as repealed and replaced by PL
2015, c. 494, Pt. D, §2, is amended to read:
E. A resident combination archery hunting and fishing license is $43 $48 and permits
hunting of all legal species, subject to the permit requirements in subchapter 3.
Sec. NNN-3. 12 MRSA §11109, sub-§3, ¶J, as repealed and replaced by PL 2015,
c. 494, Pt. D, §2, is amended to read:
J. A nonresident combination hunting and fishing license is $150 $169.
Sec. NNN-4. 12 MRSA §11109, sub-§7, ¶B, as amended by PL 2015, c. 245, §3,
is further amended to read:
B. A resident combination archery hunting and fishing license is $43 $48;
Sec. NNN-5. 12 MRSA §11109-A, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2023, c. 49, §2 and
affected by §3, is further amended to read:
5. Fee. The fee for a super pack license is $207 $212 for residents and $182 $187 for
a person holding 2 or more lifetime licenses.
Sec. NNN-6. 12 MRSA §12501, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2023, c. 228, §§11
and 12, is further amended to read:
6. Schedule of fees. The fees for fishing licenses are as follows.
A. A resident fishing license is $25 $30.
B. A resident combination hunting and fishing license is $43 $48.
C. A resident combination archery hunting and fishing license is $43 $48.
E. A 3-day fishing license for a resident or nonresident, valid for the 72-hour period
specified on the license, is $23 $30.
F. A nonresident 7-day fishing license, valid for 7 days from date indicated on license,
is $43 $62.
Page 336 - 132LR2409(17)

G. A nonresident 15-day fishing license, valid for 15 days from date indicated on
license, is $47 $66.
H. A nonresident season fishing license for persons 16 years of age or older is $64
$83.
J. A one-day fishing license for a resident or nonresident, valid for the 24-hour period
indicated on license, is $11 $18.
PART OOO
Sec. OOO-1. 26 MRSA c. 25, sub-c. 6 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 6
TARGETED WORKFORCE INVESTMENT PROGRAM
§2041. Targeted Workforce Investment Program
1. Program established. The Targeted Workforce Investment Program, referred to
in this section as "the program," is established within the Department of Labor to provide
training and other workforce development activities in support of industries or occupations
for which there is an identified need in the state economy.
2. Administration. The Department of Labor shall administer the program and may
expend funds in accordance with applicable funding agreements or as determined necessary
by the commissioner. To the extent that funds are available, the program may include:
A. Preapprenticeship training programs, career exploration programs and outreach
efforts to build a career development network;
B. Training, education and career pathway programs to develop industry-aligned
skills;
C. Wraparound services and case management services that are designed to connect
individuals in this State, especially individuals from underrepresented communities, to
in-demand jobs;
D. Investments in the Maine Apprenticeship Program established under section 3202
and other job skills development programs; and
E. Employer outreach and education to create sustained, quality job opportunities.
3. Agency coordination. To better prepare the State's workforce for investments in
the State, state and quasi-state agencies shall coordinate with the Department of Labor on
workforce development initiatives that affect the agencies and their respective industries.
The agencies shall further consult with the Department of Labor when seeking funding
opportunities that include workforce development as an allowable activity.
4. Funding. The Department of Labor may accept funds, public or private, and may
expend the funds for purposes that are consistent with this subchapter. Any funds received
under this subchapter must be deposited in a nonlapsing account and any balance remaining
at the end of each fiscal year must be carried forward to the next fiscal year for use
consistent with this subchapter.
Page 337 - 132LR2409(17)

5. Transfer of funds. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, amounts
may be transferred by financial order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer
and approval of the Governor. These transfers are not considered adjustments to
appropriations.
PART PPP
Sec. PPP-1. 26 MRSA §1081, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Oaths and witnesses. In the discharge of the duties imposed by this chapter, the
commission and any duly authorized representative has the power to administer oaths and
affirmations, take depositions, certify official acts and issue subpoenas to compel the
attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda
and other records determined necessary as evidence in connection with a disputed claim.
Oaths and affirmations required by reason of duties performed pursuant to this chapter may
be administered by any persons as may be designated for the purpose by the commissioner.
In the discharge of the duties imposed by this chapter, the commission or any duly
authorized representative, when the interests of any interested party demand, may issue
commissions to take depositions to any unemployment compensation or employment
security official empowered to take such depositions under this chapter or the laws of any
other state, for any of the following causes:
A. When the deponent resides out of or is absent from the State;
B. When the deponent is bound to sea or is about to go out of the State; or
C. When the deponent is so aged, infirm or sick as to be unable to attend at the place
of hearing.
A deposition pursuant to paragraph A, B or C must be taken by written interrogatories to
be compiled by the commission, and the adverse party must be afforded an opportunity to
refute such testimony before a determination is made. The deponent must be sworn and
the deposition must be signed and sworn to by the deponent before admissible as testimony
at a hearing before the commission.
Subpoenas under this subsection must be issued pursuant to Title 5, section 9060.
Sec. PPP-2. 26 MRSA §1081, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Refusal to appear. A person who without just cause fails or refuses to attend and
testify or to answer any lawful inquiry or to produce books, papers, correspondence,
memoranda and other records, if it is in that person's power to do so, in obedience to a
subpoena of the commission or the duly authorized representative commits a Class E crime.
This crime is a strict liability crime as defined in Title 17-A, section 34, subsection 4-A. If
a person refuses to obey a subpoena duly issued by the commission or the duly authorized
representative, any court of this State within the jurisdiction of which the person resides or
transacts business has jurisdiction to issue to that person an order requiring the person to
appear and produce evidence or testimony, and any failure to obey that order may be
punished by the court as contempt of court.
Sec. PPP-3. 26 MRSA §1081, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Protection against self-incrimination. A person may not be excused from
attending and testifying or from producing books, papers, correspondence, memoranda and
Page 338 - 132LR2409(17)

other records before the commission or any duly authorized representative or in obedience
to the subpoena of the commission or the duly authorized representative in any cause or
proceeding before the commission or any duly authorized representative on the ground that
the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of that person may tend to
incriminate that person or subject that person to a penalty or fine; but an individual may
not be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or fine for or on account of any transaction,
matter or thing concerning which that individual is compelled, after having claimed
privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence, documentary or
otherwise, except that the individual in testifying under this subsection is not exempt from
prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in testifying.
Sec. PPP-4. 26 MRSA §1082, sub-§4-A, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 641, §3, is
repealed.
Sec. PPP-5. 26 MRSA §1082, sub-§8, as amended by PL 1987, c. 641, §4, is
repealed.
Sec. PPP-6. 26 MRSA §1082, sub-§9-A, as amended by PL 2003, c. 452, Pt. O,
§5 and affected by Pt. X, §2, is repealed.
Sec. PPP-7. 26 MRSA §1082, sub-§10, as amended by PL 1987, c. 641, §6, is
repealed.
Sec. PPP-8. 26 MRSA §1194, sub-§5, as amended by PL 1987, c. 641, §10, is
further amended to read:
5. Commission review. The commission may on its own motion affirm, modify or
set aside any decision of the Division of Administrative Hearings on the basis of the
evidence previously submitted in that case or direct the taking of additional evidence, or
may permit any of the parties of that decision to initiate further appeals before it. The
commission shall permit such further appeal by any of the parties interested in a decision
of the Division of Administrative Hearings and by the deputy whose decision has been
overruled or modified by the Division of Administrative Hearings. The commission may
remove to itself or transfer to the chief administrative hearing officer Director of the
Division of Administrative Hearings or to another administrative hearing officer the
proceedings on any claim pending before the Division of Administrative Hearings. Any
proceedings so removed to the commission shall must be heard in accordance with the
requirements in subsection 3. All hearings conducted pursuant to this section may be heard
by a quorum of commissioners, as defined in section 1081, subsection 3. The commission
shall promptly notify the interested parties of its findings and decisions.
Sec. PPP-9. 26 MRSA §1401-A, sub-§2, ¶I, as amended by PL 2025, c. 154, §2
and c. 277, §6, is further amended to read:
I. The State Workforce Development Board established in section 2006; and
Sec. PPP-10. 26 MRSA §1401-A, sub-§2, ¶J, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 277, §6,
is amended to read:
J. The Bureau of Paid Family and Medical Leave.; and
Sec. PPP-11. 26 MRSA §1401-A, sub-§2, ¶K is enacted to read:
K. The Division of Administrative Hearings.
Page 339 - 132LR2409(17)

Sec. PPP-12. 26 MRSA §1401-C is enacted to read:
§1401-C. Division of Administrative Hearings
1. Division established. There is established within the department the Division of
Administrative Hearings, referred to in this section as "the division," to hear and decide
appeals from decisions pertaining to chapters 7 and 13 and any other appeals as the
commissioner may require.
A. The division is under the direction of the Director of the Division of Administrative
Hearings, referred to in this section as "the director," appointed by the commissioner
and subject to the Civil Service Law. The director must be an attorney admitted to
practice law in the State.
B. The director shall administer the office, supervise and assign cases to administrative
hearing officers and preside at hearings as necessary.
C. Administrative hearing officers shall preside at appeal proceedings. Administrative
hearing officers are under the direction of the director and hired subject to the Civil
Service Law.
2. Oaths and witnesses. In the discharge of the duties imposed by this chapter, the
commissioner, the division and any duly authorized representative of the commissioner or
division has the power to administer oaths and affirmations, take depositions, certify
official acts and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production
of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda and other records determined necessary as
evidence in connection with a disputed claim or the administration of this chapter. Oaths
and affirmations required by reason of duties performed pursuant to this chapter may be
administered by any persons as may be designated for the purpose by the commissioner.
In the discharge of the duties imposed by this chapter, the commissioner, the division or
any duly authorized representative of the commissioner or division, when the interests of
any interested party demand, may issue commissions to take depositions to any
unemployment compensation or employment security official empowered to take such
depositions under this chapter or the laws of any other state, for any of the following causes:
A. When the deponent resides out of or is absent from the State;
B. When the deponent is bound to sea or is about to go out of the State; or
C. When the deponent is so aged, infirm or sick as to be unable to attend at the place
of hearing.
A deposition pursuant to paragraph A, B or C must be taken by written interrogatories to
be compiled by the commissioner or the division, and the adverse party must be afforded
an opportunity to refute such testimony before a determination is made. The deponent must
be sworn and the deposition must be signed and sworn to by the deponent before admissible
as testimony at a hearing before the division or the commissioner.
Subpoenas under this subsection must be issued pursuant to Title 5, section 9060.
3. Refusal to appear. A person who without just cause fails or refuses to attend and
testify or to answer any lawful inquiry or to produce books, papers, correspondence,
memoranda and other records, if it is in that person's power to do so, in obedience to a
subpoena of the commissioner, the division or the duly authorized representative of the
commissioner or division commits a Class E crime. This crime is a strict liability crime as
Page 340 - 132LR2409(17)

defined in Title 17-A, section 34, subsection 4-A. If a person refuses to obey a subpoena
duly issued by the commissioner, the division or the duly authorized representative of the
commissioner or division, any court of this State within the jurisdiction of which the person
resides or transacts business has jurisdiction to issue to that person an order requiring the
person to appear and produce evidence or testimony, and any failure to obey that order may
be punished by the court as contempt of court.
4. Protection against self-incrimination. A person may not be excused from
attending and testifying or from producing books, papers, correspondence, memoranda and
other records before the division or any duly authorized representative or in obedience to
the subpoena of the division or the duly authorized representative in any cause or
proceeding before the division or any duly authorized representative on the ground that the
testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of that person may tend to
incriminate that person or subject that person to a penalty or fine; but an individual may
not be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or fine for or on account of any transaction,
matter or thing concerning which that person is compelled, after having claimed privilege
against self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, except
that the individual in testifying under this subsection is not exempt from prosecution and
punishment for perjury committed in testifying.
PART QQQ
Sec. QQQ-1. 26 MRSA §1401-B, sub-§1, ¶B, as repealed and replaced by PL
2013, c. 467, §5, is amended to read:
B. The commissioner shall appoint to serve at the commissioner's pleasure:
(1) Deputy Commissioner;
(2) Director of Legislative Affairs;
(3) Director of Operations;
(4) Director of Communications;
(5) Director, Bureau of Labor Standards;
(6) Director, Bureau of Employment Services; and
(7) Director, Bureau of Rehabilitation Services.; and
(8) Associate Commissioner.
PART RRR
Sec. RRR-1. 35-A MRSA §7104, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2019, c. 343, Pt.
UUU, §4, is further amended to read:
5. Funds for Communications Equipment Fund. The commission shall annually
transfer $85,000 $250,000 from a state universal service fund established pursuant to this
section to the Communications Equipment Fund established under Title 26, section
1419‑A.
If the Department of Labor, Bureau of Rehabilitation Services does not receive from federal
or other sources funds in addition to the $85,000 $250,000 sufficient to carry out the
purposes of Title 26, section 1419‑A, the commission, at the request of the Department of
Page 341 - 132LR2409(17)

Labor, Bureau of Rehabilitation Services, may transfer from the state universal service fund
to the Communications Equipment Fund an additional $100,000.
The commission may require contributions to the state universal service fund in an amount
necessary to collect amounts transferred pursuant to this subsection.
PART SSS
Sec. SSS-1. Rename Department of Marine Resources, Bureau of Public
Health program. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Bureau of
Public Health program within the Department of Marine Resources is renamed the Bureau
of Public Health and Aquaculture program.
PART TTT
Sec. TTT-1. Promotion adjustments in Department of Professional and
Financial Regulation, Bureau of Financial Institutions. There is created within the
Department of Professional and Financial Regulation, Bureau of Financial Institutions a
process for promotion to Senior Bank Examiner and Principal Bank Examiner positions
based on professional competency benchmarks.
1. A person employed by the bureau in a Bank Examiner position may be promoted to
a Senior Bank Examiner position if that person demonstrates achievement of certain
professional competency benchmarks as determined by the bureau.
2. A person employed by the bureau in a Senior Bank Examiner position may be
promoted to a Principal Bank Examiner position if that person demonstrates achievement
of certain professional competency benchmarks as determined by the bureau.
PART UUU
Sec. UUU-1. 25 MRSA §1501, 3rd ¶, as amended by PL 2003, c. 360, §1, is
further amended to read:
Subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Public Safety, the chief may appoint
one commissioned officer of the State Police to act as the chief's deputy and 2 3
commissioned officers of the State Police to act as the chief's majors, all of whom serve at
the pleasure of the chief. Subject to the Civil Service Law, the Chief of the State Police
may enlist suitable persons as members of the State Police to enforce the law and employ
such other employees as may be necessary. The Chief of the State Police shall make rules,
subject to the approval of the State Civil Service Appeals Board, for the discipline and
control of the State Police. If a deputy chief or major is removed or fails to be reappointed
for any reason other than malfeasance of office and, at that time, does not have at least the
number of years of creditable service necessary for a service retirement benefit pursuant to
Title 5, section 17851, subsection 4, the deputy chief or major must be reinstated at the
commissioned rank held at the time of the appointment with all the rights and privileges as
provided by law and personnel rules.
PART VVV
Sec. VVV-1. 25 MRSA §2003, sub-§1, ¶E, as amended by PL 2011, c. 298, §7,
is further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
Page 342 - 132LR2409(17)

(4) Submits an application fee along with the written application to the proper
issuing authority pursuant to the following schedule:
(a) Resident For a resident of a municipality or unorganized territory, $35 $50
for an original application and $20 $35 for a renewal, except that a person who
paid $60 for a concealed firearms permit or renewal during 1991 or 1992 is
entitled to a credit toward renewal fees in an amount equal to $30 for a person
who paid $60 for an original application and $45 for a person who paid $60
for a permit renewal. The credit is valid until fully utilized; and
(b) Nonresident For a nonresident, $60 $80 for an original or renewal
application; and
Sec. VVV-2. 25 MRSA §2003, sub-§15, as amended by PL 2015, c. 123, §1, is
further amended to read:
15. Duty of issuing authority; application fees. The application fees submitted by
the applicant as required by subsection 1, paragraph E, subparagraph (4) are subject to the
following.
A. If the issuing authority is other than the Chief of the State Police, $25 $40 of the
fee for an original application and $15 $30 of the fee for a renewal must be paid over
to the Treasurer of State.
B. If the Chief of the State Police is the issuing authority as the designee of a
municipality under section 2002‑A, $25 of the fee for an original application and $15
of the fee for a renewal the application fee must be paid over to the Treasurer of State.
C. If the Chief of the State Police is the issuing authority because the applicant is a
resident of an unorganized territory, a nonresident or an applicant under subsection 18,
the application fee must be paid over to the Treasurer of State. The fee must be applied
to the expenses of administration incurred by the State Police.
PART WWW
Sec. WWW-1. Department of Administrative and Financial Services and
Department of Public Safety; lease-purchase authorization for motor vehicles
for State Police. Pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 1587, the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, in cooperation with the Treasurer of
State, on behalf of the Department of Public Safety, may enter into financing agreements
in fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27 for the acquisition of motor vehicles for the State
Police. The financing agreements entered into in each fiscal year may not exceed
$3,655,000 in principal costs, and a financing agreement may not exceed 60 months in
duration. The interest rate may not exceed 7%. The annual principal and interest costs
must be paid from the appropriate line category appropriations and allocations in the State
Police accounts.
PART XXX
Sec. XXX-1. 22 MRSA §259, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt.
QQ, §1, is further amended to read:
B. Six hundred ninety-nine thousand, one hundred fifty dollars in fiscal year 2001-02
to federally qualified health centers to support the infrastructure of these programs in
Page 343 - 132LR2409(17)

providing primary care services to underserved populations. Forty-four thousand, two
hundred fifty dollars must be provided to each federally qualified health center with an
additional $8,850 for the 2nd and each additional site operated by a federally qualified
health center. For the purposes of this paragraph, "site" means a site or sites operated
by the federally qualified health center within its scope of service that meet all health
center requirements, including providing primary care services, regardless of patients'
ability to pay, 5 days a week with extended hours. If there is not sufficient funding to
meet the formula in this paragraph, the $699,150 must be allocated in proportion to the
formula outlined in this paragraph; and
Sec. XXX-2. 22 MRSA §259, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt.
QQ, §2, is further amended to read:
C. Five hundred thousand dollars, beginning with fiscal year 2015-16 and continuing
each fiscal year thereafter, to support access to primary medical, behavioral health and
dental services to residents of the State in rural and underserved communities and to
assist with provider recruitment and retention. Twenty-five thousand dollars must be
provided to each federally qualified health center; and.
Sec. XXX-3. 22 MRSA §259, sub-§1, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. QQ,
§3, is repealed.
Sec. XXX-4. 22 MRSA §259, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. QQ, §4,
is repealed.
Sec. XXX-5. PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. QQ, §5 is repealed.
Sec. XXX-6. Lapsed balances; Department of Health and Human Services,
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, $4,000,000 of the unencumbered balance forward in the Department
of Health and Human Services, Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention, General
Fund account, All Other line category lapses to the unappropriated surplus of the General
Fund no later than June 30, 2026. These funds were authorized to carry forward in the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 259, subsection 3.
PART YYY
Sec. YYY-1. 39-A MRSA §154, sub-§6, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 17, Pt.
R, §1, is further amended to read:
A. The assessments levied under this section may not be designed to produce more
than $14,700,000 beginning in the 2023‑24 fiscal year revenue than is sufficient for
expenditures allocated pursuant to subsection 2 and to maintain a reserve of up to 1/4
of the board's annual budget. Assessments collected that exceed the this limit by a
margin of more than 10% must be used to reduce the assessment that is paid by insured
employers pursuant to subsection 3. Any amount collected above the board's allocated
budget and within the 10% margin must be used to create a reserve of up to 1/4 of the
board's annual budget.
PART ZZZ
Sec. ZZZ-1. Transfer to the General Fund unappropriated surplus;
Reserve for General Fund Operating Capital. Notwithstanding any provision of law
Page 344 - 132LR2409(17)

to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2026, the State Controller shall transfer $5,000,000
from available balance in the Reserve for General Fund Operating Capital to the
unappropriated surplus of the General Fund.
PART AAAA
Sec. AAAA-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other;
Judicial Department, Courts - Supreme, Superior and District; fiscal year
2025-26. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2025-26,
the Judicial Department is authorized to transfer up to $80,000 of available balances of
appropriations in the Personal Services line category in the Courts - Supreme, Superior and
District program, after all financial commitments for salary, benefit and other obligations
have been met, to the All Other line category in order to fund costs associated with a market
pay study. These amounts may be transferred by financial order upon the recommendation
of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers are not
considered adjustments to appropriations.
Page 345 - 132LR2409(17)